Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The State/Executive Branch Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
(1) Funds Appropriations: There is appropriated out of the General Fund, Road
Fund, Restricted Funds accounts, Federal Funds accounts, or Bond Funds accounts for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and for the fiscal year beginning July
1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2028, the following discrete sums, or so much thereof as
may be necessary. Appropriated funds are included pursuant to KRS 48.700 and 48.710.
Each appropriation is made by source of respective fund or funds accounts.
Appropriations for the following officers, cabinets, departments, boards, commissions,
institutions, subdivisions, agencies, and budget units of the state government, and any and
all other activities of the government of the Commonwealth, are subject to the provisions
of Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes and compliance with the
conditions and procedures set forth in this Act.
(2) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Appropriations identified as General Fund
(Tobacco) in Part I, Operating Budget, of this Act are representative of the amounts
provided in Part X, Phase I Tobacco Settlement, of this Act and are not to be appropriated
in duplication.
A. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Units
1. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Page 1 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 6,751,000 6,871,900
Restricted Funds 288,100 288,100
TOTAL 7,039,100 7,160,000
(1) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided
on the base salary of the Lieutenant Governor shall be the same as that provided for
eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(4), the increment provided on the base salary of the
Governor shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this
Act.
2. OFFICE OF STATE BUDGET DIRECTOR
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,806,600 3,884,300
Restricted Funds 384,000 384,000
Federal Funds 62,000 -0-
TOTAL 4,252,600 4,268,300
(1) Participation in Transparent Governing - Full Disclosure of Inmate
Population Forecasts and Related Materials: The Office of State Budget Director shall
provide the methodology, assumptions, data, and all other related materials used to
project biennial offender population forecasts conducted by the Office of State Budget
Director, the Kentucky Department of Corrections, and any consulting firms, to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by November 1, 2027. This
submission shall include but not be limited to the projected state, county, and community
offender populations for the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium and must coincide with the
budgeted amount for these populations. This submission shall clearly divulge the
methodology and reasoning behind the budgeted and projected offender population in a
commitment to participate in transparent governing.
Page 2 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
3. HOMELAND SECURITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 7,441,400 7,058,700
Restricted Funds 4,494,100 3,815,800
Federal Funds 9,955,400 9,983,700
TOTAL 21,890,900 20,858,200
4. VETERANS' AFFAIRS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 36,067,100 37,556,600
Restricted Funds 106,381,700 107,530,800
Federal Funds 300,000 300,000
TOTAL 142,748,800 145,387,400
(1) Weekend and Holiday Premium Pay Incentive: The Kentucky Veterans
Centers are authorized to continue the weekend and holiday premium pay incentive for
the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(2) Medal of Honor Recipients - Travel and Per Diem: The Commissioner of
the Department of Veterans' Affairs may approve travel and per diem expenses incurred
when Kentucky residents who have been awarded the Medal of Honor attend veterans,
military, or memorial events in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(3) Brain Injury Association of America, Kentucky Chapter and the
Epilepsy Foundation of Kentuckiana Funding: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $93,700 in each fiscal year for grants to the Brain Injury Association of
America, Kentucky Chapter and $93,700 in each fiscal year for grants to the Epilepsy
Foundation of Kentuckiana to be used solely for the purpose of working with veterans
who have experienced brain trauma and their families.
(4) Veterans' Service Organization Funding: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $187,500 in each fiscal year for grants to Veterans' Service
Page 3 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Organization programs.
(5) Kentucky Homeless Veterans Program: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $200,000 in each fiscal year to provide emergency financial
assistance to Kentucky's homeless veterans.
(6) National Guard/Reserve Burial Act: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $320,000 in each fiscal year to support interment costs for veterans of the
National Guard and Reserves and eligible family members.
(7) Veteran’s Service Organization Burial Honor Guard: Included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $152,000 in each fiscal year to support military
funeral honors for veterans.
5. KENTUCKY INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,772,000 1,789,600
Restricted Funds 8,375,200 10,914,300
Federal Funds 440,051,600 288,578,200
TOTAL 450,198,800 301,282,100
(1) Administrative Fee on Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund
Projects: A one-half of one percent administrative fee is authorized to be paid to the
Kentucky Infrastructure Authority for the administration of each project funded by the
Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Coal-Producing Counties and the
Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Tobacco Counties. These
administrative fees shall be paid, upon inception of the project, out of the fund from
which the project was allocated.
6. MILITARY AFFAIRS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 29,493,100 29,856,700
Restricted Funds 21,449,500 21,566,600
Page 4 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Federal Funds 88,307,100 88,593,500
TOTAL 139,249,700 140,016,800
(1) Kentucky National Guard: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $4,500,000 in each fiscal year to be expended, subject to the conditions
and procedures provided in this Act, which are required as a result of the Governor's
declaration of emergency pursuant to KRS Chapter 39A, and which are required to
prepare for an event for which the Governor subsequently declares an emergency and the
Governor's call of the Kentucky National Guard to active duty when an emergency or
exigent situation has been declared to exist by the Governor. Any portion of the
$4,500,000 not expended shall lapse to the General Fund at the end of each fiscal year. In
the event that costs for Governor-declared emergencies or the Governor’s call of the
Kentucky National Guard for emergencies or exigent situations exceed $4,500,000
annually, the costs shall be deemed necessary government expenses and shall be paid
from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705).
(2) Disaster or Emergency Aid Funds: There is appropriated from the General
Fund the necessary funds, subject to the conditions and procedures in this Act, which are
required to match federal aid for which the state would be eligible in the event of a
presidentially declared disaster or emergency. These necessary funds shall be made
available from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve
Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(3) Military Burial Honor Guard: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $50,000 in each fiscal year for Military Burial Honor Guard duties.
(4) Residential Youth-at-Risk Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $1,235,000 in each fiscal year to support the Bluegrass Challenge
Academy and $1,235,000 in each fiscal year to support the Appalachian Youth Challenge
Academy.
Page 5 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
7. COMMISSION ON HUMAN RIGHTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,980,200 2,028,800
Restricted Funds 10,000 10,000
Federal Funds 445,000 445,000
TOTAL 2,435,200 2,483,800
8. DEPARTMENT FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 10,278,100 12,395,100
Restricted Funds 3,726,700 1,719,800
Federal Funds 242,486,800 242,521,200
TOTAL 256,491,600 256,636,100
(1) Area Development District Funding: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $3,984,000 in each fiscal year for the Joint Funding Administration
Program in support of the area development districts.
(2) Mary Kendall Homes and Gateway Juvenile Diversion: Included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $257,800 in each fiscal year for the support of the
Mary Kendall Homes and $257,800 in each fiscal year for the support of Gateway
Juvenile Diversion.
(3) Allocation of Area Development District Funding: The Department for
Local Government shall allocate area development district funding appropriated to the
Joint Funding Administration Program to the area development districts in accordance
with the following formula:
(a) Seventy percent of the total appropriation shall be allocated equally among all
area development districts;
(b) Twenty percent of the total appropriation shall be allocated based upon each
area development district's proportionate share of total state population, as identified by
Page 6 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
the most recently completed United States Census; and
(c) Ten percent of the total appropriation shall be allocated based upon each area
development district's proportionate share of total incorporated cities and counties, as
identified by the records of the Kentucky Secretary of State's Land Office at the time of
the allocation.
The Department for Local Government shall, upon the unanimous written direction
of all area development districts, reduce the allocation based upon proportionate share of
total incorporated cities and counties and instead allocate those funds to provide
additional nonfederal dollars to area development districts for the purpose of maximizing
federal awards.
(4) Local Government Operations: Notwithstanding KRS 65A.020(5)(a),
$1,000,000 may be used in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the operations of the
Department for Local Government.
9. LOCAL GOVERNMENT ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE FUND
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 27,926,600 25,211,700
(1) Allocation of the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund:
Notwithstanding KRS 42.470(1)(a), 70 percent of moneys in the Local Government
Economic Assistance Fund shall be distributed to each coal producing county on the
basis of the ratio of coal severed in each respective county to the coal severed statewide.
Notwithstanding KRS 42.470(1)(c), no allocation shall be distributed to non-coal
producing counties.
(2) Coal Haul Road System: Notwithstanding KRS 42.455(2), no funds
appropriated to the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund are required to be
spent on the coal haul road system.
10. LOCAL GOVERNMENT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FUND
2026-27 2027-28
Page 7 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
General Fund 20,494,700 15,059,000
(1) Coal Severance Tax Transfers: Notwithstanding KRS 42.450 to 42.495, 70
percent of the severance and processing taxes on coal collected annually shall be
transferred to the Local Government Economic Development Fund. Notwithstanding
KRS 42.450 to 42.495, 30 percent of the severance and processing taxes on coal collected
annually, shall be transferred to the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund.
Transfers to the Local Government Economic Development Fund and the Local
Government Economic Assistance Fund shall be made quarterly in July, October,
January, and April based upon actual revenues from the prior quarter.
(2) Coal Severance Tax Collections Calculations and Transfers: The above
appropriations from the General Fund are based on the official estimate presented by the
Office of State Budget Director.
(a) Osteopathic Medicine Scholarship Program: Notwithstanding KRS
164.7891(11)(b), no transfers shall be made to the Osteopathic Medicine Scholarship
Program within the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) Pharmacy Scholarships: Notwithstanding KRS 164.7890(11)(c), no transfers
shall be made to the Coal County Pharmacy Scholarship Program within the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority; and
(c) Kentucky Coal Fields Endowment Authority: Notwithstanding KRS
42.453(3), no transfers shall be made to the Kentucky Coal Field Endowment Authority.
(3) Allocation of the Local Government Economic Development Fund:
Notwithstanding KRS 42.4592(1), 50 percent of Local Government Economic
Development Fund moneys shall be allocated in accordance with KRS 42.4592(1)(a), and
50 percent shall be allocated in accordance with KRS 42.4592(1)(b).
(4) Use of the Local Government Economic Development Fund:
Notwithstanding KRS 42.450 to 42.495, all funds appropriated to Local Government
Economic Development Fund Single-County Accounts shall be allocated to projects with
Page 8 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
the concurrence of the respective county judge/executive, state senator(s), and state
representative(s) of each county. If concurrence is not achieved, the fiscal court of each
county may apply for grants through the Department for Local Government pursuant to
KRS 42.4588.
11. AREA DEVELOPMENT FUND
(1) Area Development Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 42.345 to 42.370 and
48.185, or any statute to the contrary, no funding is provided for the Area Development
Fund.
(2) Area Development District Flexibility: Notwithstanding KRS 42.350(2) and
provided that sufficient funds are maintained in the Joint Funding Agreement program to
meet the match requirements for the Economic Development Administration grants,
Community Development Block Grants, Appalachian Regional Commission grants, or
any federal program where the Joint Funding Agreement funds are utilized to meet
nonfederal match requirements, an area development district with authorization from its
Board of Directors may request approval to transfer funding between the Area
Development Fund and the Joint Funding Agreement Program from the Commissioner of
the Department for Local Government.
12. REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AGENCY ASSISTANCE FUND
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 6,000,000
13. EXECUTIVE BRANCH ETHICS COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 673,400 688,200
Restricted Funds 697,900 708,300
TOTAL 1,371,300 1,396,500
(1) Use of Restricted Funds: All penalties collected or received by the Executive
Branch Ethics Commission shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to a trust
Page 9 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
and agency fund account to the credit of the Commission to be used by the Commission
for the cost of conducting administrative hearings pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(2) Executive Branch Ethics Commission: The Executive Branch Ethics
Commission may increase the amount of the registration fee provided under KRS
11A.211(6) for the purpose of funding a new online filing system.
14. SECRETARY OF STATE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 6,564,000 6,652,600
(1) Use of Restricted Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 14.140(1) and (3), the above
Restricted Funds may be used for the continuation of current activities within the Office
of the Secretary of State.
(2) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided
on the base salary of the Secretary of State shall be the same as that provided for eligible
state employees in Part IV of this Act.
15. BOARD OF ELECTIONS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 7,709,300 7,741,400
Restricted Funds 98,200 98,200
Federal Funds 1,829,800 1,829,800
TOTAL 9,637,300 9,669,400
(1) Cost of Elections: Costs associated with special elections, KRS 117.345(2)
costs associated with additional precincts with a voting machine, KRS 117.343 costs for
additional registered voters, and KRS 116.145 costs for additional new registered voters
shall be deemed a necessary government expense and shall be paid from the General
Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705). Any reimbursements authorized as a necessary government expense according
Page 10 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
to the above provisions shall be at the same rates as those established by the State Board
of Elections.
(2) List Maintenance: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$250,000 in each fiscal year for list maintenance of Kentucky's voter rolls by the State
Board of Elections.
16. REGISTRY OF ELECTION FINANCE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,723,600 1,757,900
17. ATTORNEY GENERAL
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 150,000 150,000
General Fund 24,714,200 40,289,600
Restricted Funds 87,154,900 72,452,800
Federal Funds 64,133,600 64,415,700
TOTAL 176,152,700 177,308,100
(1) State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of
$150,000 of the Tobacco Settlement payments received in each fiscal year is appropriated
to the Attorney General for the state’s diligent enforcement of noncompliant
nonparticipating manufacturers.
(2) Expert Witnesses: In addition to such funds as may be appropriated, the
Office of the Attorney General and the Unified Prosecutorial System, on behalf of the
Commonwealth’s Attorneys, may request from the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
as a necessary government expense, such funds as may be necessary for expert witnesses.
Upon justification of the request, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide
up to $3,000,000 for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium for this purpose to the Office of the
Attorney General from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705). Without charge, the Department of Insurance
Page 11 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
shall provide the Office of the Attorney General any available information to assist in the
preparation of a rate hearing pursuant to KRS 304.17A-095. Expenditures under this
subsection shall be reported to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue by August 1 of each year.
(3) Annual and Sick Leave Service Credit: Notwithstanding any statutory or
regulatory restrictions to the contrary, any former employee of the Unified Prosecutorial
System who has been appointed to a permanent full-time position under KRS Chapter
18A shall be credited annual and sick leave based on service credited under the Kentucky
Retirement Systems solely for the purpose of computation of sick and annual leave. This
provision shall only apply to any new appointment or current employee as of July 1,
1998.
(4) Operations of the Office of the Attorney General: Notwithstanding KRS
367.478(2), 367.805(3), and 367.905(5), included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation in fiscal year 2026-2027 is $15,000,000 to support the operations of the
Office of the Attorney General.
(5) Legal Services Contracts: The Office of the Attorney General may present
proposals to state agencies specifying legal work that is presently accomplished through
personal service contracts that indicate the Office of the Attorney General's capacity to
perform the work at a lesser cost. State agencies may agree to make arrangements with
the Office of the Attorney General to perform the legal work and compensate the Office
of the Attorney General for the legal services.
(6) Civil Action Representation: To ensure adequate representation of the
interest of the Commonwealth and to protect the financial condition of the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, it has been determined that it is necessary to allow the Attorney
General appropriate authority to engage private lawyers as co-counsel in Civil Action No.
17-CI-01348. Due to the highly complex and specialized nature of that litigation, KRS
Chapter 45A, et seq. would prevent the Attorney General from engaging counsel of his
Page 12 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
choice. Accordingly, to protect the interest of the Commonwealth, and notwithstanding
the requirements of KRS Chapter 45A, et seq., which are hereby waived in respect to the
Attorney General retaining private lawyers to prosecute Civil Action No. 17-CI-01348,
the Attorney General is vested with the authority to hire and pay counsel of his choice on
any contractual basis the Attorney General deems advisable.
(7) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided
on the base salary of the Attorney General shall be the same as that provided for eligible
state employees in Part IV of this Act.
18. UNIFIED PROSECUTORIAL SYSTEM
(1) Prosecutors Advisory Council Administrative Functions: The Prosecutors
Advisory Council shall approve compensation for employees of the Unified Prosecutorial
System subject to the appropriations in this Act.
a. Commonwealth's Attorneys
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 75,751,600 77,355,000
Restricted Funds 5,770,400 5,872,700
Federal Funds 359,200 359,200
TOTAL 81,881,200 83,586,900
(1) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 15.755, the increment provided on
the base salary of the Commonwealth's Attorneys shall be the same as that provided for
eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
(2) Rocket Docket Program: Included in the above appropriation is $1,416,700
in General Fund and $2,000,000 in Restricted Funds in each fiscal year to support the
Rocket Docket Program.
b. County Attorneys
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 77,602,100 79,366,400
Page 13 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 913,800 931,600
Federal Funds 115,100 115,100
TOTAL 78,631,000 80,413,100
(1) County Attorney Retirement Costs: Pursuant to KRS 61.5991, included in
the above General Fund appropriation is $1,590,600 in each fiscal year for each County
Attorney's Office's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline subsidy as adjusted and located under
the 2024 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission’s website.
(2) Expert Witnesses: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$75,000 in each fiscal year for costs associated with expert witnesses in cases involving
juvenile defendants.
(3) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 15.765, the increment provided on
the base salary of the County Attorneys shall be the same as that provided for eligible
state employees in Part IV of this Act.
(4) Rocket Docket Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $549,800 in each fiscal year to support the Rocket Docket Program.
TOTAL - UNIFIED PROSECUTORIAL SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 153,353,700 156,721,400
Restricted Funds 6,684,200 6,804,300
Federal Funds 474,300 474,300
TOTAL 160,512,200 164,000,000
19. TREASURY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,437,200 3,500,000
Restricted Funds 2,141,400 2,165,400
Federal Funds 1,206,700 1,206,700
TOTAL 6,785,300 6,872,100
Page 14 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(1) Unclaimed Property Fund: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $2,140,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,164,500 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 from the Unclaimed Property Fund to provide funding for services performed by
the Unclaimed Property Division of the Department of the Treasury.
(2) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided
on the base salary of the State Treasurer shall be the same as that provided for eligible
state employees in Part IV of this Act.
20. AGRICULTURE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 31,149,900 28,559,600
General Fund 11,607,800 22,085,200
Restricted Funds 22,760,400 12,803,400
Federal Funds 12,173,200 12,173,200
TOTAL 77,691,300 75,621,400
(1) Use of Restricted Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 217.570 and 217B.580,
included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 to support of the operations of the Department of Agriculture.
(2) Farms to Food Banks: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support the Farms to Food Banks
Program. The use of the moneys provided by this appropriation shall be restricted to
purchases of Kentucky-grown produce from Kentucky farmers who participate in the
Farms to Food Banks Program.
(3) County Fair Grants: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$455,000 in each fiscal year to support capital improvement grants to the Local
Agricultural Fair Aid Program.
(4) Kentucky Grape and Wine Council: Notwithstanding KRS 260.175(2), no
General Fund is provided for the Kentucky Small Farm Wineries Support Fund for use by
Page 15 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council.
(5) Counties Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above
General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $10,202,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$9,295,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the counties account as specified in KRS
248.703(1)(a).
(6) State Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above
General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $18,947,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$17,263,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the state account as specified in KRS
248.703(1)(b).
(7) Tobacco Settlement Funds - Allocations: Notwithstanding KRS 248.711(2),
and from the allocation provided therein, counties that are allocated in excess of $20,000
annually may provide up to four percent of the individual county allocation, not to exceed
$15,000 annually, to the county council in that county for administrative costs.
(8) Kentucky Rural Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety
Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $1,000,000 in
each fiscal year to support the Kentucky Rural Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and
Farm Safety Program known as the Raising Hope Initiative. The Department for
Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall coordinate with the
Kentucky Department of Agriculture, the University of Kentucky Southeast Center for
Agricultural Health and Injury Prevention, and other entities to enhance awareness of the
National Suicide Prevention Lifeline (988) in rural communities in Kentucky and to
improve access to information on mental health issues and available treatment services.
The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall
provide cultural competency training to staff to address the unique mental health
challenges affecting the state’s rural communities. The Department for Behavioral
Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall also provide outreach,
treatment, and other necessary services to improve the mental health outcomes of rural
Page 16 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
communities in Kentucky. The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities, in conjunction with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture and
the University of Kentucky Southeast Center for Agricultural Health and Injury
Prevention, shall apply for Federal Funds as provided by the Agriculture Improvement
Act of 2018, 7 U.S.C. sec. 5936, to supplement the General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation provided above. The Department of Agriculture may utilize up to $50,000
in each fiscal year for program administration purposes. The Department of Agriculture
shall coordinate with the Raising Hope Initiative partners to take custody of and maintain
any intellectual property assets that were created or developed by any state agency in
connection with the Raising Hope Initiative.
(9) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,562 in each fiscal year for each participant
for training incentive payments.
(10) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided
on the base salary of the Commissioner of Agriculture shall be the same as that provided
for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
21. AUDITOR OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 9,598,500 9,911,300
Restricted Funds 26,476,000 26,874,200
TOTAL 36,074,500 36,785,500
(1) Audit Services Contracts: Notwithstanding KRS 45.149, no state agency
shall enter into any contract with a nongovernmental entity for audit services unless the
Auditor of Public Accounts has declined in writing to perform the audit or has failed to
respond within 30 days of receipt of a written request for such services. The agency’s
request for audit services shall include a comprehensive statement of the scope and nature
of the proposed audit.
Page 17 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(2) Financial Audit Receipts: The Auditor of Public Accounts shall provide a
listing of fee receipts for all audits and special examinations, itemized by type, agency, or
unit of government, as well as billing methodology to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue by August 1 of each fiscal year.
(3) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided
on the base salary of the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be the same as that provided
for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
22. PERSONNEL BOARD
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 1,034,700 1,049,400
(1) Personnel Board Operating Assessment: Each Agency of the Executive
Branch with employees covered by KRS Chapter 18A shall be assessed each fiscal year
the amount required for the operation of the Personnel Board. The agency assessment
shall be determined by the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet based on
the authorized full-time positions of each agency on July 1 of each year of the biennium.
The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall collect the assessment.
23. KENTUCKY PUBLIC PENSIONS AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 52,407,500 54,022,700
(1) Kentucky Employees Retirement System Quasi-Governmental Agencies:
Notwithstanding KRS 61.565(1)(d)1.d., the initial dollar amounts shall be adjusted
downward for fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 based on the actuarial valuation as
of June 30, 2025.
24. OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS
a. Accountancy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 739,700 751,100
Page 18 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
b. Certification of Alcohol and Drug Counselors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 405,400 405,400
c. Applied Behavior Analysis Licensing
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 70,800 70,800
d. Architects
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 485,500 493,200
e. Certification for Professional Art Therapists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 11,200 11,200
f. Barbering
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 513,400 521,500
g. Chiropractic Examiners
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 299,800 299,800
h. Dentistry
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 1,000,000 1,012,900
i. Licensed Diabetes Educators
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 29,300 29,300
j. Licensure and Certification for Dietitians and Nutritionists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 94,100 94,100
Page 19 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
k. Embalmers and Funeral Directors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 642,300 652,000
l. Licensure for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 2,239,500 2,270,500
m. Certification of Fee-Based Pastoral Counselors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 3,600 3,600
n. Registration for Professional Geologists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 109,000 109,000
o. Hairdressers and Cosmetologists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 3,605,900 2,657,900
p. Specialists in Hearing Instruments
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 77,900 77,900
q. Interpreters for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 51,800 51,800
r. Examiners and Registration of Landscape Architects
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 92,800 95,300
s. Licensure of Marriage and Family Therapists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 141,300 141,300
Page 20 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
t. Licensure for Massage Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 150,700 150,700
u. Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 518,100 526,800
v. Medical Licensure
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 4,697,000 4,751,300
w. Nursing
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 10,879,800 11,069,400
x. Licensure for Nursing Home Administrators
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 101,100 101,100
y. Licensure for Occupational Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 241,600 241,600
z. Ophthalmic Dispensers
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 71,200 71,200
aa. Optometric Examiners
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 312,700 316,500
ab. Pharmacy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 3,255,300 3,308,600
Page 21 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
ac. Physical Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 753,500 766,100
ad. Podiatry
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 58,100 58,100
ae. Private Investigators
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 113,700 113,700
af. Licensed Professional Counselors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 460,800 460,800
ag. Prosthetics, Orthotics, and Pedorthics
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 46,300 46,300
ah. Emergency Medical Services
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,571,100 2,602,900
Restricted Funds 943,700 945,200
Federal Funds 343,400 345,300
TOTAL 3,858,200 3,893,400
ai. Examiners of Psychology
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 311,400 311,400
aj. Respiratory Care
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 329,900 335,300
Page 22 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
ak. Social Work
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 653,500 663,700
al. Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 225,500 225,500
am. Veterinary Examiners
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 816,900 813,600
TOTAL - OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL BOARDS AND
COMMISSIONS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,571,100 2,602,900
Restricted Funds 35,554,100 35,025,500
Federal Funds 343,400 345,300
TOTAL 38,468,600 37,973,700
25. KENTUCKY RIVER AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 393,700 399,200
Restricted Funds 6,158,700 6,174,100
Federal Funds 4,300 -0-
TOTAL 6,556,700 6,573,300
(1) Water Withdrawal Fees: The water withdrawal fees imposed by the
Kentucky River Authority shall not be subject to state and local taxes. Notwithstanding
KRS 151.710(10), Tier 1 water withdrawal fees shall be used to support the operations of
the Authority and for contractual services for water supply and quality studies.
26. SCHOOL FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION
Page 23 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 105,468,800 108,222,200
(1) Debt Service: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$1,503,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,006,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for new
debt service to support new bonds as set forth in Part II, Capital Projects Budget, of this
Act.
(2) Additional Offers of Assistance: Notwithstanding KRS 157.611 to 157.665,
the School Facilities Construction Commission is authorized to make an additional
$100,000,000 in offers of assistance during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium in anticipation
of debt service availability during the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium. No bonded
indebtedness based on the above amount is to be incurred during the 2026-2028 fiscal
biennium.
(3) School Facility Assistance Fund - 2025-2026: Notwithstanding KRS
157.611 to 157.665 and 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part I, A., 27., (5), the School Facilities
Construction Commission shall make awards from the balance of funds remaining from
the capital appropriation in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, A., 10., 005. in the specified
amounts to the following local school districts in fiscal year 2026-2027:
(a) $2,679,000 to Augusta Independent; and
(b) $9,870,000 to Marion County Schools.
(4) Use of Restricted Funds for Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS 157.618,
Restricted Funds in the amount of $8,453,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 are hereby
transferred to the Debt Service Fund to pay debt service on previously issued bonds.
27. TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,225,339,000 1,277,624,600
Restricted Funds 23,326,300 24,418,700
TOTAL 1,248,665,300 1,302,043,300
Page 24 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(1) Dependent Subsidy for All Retirees under age 65: Pursuant to KRS
161.675(4), health insurance supplement payments made by the retirement system shall
not exceed the amount of the single coverage insurance premium.
(2) Retiree Health Insurance: Pursuant to KRS 161.550(2)(b) and
notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $100,600,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $112,400,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 to support the state's contribution for the cost of retiree health insurance for
members not eligible for Medicare who have retired on or after July 1, 2010.
Notwithstanding KRS 161.675, the Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees shall
provide health insurance supplement payments towards the cost of the single coverage
insurance premium based on age and years of service credit of eligible recipients of a
retirement allowance, the cost of which shall be paid from the Medical Insurance Fund.
Notwithstanding KRS 161.675, the Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees shall
authorize eligible recipients of a retirement allowance from the Teachers' Retirement
System who are less than age 65 to be included in the state-sponsored health insurance
plan that is provided to active teachers and state employees under KRS 18A.225.
Notwithstanding KRS 161.675(4)(a), the contribution paid by retirees who are less than
age 65 who qualify for the maximum health insurance supplement payment for single
coverage shall be no more than the sum of (a) the employee contribution paid by active
teachers and state employees for a similar plan, and (b) the standard Medicare Part B
premium as determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Notwithstanding KRS 161.675(4)(a), the contribution paid by retirees who are less than
age 65 who do not qualify for the maximum health insurance supplement payment for
single coverage shall be determined by the same graduated formula used by the Teachers'
Retirement System for Plan Year 2026.
(3) Medical Insurance Fund Employee Contributions Suspended:
Notwithstanding KRS 161.540(1)(e), the employee contributions to the medical
Page 25 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
insurance fund required under 161.540(1)(a)2., (b)2., (c)3., and (d)3., shall be suspended
effective July 1, 2027, as the fund has become fully funded after fiscal year 2026-2027 as
determined by the annual actuarial valuation.
(4) Actuarially Determined Employer Contribution: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $1,076,889,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$1,160,793,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide the full actuarially determined
employer contribution. The Teachers' Retirement System shall provide a report on the
actuarially determined employer contribution to the Public Pension Oversight Board no
later than December 1, 2027.
28. APPROPRIATIONS NOT OTHERWISE CLASSIFIED
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 17,653,300 17,653,300
(1) Funding Sources for Appropriations Not Otherwise Classified: Funds
required to pay the costs of items included within Appropriations Not Otherwise
Classified are appropriated. Any required expenditure over the above amounts is to be
paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700), if available, or from any
available balance in either the Judgments budget unit appropriation or the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to the conditions and procedures
provided in this Act.
The above appropriation is for the payment of Attorney General Expense, Board of
Claims awards, Guardian Ad Litem, Prior Year Claims, Unredeemed Checks Refunded,
Involuntary Commitments - ICF/MR, Frankfort in Lieu of Taxes, Franklin County
Schools in Lieu of Taxes, Frankfort Independent Schools in Lieu of Taxes, Police
Officer, Firefighter, and National Guard and Reserve Survivor Benefits, Medical
Malpractice Liability Insurance Reimbursement, and Blanket Employee Bonds.
(2) Repayment of Awards or Judgments: Funds are appropriated from the
General Fund for the repayment of awards or judgments made by the Board of Claims
Page 26 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
against departments, boards, commissions, and other agencies funded with appropriations
out of the General Fund. However, awards under $5,000 shall be paid from funds
available for the operations of the agency.
(3) Guardian Ad Litem Fees: Included in the above appropriation is funding for
fees to be paid to each guardian ad litem appointed by the court pursuant to KRS
Chapters 26A, 199, 311, 403, 456, 620, and 625 or any other Guardian ad Litem fee for
which the Finance and Administration Cabinet is assigned responsibility by the Courts of
the Commonwealth. Guardian ad Litem fees shall be fixed by the court and, unless
otherwise specifically authorized by statute, shall not exceed $500.
(4) Reissuance of Uncashed Checks: Checks written by the State Treasurer and
not cashed within the statutory period may be presented to the State Treasurer for
reissuance in accordance with KRS 41.370.
(5) Police Officer, Firefighter, and Active Duty National Guard and Reserve
Survivor Benefits: Funds are appropriated for payment of benefits for survivors of state
and local police officers, firefighters, and active duty National Guard and Reserve
members in accordance with KRS 61.315 and for the cost of insurance premiums for
firefighters as provided in KRS 95A.070.
29. JUDGMENTS
(1) Payment of Judgments and Carry Forward of General Fund
Appropriation Balance: Pursuant to KRS 48.150 and notwithstanding KRS 45A.275,
the payment of judgments that exceed the above appropriation, as may be rendered
against the Commonwealth by courts and orders of the State Personnel Board and, where
applicable, shall be subject to KRS Chapter 45, and the payment of judgments, audit
adjustments, and excess billings to federal programs related to transfers from internal
service funds to the General Fund authorized in prior appropriations acts, are hereby
authorized. Funds required to pay the costs of items included in the Judgments budget
unit are appropriated, and any required expenditure over the above amounts is to be paid
Page 27 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
first from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700), if available, or from the
Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to the conditions and
procedures provided in this Act. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse
and shall carry forward.
30. KENTUCKY COMMUNICATIONS NETWORK AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 40,886,900 40,931,900
Restricted Funds 10,385,000 10,385,000
TOTAL 51,271,900 51,316,900
TOTAL - GENERAL GOVERNMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 31,299,900 28,709,600
General Fund 1,751,141,300 1,831,841,500
Restricted Funds 432,552,600 411,864,000
Federal Funds 861,773,200 710,866,600
TOTAL 3,076,767,000 2,983,281,700
B. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CABINET
Budget Unit
1. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 29,297,500 30,933,800
Restricted Funds 5,489,700 4,153,700
Federal Funds 436,000 401,000
TOTAL 35,223,200 35,488,500
(1) Funding for Commercialization and Innovation: Notwithstanding KRS
154.12-278, interest income earned on the balances in the High-Tech
Construction/Investment Pool and loan repayments received by the High-Tech
Page 28 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Construction/Investment Pool shall be used to support the Office of Entrepreneurship and
are appropriated in addition to amounts appropriated above.
(2) Lapse and Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance for
Bluegrass State Skills Corporation: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund
appropriation balance for Bluegrass State Skills Corporation training grants for fiscal
year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(3) Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding
KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation in fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year
2026-2027 to the Cabinet for Economic Development, Science and Technology Program,
shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(4) Executive Officers' Compensation: Notwithstanding KRS 154.10-050(2),
any additional executive officers as described in KRS 154.10-050(2) shall not be paid a
salary greater than the salary of the Governor of the Commonwealth.
(5) Training Grants: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$2,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation to make training
grants to support manufacturing-related investments. The Corporation shall utilize these
funds for a manufacturer designated by the United States Department of Commerce,
United States Census Bureau North American Industry Classification System code of
336111, 336112, 336120, or 336211 that employs at least 10,000 full-time persons at the
same facility or at multiple facilities located within the same county to help offset
associated costs of retraining its workforce.
(6) Kentucky Product Development Initiative Carry Forward of
Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229 and 154.21-020(1)(f), the
General Fund appropriation balance from 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part I, B., 1., (12) shall
not lapse and shall carry forward for future rounds of funding.
(7) KEDFA Forgivable Loan-Carry Forward of Appropriation Balance:
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation balance from 2022 Ky.
Page 29 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Acts ch. 199, Part I, B., 1., (11) shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
C. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Budget Units
1. SUPPORT EDUCATION EXCELLENCE IN KENTUCKY (SEEK)
PROGRAM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,759,644,300 3,756,331,600
(1) Common School Fund Earnings: Accumulated earnings for the Common
School Fund shall be transferred in each fiscal year to the SEEK Program.
(2) Allocation of SEEK Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 157.360(2)(c), the above
General Fund appropriation to the base SEEK Program is intended to provide a base
guarantee of $4,701 per student in average daily attendance in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$4,818 per student in average daily attendance in fiscal year 2027-2028, as well as to
meet the other requirements of KRS 157.360. Notwithstanding KRS 157.360(2), each
district’s base funding level shall be adjusted for the number of students demonstrating
limited proficiency in English language skills, multiplied by 0.096.
Funds appropriated to the SEEK Program shall be allotted to school districts in
accordance with KRS 157.310 to 157.440, except that the total of the funds allotted shall
not exceed the appropriation for this purpose, except as provided in this Act. The total
appropriation for the SEEK Program shall be measured by, or construed as, estimates of
the state expenditures required by KRS 157.310 to 157.440. If the required expenditures
exceed these estimates, the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon
the written request of the Commissioner of Education and with the approval of the
Governor, may increase the appropriation by such amount as may be available and
necessary to meet, to the extent possible, the required expenditures under the cited
sections of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, but any increase of the total appropriation to
the SEEK Program is subject to Part III, General Provisions, of this Act and KRS Chapter
Page 30 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
48. If funds appropriated to the SEEK Program are insufficient to provide the amount of
money required under KRS 157.310 to 157.440, allotments to local school districts may
be reduced in accordance with KRS 157.430.
(3) Base SEEK Allotments: Notwithstanding KRS 157.420(2), included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $2,101,969,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$2,120,831,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the base SEEK Program as defined by KRS
157.360. Funds appropriated to the SEEK Program shall be allotted to school districts in
accordance with KRS 157.310 to 157.440, except that the total of the funds allotted shall
not exceed the appropriation for this purpose, except as provided in this Act.
(4) Tier I Component: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$251,849,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $238,638,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the
Tier I component as established by KRS 157.440.
(5) Vocational Transportation: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $7,833,100 in each fiscal year for vocational transportation.
(6) Teachers' Retirement System Employer Match: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $529,410,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $541,260,000
in fiscal year 2027-2028 to enable local school districts to provide the employer match
for qualified employees.
(7) Salary Supplements for Nationally Certified Teachers: Notwithstanding
KRS 157.395, included in the above General Fund appropriation is $4,655,500 in each
fiscal year for the purpose of providing salary supplements for public school teachers
attaining certification by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards.
Notwithstanding KRS 157.395, if the appropriation is insufficient to provide the
mandated salary supplement for teachers who have obtained this certification, the
Department of Education is authorized to pro rata reduce the supplement.
(8) SEEK Adjustment Factors: Funds allocated for the SEEK base and its
adjustment factors that are not needed for the base or a particular adjustment factor may
Page 31 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
be allocated to other adjustment factors, if funds for that adjustment factor are not
sufficient.
(9) Facilities Support Program of Kentucky/Equalized Nickel Levies:
Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $137,176,700 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $126,577,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide facilities equalization funding
pursuant to KRS 157.440 and 157.620.
(10) Growth Levy Equalization Funding: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $51,931,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $44,166,600 in fiscal year
2027-2028 to provide facilities equalization funding pursuant to KRS 157.440 and
157.620 for districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(1) and (4).
Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(1)(b)2., a school district that imposes the levy authorized
by KRS 157.621(1)(b)1. shall be equalized for that levy, in addition to the equalization
funding appropriated in accordance with KRS 157.621(1)(b)2., and all funds for this
purpose shall be committed to debt service, new facilities, or major renovations in
accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that
any local school district receiving equalization under this subsection shall receive full
calculated equalization until the earlier of 20 years of the effective date of this Act, or the
date the bonds for the local school district supported by this equalization are retired, in
accordance with KRS 157.621(2).
(11) Retroactive Equalized Facility Funding: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $79,167,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $73,735,400 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 to provide equalized facility funding pursuant to KRS 157.440 and
157.620 to districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(2) and (4). In
addition, a local board of education that levied a tax rate subject to recall by January 1,
2014, in addition to the five cents levied pursuant to KRS 157.440(1)(b) and that
committed the receipts to debt service, new facilities, or major renovations of existing
facilities shall be eligible for equalization funds from the state at 150 percent of the
Page 32 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
statewide average per pupil assessment. Revenue to generate the five cent equivalent levy
may be obtained from levies on property, motor vehicles, or the taxes authorized by KRS
160.593, 160.597, 160.601 to 160.633, and 160.635 to 160.648 if the levy was dedicated
to facilities funding at the time of the levy. The equalization funds shall be used as
provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b). Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(2)(a) and (4), for the
2026-2028 fiscal biennium, school districts that levied the tax rate subject to recall prior
to January 15, 2024, shall be equalized at 100 percent of the calculated equalization
funding; school districts that levied the tax rate subject to recall on or after January 15,
2024, and before January 15, 2026, shall be equalized at 25 percent of the calculated
equalization funding; and all funds for this purpose shall be committed to debt service,
new facilities, or major renovations in accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). It is the
intent of the 2026 General Assembly that any local school district receiving partial
equalization under this subsection in the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium shall receive full
calculated equalization in the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium and thereafter, until the earlier
of 20 years of the effective date of this Act, or the date the bonds for the local school
district supported by this equalization are retired, in accordance with KRS 157.621(2).
(12) Equalized Facility Funding: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $17,355,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $16,106,400 in fiscal year
2027-2028 to provide equalized facility funding pursuant to KRS 157.440 and 157.620 to
districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(3) and (4). Notwithstanding
KRS 157.621(3)(c), a school district meeting the criteria of KRS 157.621(3)(a) and (b)
shall be equalized at 100 percent of the calculated equalization funding in each fiscal
year, and all funds for this purpose shall be committed to debt service, new facilities, or
major renovations in accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). In addition, notwithstanding
KRS 157.621(1) and (3), a school district that has levied a five-cent equivalent rate
authorized by KRS 157.621(1)(a) and is not receiving state equalization funding for that
levy under KRS 157.621(1)(b), or 157.621(3), or any other provision of this Act, shall be
Page 33 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
equalized at 100 percent of the calculated equalization funding in each fiscal year, and all
funds for this purpose shall be committed to debt service, new facilities, or major
renovations in accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). It is the intent of the 2026 General
Assembly that any local school district receiving equalization under this subsection shall
receive full calculated equalization until the earlier of 20 years of the effective date of
this Act, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this equalization
are retired, in accordance with KRS 157.621(3).
(13) BRAC Equalized Facility Funding: Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(1)(c)2.,
included in the above General Fund appropriation is $3,162,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027
and $2,749,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide equalized facility funding to school
districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(1)(c)1. pursuant to KRS
157.440 and 157.620.
(14) Equalization Funding for Critical Construction Needs Schools: Included
in the above General Fund appropriation is $10,136,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$9,781,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to school districts in accordance with KRS
157.621(5).
(15) Hold-Harmless Guarantee: A modified hold-harmless guarantee is
established in each fiscal year which provides that every local school district shall receive
at least the same amount of SEEK state funding per pupil as was received in fiscal year
1991-1992. If funds appropriated to the SEEK Program are insufficient to provide the
amount of money required under KRS 157.310 to 157.440, and allotments to local school
districts are reduced in accordance with KRS 157.430, allocations to school districts
subject to this provision shall not be reduced.
(16) Residential Youth-at-Risk Programs: In accordance with KRS 157.360, no
funds from the SEEK Program shall be distributed to the programs operated by the
Kentucky Guard Youth Challenge Division of the Department of Military Affairs.
Notwithstanding KRS 157.350, 157.360, 157.410, and any other statute to the contrary,
Page 34 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
any school district providing educational services to students enrolled in programs
operated by the Kentucky Guard Youth Challenge Division of the Department of Military
Affairs shall be paid for those services solely from the General Fund appropriation in Part
I, A., 6. of this Act, and students enrolled in such programs shall not be included in the
average daily attendance for purposes of SEEK Program funding.
(17) Salary Supplements for Certified Audiologists and Speech Language
Pathologists: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $2,312,000 in each
fiscal year for the purpose of providing a $2,000 salary supplement each year for full-
time public school Audiologists and Speech Language Pathologists that have active
Certificates of Clinical Competence, as offered by the American Speech-Language-
Hearing Association. Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, if the appropriation is
insufficient to provide all full-time public school American Speech-Language-Hearing
Association certified Audiologists and Speech Language Pathologists with the $2,000
stipend, then the Department of Education is authorized to pro rata reduce the
supplement.
(18) Full-Day Kindergarten: Notwithstanding KRS 157.320 or any other statute
or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Education shall count each kindergarten
pupil in full for that respective school year, for the purpose of determining SEEK funds
and any other state funding based in whole or in part on average daily attendance for the
district, except that a district shall receive an amount equal to one-half of the state portion
of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who
graduated early under the provisions of KRS 158.142.
(19) SEEK Transportation: Notwithstanding KRS 157.370 and 157.360(2)(c),
included in the above General Fund appropriation is $398,884,500 in each fiscal year to
support pupil transportation.
(20) School District Employee Salary Increase: Notwithstanding KRS 157.420,
during fiscal year 2026-2027, local school districts shall provide each eligible employee a
Page 35 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
salary or compensation increase of three percent. The salary increases in fiscal year 2026-
2027 for certified staff shall be in addition to the normal rank and step increase attained
by certified personnel employed by local school districts.
An eligible employee employed in a public school, shall receive a three percent
increase effective with the 2026-2027 school year. "Eligible employee" means a full-time
employee of the district on or before September 15 of each school year.
The salary supplement shall be considered in the calculation for contributions to the
Teachers’ Retirement System or the County Employees’ Retirement System.
A local board of education shall request reimbursement for these purposes from
funds appropriated for this purpose. The Department of Education shall develop policies
for the distribution of the reimbursements and to track the eligible employees and
reimbursement requests from districts.
(21) Star Academy: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support
a pilot program of Star Academy schools within existing public schools throughout the
state.
2. OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 64,912,600 66,972,500
Restricted Funds 6,568,500 6,044,900
Federal Funds 465,589,500 465,807,800
TOTAL 537,070,600 538,825,200
(1) Employment of Leadership Personnel: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.005 to
18A.200, the Kentucky Board of Education shall continue to have sole authority to
determine the employees of the Department of Education who are exempt from the
classified service and to set those employees’ compensation comparable to the
competitive market.
Page 36 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(2) Blind/Deaf Residential Travel Program: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $492,300 in each fiscal year for the Blind/Deaf Residential Travel
Program.
(3) School Food Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$3,584,000 in each fiscal year for the School Food Services Program.
(4) Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, and Cambridge
International Exams: Notwithstanding KRS 160.348(5), included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to pay the cost of Advanced
Placement, International Baccalaureate, and Cambridge International examinations for
those students who meet the eligibility requirements for free or reduced-price meals.
Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4) and KRS 160.348(5), included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $2,600,000 in each fiscal year to reduce the total cost of Advanced
Placement examinations for students who do not meet the eligibility requirements for free
or reduced-price meals.
3. LEARNING AND RESULTS SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,475,692,300 1,700,805,600
Restricted Funds 77,800,400 102,173,000
Federal Funds 619,900,700 619,729,900
TOTAL 2,173,393,400 2,422,708,500
(1) Pre-K for All: Notwithstanding KRS 42.205, included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $40,500,000 in sports wagering revenues from the
Kentucky Permanent Pension Fund in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the financing of
preschool education in local school districts for all four-year-old children.
(2) Kentucky Education Technology System: Notwithstanding KRS 157.650 to
157.665, the School for the Deaf and the School for the Blind shall be fully eligible,
along with local school districts, to participate in the Kentucky Education Technology
Page 37 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
System in a manner that takes into account the special needs of the students of these two
schools.
(3) Family Resource and Youth Services Centers: Funds appropriated to
establish and support Family Resource and Youth Services Centers shall be transferred in
each fiscal year to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services consistent with KRS
156.496. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services is authorized to use, for
administrative purposes, no more than three percent of the total funds transferred from
the Department of Education for the Family Resource and Youth Services Centers. If a
certified person is employed as a director or coordinator of a Family Resource and Youth
Services Center, that person shall retain his or her status as a certified employee of the
school district.
(4) Health Insurance: Notwithstanding KRS 42.205, included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $52,500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $32,271,000
in fiscal year 2027-2028 in sports wagering revenues from the Kentucky Permanent
Pension Fund for local school district employer contributions for health insurance and the
contribution to the health reimbursement account for employees waiving coverage.
Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,024,321,500 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $1,245,552,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for employer contributions for health
insurance and the contribution to the health reimbursement account for employees
waiving coverage. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, General Fund in the amount of
$98,310,700 in fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into fiscal
year 2026-2027.
(5) Program Flexibility: Notwithstanding KRS 158.070(8) and 158.446, local
school districts shall be provided additional flexibility in the utilization of funds for
Extended School Services and Safe Schools. Local school districts shall continue to
address the governing statutes and serve the intended student population but may utilize
funds from these programs for general operating expenses in each year of the fiscal
Page 38 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
biennium. Local school districts that utilize these funds for general operating expenses
shall report to the Kentucky Department of Education and the Interim Joint Committee
on Education the amount of funding from each program utilized for general operating
expenses.
(6) Center for School Safety: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $15,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Center for School Safety. Notwithstanding KRS
158.446, the Center for School Safety shall develop and implement allotment policies for
all moneys received for the purposes of KRS 158.440, 158.441, 158.4415, 158.4416,
158.442, 158.445, and 158.446, except that no more than $1,500,000 in each fiscal year
may be retained for administrative purposes.
(7) Allocations to School-Based Decision Making Councils: Notwithstanding
KRS 160.345(8), for each fiscal year, a local board of education may reduce the
allocations to individual schools within the district as outlined in 702 KAR 3:246, secs. 6,
7, and 8. The allocation under 702 KAR 3:246, sec. 6, shall not be less than $100 per
pupil in average daily attendance.
(8) Kentucky School for the Blind and Kentucky School for the Deaf:
Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $9,277,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027
and $9,505,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Kentucky School for the Blind and
$11,831,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $12,125,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the
Kentucky School for the Deaf.
(9) Career and Technical Education: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $130,207,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $131,292,400 in fiscal year
2027-2028 for career and technical education. The Department of Education shall classify
each comprehensive high school with five or more career and technical education
program areas as a local area vocational education center and shall also include any
comprehensive high school with fewer than five career and technical education programs
and all state-operated area technology centers in the supplemental funding.
Page 39 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(10) Advisory Council for Gifted and Talented Education: Notwithstanding
KRS 158.648(1), a member of the State Advisory Council for Gifted and Talented
Education may be reappointed but shall not serve more than six consecutive terms.
Notwithstanding KRS 158.648(1), a member of the Kentucky Association for Gifted
Education shall be a voting member of the State Advisory Council for Gifted and
Talented Education.
(11) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 156.095, 156.553,
156.555, 157.390, 158.070, 158.770, 158.775, 158.805, 161.027 to 161.030, 161.165, and
161.167, no General Fund is provided for the Professional Development Program, the
Commonwealth School Improvement Fund, the Leadership and Mentor Fund, the Middle
School Academic Center, the Teacher’s Professional Growth Fund, the Teacher
Academies Program, the Writing Program, the Kentucky Principal Internship Program,
the Kentucky Teacher Internship Program, and the Kentucky Academy for Equity in
Teaching in order to increase funding for school-based mental health services providers.
(12) Learning and Results Services Programs: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation are the following allocations for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, but
no portion of these funds shall be utilized for state-level administrative purposes:
(a) $1,900,000 in each fiscal year for AdvanceKentucky;
(b) $1,850,000 in each fiscal year for the Community Education Program;
(c) $23,916,300 in each fiscal year for the Extended School Services Program;
(d) $48,660,500 in each fiscal year for the Family Resource and Youth Services
Centers Program;
(e) $10,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Gifted and Talented Program;
(f) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the Hearing and Speech Center;
(g) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the Heuser Hearing and Language Academy;
(h) Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), $1,675,500 in each fiscal year for the
Jobs for America’s Graduates Program;
Page 40 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(i) $500,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Alliance of Boys & Girls Clubs;
(j) $12,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Educational Collaborative
for State Agency Children;
(k) $1,391,000 in each fiscal year for Local School District Life Insurance;
(l) $5,019,000 in each fiscal year for the Mathematics Achievement Fund;
(m) $84,481,100 in each fiscal year for the Preschool Program;
(n) $15,936,600 in each fiscal year for the Read to Achieve Program;
(o) 11,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Read to Succeed Program;
(p) $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for Save the Children;
(q) $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for the Statewide Reading Research Center;
(r) $700,000 in each fiscal year for Teach for America;
(s) $500,000 in each fiscal year for the Visually Impaired Preschool Services
Program;
(t) $1,500,000 in each fiscal year for a vendor to provide online computer science
courses; and
(u) $5,000,000 in each fiscal year for Numeracy Counts.
(13) U.S. Army Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps Pilot Program
Consultants: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $654,500 in each
fiscal year to support U.S. Army Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps pilot program
consultants.
(14) School Resource Officers: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $18,000,000 in each fiscal year to the Department of Education to assist local districts
in funding salaries for school resource officers, as defined in KRS 158.441, on a
reimbursement basis. The Department of Education shall reimburse local school districts
up to $20,000 for each campus employing at least one on-sight full-time certified
resource officer.
(15) Licensure Operations: Notwithstanding KRS 65A.020(5)(a), $1,000,000
Page 41 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
may be used in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the operations of the Department.
TOTAL - DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,300,249,200 5,524,109,700
Restricted Funds 84,368,900 108,217,900
Federal Funds 1,085,490,200 1,085,537,700
TOTAL 6,470,108,300 6,717,865,300
D. EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 1,200,000 1,200,000
General Fund 13,936,000 14,018,500
Restricted Funds 23,633,000 24,005,900
Federal Funds 5,630,400 5,664,600
TOTAL 44,399,400 44,889,000
(1) Early Childhood Development: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for the Early Childhood
Advisory Council.
(2) Governor's Scholars Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Governor's Scholars Program.
(3) Governor's School for Entrepreneurs: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Governor's School for
Entrepreneurs.
(4) The Hope Center: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$100,000 in each fiscal year for the Hope Center.
(5) Kentucky Adult Learner Program: Included in the above General Fund
Page 42 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Adult Learner Program.
The purpose of the program is to provide adults 18 years of age or older who have not
graduated high school the opportunity to earn a high school diploma. The Education and
Labor Cabinet (ELC) and the Kentucky Department of Education shall authorize a single
eligible entity to operate the program for not more than 350 adult learners. The eligible
entity shall be a Kentucky-based non-profit organization, agree to commit at least
$1,000,000 to the program, and staff the program with certified teachers teaching core
academic subjects.
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the Kentucky Adult Learner Program
shall have authorization to issue a Kentucky high school diploma to an adult learner
participant if all of the minimum graduation requirements under Kentucky law are met.
The Kentucky Board of Education and the ELC shall develop metrics that will
appropriately assess the expected performance outcomes of the program.
(6) Heuser Hearing Institute: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Heuser Hearing Institute to develop a program to
close the education and achievement gaps for deaf and hard-of-hearing individuals.
2. PROPRIETARY EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 542,300 547,300
3. DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 992,900 1,018,100
Restricted Funds 1,331,900 1,334,500
TOTAL 2,324,800 2,352,600
4. KENTUCKY EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 17,425,000 17,771,600
Page 43 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 2,037,000 2,037,000
TOTAL 19,462,000 19,808,600
5. ENVIRONMENTAL EDUCATION COUNCIL
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 536,300 543,200
Federal Funds 429,800 429,800
TOTAL 966,100 973,000
(1) Environmental Education Council: Notwithstanding KRS 224.43-
505(2)(b), the Council may use interest received to support the operations of the Council.
6. LIBRARIES AND ARCHIVES
a. General Operations
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,739,400 6,372,600
Restricted Funds 2,993,700 2,483,800
Federal Funds 3,029,100 3,061,800
TOTAL 11,762,200 11,918,200
b. Direct Local Aid
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,554,700 5,554,700
Restricted Funds 1,046,900 1,046,900
TOTAL 6,601,600 6,601,600
(1) Public Libraries Facilities Construction: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $3,054,700 in each fiscal year for the Public Libraries Facilities
Construction Fund.
(2) Dolly Parton's Imagination Library: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Imagination Library of Kentucky
Program.
Page 44 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(3) Per Capita Grants: Notwithstanding KRS 171.201, no General Fund is
provided for nonconstruction state aid.
TOTAL - LIBRARIES AND ARCHIVES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 11,294,100 11,927,300
Restricted Funds 4,040,600 3,530,700
Federal Funds 3,029,100 3,061,800
TOTAL 18,363,800 18,519,800
7. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 41,953,900 42,036,800
Restricted Funds 12,767,500 12,866,800
Federal Funds 479,094,700 480,563,100
TOTAL 533,816,100 535,466,700
(1) Cafeteria Service Contracts: No state agency shall enter into any contract
with a nongovernmental entity for the operation of food services provided in the
cafeterias located in the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet office building and/or the
Cabinet for Human Resources office building in Frankfort unless the Office of
Vocational Rehabilitation has declined in writing to provide such services.
(2) Sale of Properties: Notwithstanding KRS 45A.045(4), the Finance and
Administration Cabinet may sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of properties used by the
Education and Labor Cabinet at a selling price that is below the appraised value.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.777, up to $1,465,712 of proceeds from the disposal of the
above-mentioned properties shall be used to reduce the Wagner-Peyser deficit.
8. WORKPLACE STANDARDS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,677,500 1,713,600
Page 45 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 8,740,800 8,890,500
Federal Funds 4,181,500 4,273,000
TOTAL 14,599,800 14,877,100
9. WORKERS’ CLAIMS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 62,584,400 62,967,500
10. OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH REVIEW COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 807,800 819,300
11. WORKERS’ COMPENSATION FUNDING COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 88,372,400 89,074,400
12. WORKERS’ COMPENSATION NOMINATING COMMITTEE
2026-27 2027-2/8
Restricted Funds 1,100 1,100
13. DISABILITY DETERMINATIONS
Restricted Funds 848,600 858,100
Federal Funds 66,308,700 67,256,300
TOTAL 67,157,300 68,114,400
TOTAL – EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 1,200,000 1,200,000
General Fund 87,279,400 88,485,900
Restricted Funds 206,243,700 207,476,300
Federal Funds 558,674,200 561,248,600
TOTAL 853,397,300 858,410,800
E. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
Page 46 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Budget Units
1. SECRETARY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 4,232,600 4,323,700
Restricted Funds 4,951,600 4,981,900
Federal Funds 1,276,900 1,306,900
TOTAL 10,461,100 10,612,500
2. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,970,800 6,115,500
Restricted Funds 6,351,700 6,507,600
Federal Funds 3,676,700 3,733,300
TOTAL 15,999,200 16,356,400
3. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 28,668,700 29,724,600
Restricted Funds 87,423,100 87,735,300
Federal Funds 39,210,000 39,766,600
TOTAL 155,301,800 157,226,500
4. NATURAL RESOURCES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 3,000,000 3,000,000
General Fund 39,018,500 40,467,100
Restricted Funds 24,371,900 24,212,300
Federal Funds 175,635,400 176,186,800
TOTAL 242,025,800 243,866,200
(1) Emergency Forest Fire Suppression: Not less than $2,500,000 of the above
Page 47 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
General Fund appropriation in each fiscal year shall be set aside for emergency forest fire
suppression. Any portion of the $2,500,000 not expended for emergency forest fire
suppression shall lapse to the General Fund at the end of each fiscal year. There is
appropriated from the General Fund the necessary funds, subject to the conditions and
procedures provided in this Act, which are required as a result of emergency fire
suppression activities in excess of $2,500,000 in each fiscal year. Fire suppression costs
in excess of $2,500,000 annually shall be deemed necessary government expenses and
shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(2) Environmental Stewardship Program: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Environmental
Stewardship Program.
(3) Conservation District Local Aid: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Division of
Conservation to provide direct aid to local conservation districts.
5. ENERGY POLICY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,571,800 1,579,300
Restricted Funds 621,300 621,500
Federal Funds 62,539,100 62,553,800
TOTAL 64,732,200 64,754,600
6. KENTUCKY NATURE PRESERVES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,634,400 1,667,800
Restricted Funds 2,654,800 2,680,300
Federal Funds 275,100 278,200
TOTAL 4,564,300 4,626,300
Page 48 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
7. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 13,728,600 13,992,500
Restricted Funds 3,040,300 3,041,900
Federal Funds 1,085,400 1,097,000
TOTAL 17,854,300 18,131,400
TOTAL – ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 3,000,000 3,000,000
General Fund 94,825,400 97,870,500
Restricted Funds 129,414,700 129,780,800
Federal Funds 283,698,600 284,922,600
TOTAL 510,938,700 515,573,900
F. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 4,645,500 8,051,500
Restricted Funds 46,610,400 43,823,700
TOTAL 51,255,900 51,875,200
2. CONTROLLER
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 4,272,200 5,653,700
Restricted Funds 21,101,900 20,003,800
TOTAL 25,374,100 25,657,500
(1) Social Security Contingent Liability Fund: Any expenditures that may be
required by KRS 61.470 are hereby deemed necessary government expenses and shall be
Page 49 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700), if available, or from any
available balance in the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to
the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
(2) Controller Operations: Notwithstanding KRS 61.470, included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriations is $560,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $140,000 in
fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the operations of the Office of the Controller.
3. DEBT SERVICE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 14,100,200 13,880,800
General Fund 608,316,400 834,836,400
TOTAL 622,416,600 848,717,200
(1) Kentucky State Police Two-Way Radio Debt Service: Pursuant to KRS
150.021(2), the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall transfer $599,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $599,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to partially support debt service on the Kentucky State Police
Two-Way Radio System project.
(2) Use of Restricted Funds for Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS
218B.080(3), $12,000,000 in each fiscal year; notwithstanding KRS 286.1-485(3),
$9,000,000 in each fiscal year; notwithstanding KRS 42.4582, $6,500,000 in each fiscal
year; notwithstanding KRS 243.025(3), $6,000,000 in each fiscal year; and
notwithstanding KRS 14.140, $5,000,000 in each fiscal year, are hereby transferred to the
Debt Service Fund to be used to pay debt service on General Fund supported bonds
previously issued by the Commonwealth.
(3) Debt Service: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$54,595,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $122,418,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for new
debt service to support new bonds as set forth in Part II, Capital Projects Budget, of this
act.
Page 50 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(4) Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding
KRS 45.229 and 48.720, General Fund in the amount of $18,500,000 in fiscal year 2025-
2026 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into fiscal year 2026-2027.
4. FACILITIES AND SUPPORT SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 9,157,900 9,339,600
Restricted Funds 59,857,700 60,973,000
TOTAL 69,015,600 70,312,600
5. COUNTY COSTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 29,243,500 29,243,500
Restricted Funds 1,702,500 1,702,500
TOTAL 30,946,000 30,946,000
(1) County Costs: Funds required to pay county costs are appropriated and
additional funds may be allotted from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700)
or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) by the Secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet, subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this
Act.
(2) Reimbursement to Sheriffs’ Offices for Court Security Services:
Notwithstanding KRS 64.092(6), the sheriff or other law enforcement officer serving a
Circuit or District Court shall be compensated at the rate of $15 per hour of service.
6. COMMONWEALTH OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 145,221,300 147,033,500
Federal Funds 1,716,600 1,716,600
TOTAL 146,937,900 148,750,100
(1) Computer Services Fund Receipts: The Secretary of the Finance and
Page 51 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Administration Cabinet shall provide a listing of fee receipts from the Executive, Judicial,
and Legislative Branches of government itemized by appropriation units, cost allocation
methodology, and a report detailing the rebate of excess fee receipts to the agencies to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by August 1 of each fiscal year.
7. REVENUE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 250,000 250,000
General Fund 119,523,000 121,576,600
Restricted Funds 12,448,900 12,448,900
Federal Funds 50,000 50,000
TOTAL 132,271,900 134,325,500
(1) Operations of Revenue: Notwithstanding KRS 132.672, 134.552(2),
136.652, and 365.390(2), funds may be expended in support of the operations of the
Department of Revenue.
(2) State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of
$250,000 of the Tobacco Settlement payments received in each fiscal year is appropriated
to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue for the state’s
diligent enforcement of noncompliant nonparticipating manufacturers.
8. PROPERTY VALUATION ADMINISTRATORS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 65,542,000 67,216,000
Restricted Funds 4,786,800 4,786,800
TOTAL 70,328,800 72,002,800
(1) Management of Expenditures: Notwithstanding KRS 132.590 and 132.597,
the property valuation administrators are authorized to take necessary actions to manage
expenditures within the appropriated amounts contained in this Act.
(2) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 132.590(3)(b) and in lieu of
Page 52 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
providing an annual CPI increase and January 1 effective date, the salary increment
provided on the base salary or wages of each property valuation administrator shall be the
same amount and shall be effective on the same date that is provided for eligible state
employees in Part IV of this Act. The placement and advancement on the proper step of
the salary schedule for property valuation administrators as set forth in KRS 132.590(2)
shall continue to apply.
TOTAL - FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 14,350,200 14,130,800
General Fund 840,700,500 1,075,917,300
Restricted Funds 291,729,500 290,772,200
Federal Funds 1,766,600 1,766,600
TOTAL 1,148,546,800 1,382,586,900
G. HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 13,851,500 14,043,900
Restricted Funds 78,685,800 79,874,900
Federal Funds 68,448,600 69,010,700
TOTAL 160,985,900 162,929,500
(1) Human Service Transportation Delivery: Notwithstanding KRS
281.010(27), the Kentucky Works Program shall not participate in the Human Service
Transportation Delivery Program or the Coordinated Transportation Advisory
Committee.
(2) Special Olympics: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$150,000 in each fiscal year to support the operations of Special Olympics Kentucky.
Page 53 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
2. MEDICAID SERVICES
a. Medicaid Administration
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 82,956,700 76,443,600
Restricted Funds 35,516,200 35,133,700
Federal Funds 241,290,600 224,326,100
TOTAL 359,763,500 335,903,400
(1) Transfer of Excess Administrative Funds for Medicaid Benefits: If any
portion of the above General Fund appropriation in either fiscal year is deemed to be in
excess of the necessary expenses for administration of the Department, the amount may
be used for Medicaid Benefits in accordance with statutes governing the functions and
activities of the Department for Medicaid Services.
Any transfer authorized under this subsection shall be approved by the Secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon recommendation of the State Budget
Director.
(2) Medicaid Service Category Expenditure Information: No Medicaid
managed care contract shall be valid and no payment to a Medicaid managed care vendor
by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
shall be made, unless the Medicaid managed care contract contains a provision that the
contractor shall collect Medicaid expenditure data by the categories of services paid for
by the Medicaid Program. Actual statewide Medicaid expenditure data by all categories
of Medicaid services, including mandated and optional Medicaid services, special
expenditures/offsets, and Disproportionate Share Hospital payments by type of hospital,
shall be compiled by the Department for Medicaid Services for all Medicaid providers
and forwarded to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on a
quarterly basis. Projections of Medicaid expenditures by categories of Medicaid services
shall be provided to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue upon
Page 54 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
request.
(3) H.R. 1 Immediate Needs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $8,137,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,532,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
immediate needs due to the passage of House Resolution 1 of the 119th Congress.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation balance for H.R. 1
Immediate Needs for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and carry forward.
b. Medicaid Benefits
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 2,707,534,600 3,430,313,300
Restricted Funds 55,983,800 2,502,012,600 2,088,385,200
Federal Funds -0- 16,980,087,400 18,073,444,600
TOTAL 55,983,800 22,189,634,600 23,592,143,100
(1) Transfer of Medicaid Benefits Funds: Any portion of the General Fund
appropriation in either fiscal year that is deemed to be necessary for the administration of
the Medicaid Program may be transferred from the Medicaid Benefits budget unit to the
Medicaid Administration budget unit in accordance with statutes governing the functions
and activities of the Department for Medicaid Services. The Secretary shall recommend
any proposed transfer to the State Budget Director for approval prior to transfer. Such
action shall be reported by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(2) Intergovernmental Transfers (IGTs): Any funds received through an
Intergovernmental Transfer (IGT) agreement between the Department for Medicaid
Services and other governmental entities, in accordance with a federally approved State
Plan amendment, shall be used to provide for the health and welfare of the citizens of the
Commonwealth through the provision of Medicaid Benefits. Revenues from IGTs are
contingent upon agreement by the parties, including but not limited to the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, Department for Medicaid Services, and the appropriate
Page 55 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
providers. The Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall make the
appropriate interim appropriations increase requests pursuant to KRS 48.630.
(3) Medicaid Benefits Budget Deficit: If Medicaid Benefits expenditures are
projected to exceed available funds, the Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services may recommend and implement that reimbursement rates, optional services,
eligibles, or programs be reduced or maintained at levels existing at the time of the
projected deficit in order to avoid a budget deficit. The projected deficit shall be
confirmed and approved by the Office of State Budget Director. No rate, service, eligible,
or program reductions shall be implemented by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services without written notice of such action to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the State Budget Director. Such actions taken by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be reported, upon request, at the next
meeting of the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(4) Kentucky Access Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 304.17B-021, funds are
transferred from this source to Medicaid Benefits in each fiscal year.
(5) Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH) Program: Hospitals shall report
the uncompensated care for which, under federal law, the hospital is eligible to receive
disproportionate share payments. Disproportionate share payments shall equal the
maximum amounts established under federal law.
(6) Hospital Indigent Patient Billing: Hospitals shall not bill patients for
services if the services have been reported to the Cabinet and the hospital has received
disproportionate share payments for the specific services.
(7) Provider Tax Information: Any provider who posts a sign or includes
information on customer receipts or any material distributed for public consumption
indicating that it has paid provider tax shall also post, in the same size typeset as the
provider tax information, the amount of payment received from the Department for
Medicaid Services during the same period the provider tax was paid. Providers who fail
Page 56 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
to meet this requirement shall be excluded from the Disproportionate Share Hospital and
Medicaid Programs. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall include this
provision in facilities' annual licensure inspections.
(8) Medicaid Budget Analysis Reports: The Department for Medicaid Services
shall submit a quarterly budget analysis report to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue no later than 75 days after the quarter's end. The report shall
provide monthly detail of actual expenditures, eligibles, and average monthly cost per
eligible by eligibility category along with current trailing 12-month averages for each of
these figures. The report shall also provide actual figures for all categories of noneligible-
specific expenditures such as Supplemental Medical Insurance premiums, Kentucky
Patient Access to Care, nonemergency transportation, drug rebates, cost settlements, and
Disproportionate Share Hospital payments by type of hospital. The report shall compare
the actual expenditure experience with those underlying the enacted or revised enacted
budget and explain any significant variances which may occur.
(9) Medicaid Managed Care Organization Reporting: Except as provided by
KRS 61.878, all records and correspondence relating to Kentucky Medicaid, revenues
derived from Kentucky Medicaid funds, and expenditures utilizing Kentucky Medicaid
funds of a Medicaid managed care company operating within the Commonwealth shall be
subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884. All records and
correspondence relating to Medicaid specifically prohibited from disclosure by the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act privacy rules shall not be
provided under this Act.
No later than 60 days after the end of a quarter, each Medicaid managed care
company operating within the Commonwealth shall prepare and submit to the
Department for Medicaid Services sufficient information to allow the department to meet
the following requirements 90 days after the end of the quarter. The Department shall
forward to the Legislative Research Commission Budget Review Office a quarterly
Page 57 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
report detailing monthly actual expenditures by service category, monthly eligibles, and
average monthly cost per eligible for Medicaid and the Kentucky Children's Health
Insurance Program (KCHIP) along with current trailing 12-month averages for each of
these figures. The report shall also provide actual figures for other categories such as
pharmacy rebates and reinsurance. Finally, the Department shall include in this report the
most recent information or report available regarding the amount withheld to meet
Department of Insurance reserve requirements, and any distribution of moneys received
or retained in excess of these reserve requirements.
(10) Critical Access Hospitals: Beginning with the effective date of this Act
through June 30, 2028, no acute care hospital shall convert to a critical access hospital
unless the hospital has either received funding for a feasibility study from the Kentucky
State Office of Rural Health or filed a written request by January 1, 2026, with the
Kentucky State Office of Rural Health requesting funding for conducting a feasibility
study.
(11) Appeals: An appeal from denial of a service or services provided by a
Medicaid managed care organization for medical necessity, or denial, limitation, or
termination of a health care service in a case involving a medical or surgical specialty or
subspecialty, shall, upon request of the recipient, authorized person, or provider, include
a review by a board-eligible or board-certified physician in the appropriate specialty or
subspecialty area; except in the case of a health care service rendered by a chiropractor or
optometrist, for which the denial shall be made respectively by a chiropractor or
optometrist duly licensed in Kentucky as specified in KRS 304.17A-607(1)(b). The
physician reviewer shall not have participated in the initial review and denial of service
and shall not be the provider of the service or services under consideration in the appeal.
(12) Supports for Community Living Waiver Program Rates: If the Supports
for Community Living Waiver Program experiences a material change in funding based
upon a new or amended waiver that is approved by the Centers for Medicare and
Page 58 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Medicaid Services, the Department for Medicaid Services may adjust the upper payment
limit amount for a Supports for Community Living Waiver Program service as long as
the upper payment limit for each service is not less than the upper payment limit in effect
on January 1, 2020.
(13) Use of Restricted Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $350,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to
support the Medicaid Benefits program.
(14) Medicaid Prescription Benefits Reporting: Notwithstanding KRS 205.647,
the Department for Medicaid Services shall submit a report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by December 1 of each fiscal year on the
dispensing of prescription medications to persons eligible under KRS 205.560. The report
shall include:
(a) The total Medicaid dollars paid to the state pharmacy benefit manager by a
managed care organization;
(b) The total amount of Medicaid dollars paid to the state pharmacy benefit
manager by a managed care organization which were not subsequently paid to a
pharmacy licensed in Kentucky;
(c) The average reimbursement by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any
other fee paid by the state pharmacy benefit manager to licensed pharmacies with which
the state pharmacy benefit manager shares common ownership, management, or control;
or which are owned, managed, or controlled by any of the state pharmacy benefit
manager's management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held
companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding
company; or which share any common members on the board of directors; or which share
managers in common;
(d) The average reimbursement by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, or any
other fee paid by the state pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies licensed in Kentucky
Page 59 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
which operate 10 locations, 10 or fewer locations, or 10 or more locations; and
(e) All common ownership, management, common members of a board of
directors, shared managers, or control of the state pharmacy benefit manager, or any of
the state pharmacy benefit manager's management companies, parent companies,
subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a
common owner, manager, or holding company with any managed care organization
contracted to administer Kentucky Medicaid benefits, any entity which contracts on
behalf of a pharmacy, or any pharmacy services administration organization, or any
common ownership management, common members of a board of directors, shared
managers, or control of a pharmacy services administration organization that is
contracted with the state pharmacy benefit manager, with any drug wholesaler or
distributor or any of the pharmacy services administration organizations, management
companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or
companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, common members of a board of
directors, manager, or holding company.
(15) Michelle P. Waiver Slots: Included in the above appropriation is $7,766,200
in General Fund appropriation and $19,533,800 in Federal Funds in each fiscal year to
support 500 additional slots.
(16) Supports for community Living Waiver Slots: Included in the above
appropriation is $8,143,100 in General Fund appropriation and $20,481,900 in Federal
Funds in each fiscal year to support 250 additional slots.
(17) Home and Community Based Waiver Slots: Included in the above
appropriation is $5,789,100 in General Fund appropriation and $14,560,800 in Federal
Funds in each fiscal year to support 500 additional slots.
TOTAL - MEDICAID SERVICES
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 2,790,491,300 3,506,756,900
Page 60 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 55,983,800 2,537,528,800 2,123,518,900
Federal Funds -0- 17,221,378,000 18,297,770,700
TOTAL 55,983,800 22,549,398,100 23,928,046,500
3. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH, DEVELOPMENTAL AND INTELLECTUAL
DISABILITIES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 1,258,900 249,300
General Fund 202,555,100 203,500,200
Restricted Funds 268,103,900 269,350,900
Federal Funds 98,751,200 98,921,400
TOTAL 570,669,100 572,021,800
(1) Disproportionate Share Hospital Funds: Pursuant to KRS 205.640(3)(a)2.,
mental health disproportionate share funds are budgeted at the maximum amounts
permitted by Section 1923(h) of the Social Security Act. Upon publication in the Federal
Register of the Annual Institutions for Mental Disease (IMD) Disproportionate Share
Hospital (DSH) limit, 92.3 percent of the federal IMD DSH limit goes to the state-
operated mental hospitals. If there are remaining funds within the psychiatric pool after
all private psychiatric hospitals reach their hospital-specific DSH limit, state mental
hospitals may exceed the 92.3 percent limit but may not exceed their hospital-specific
DSH limit.
(2) Lease Payments for Eastern State Hospital: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $9,807,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $9,808,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 to make lease payments to the Lexington-Fayette Urban County Government
to retire its debt for the construction of the new facility.
(3) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $1,258,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $249,300 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 for substance abuse prevention and treatment for pregnant women with a history of
Page 61 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
substance abuse problems. Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$1,050,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from interest income from the Early Childhood
Development Fund for substance abuse prevention and treatment for pregnant women
with a history of substance abuse problems.
(4) The Healing Place: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$900,000 in each fiscal year to support direct services to clients provided by The Healing
Place.
(5) Appalachian Regional Hospital: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $14,600,000 in each fiscal year to support contracted inpatient
psychiatric services provided within Hospital District IV under KRS 210.300. The
Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide a report on total
expenditures by fund source and program area for fiscal year 2026-2027 and estimated
funding required for a continuation of services in fiscal year 2027-2028 to the Interim
Joint Committees on Health Services and Appropriations and Revenue by September 1,
2027.
4. PUBLIC HEALTH
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 10,691,000 9,880,000
General Fund 98,735,100 100,208,200
Restricted Funds 148,707,500 151,838,100
Federal Funds 510,150,900 499,317,300
TOTAL 768,284,500 761,243,600
(1) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $5,980,000 in each fiscal year for the Health Access Nurturing
Development Services (HANDS) Program, $700,000 in each fiscal year for the Healthy
Start initiatives, $700,000 in each fiscal year for Early Childhood Mental Health,
$700,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 for Early Childhood Oral Health, $500,000 in each
Page 62 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
fiscal year for the Lung Cancer Screening Program, and $2,111,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Smoking Cessation. Included in the
above Restricted Funds appropriation is $700,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from interest
income from the Kentucky Healthcare Improvement Fund for Early Childhood Oral
Health.
(2) Local and District Health Department Fees: Local and district health
departments shall retain 90 percent of the fees collected for delivering foundational
public health program services to fund the costs of operations, services, and the employer
contributions for the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.
(3) Kentucky Poison Control Center: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $750,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Poison Control Center.
(4) Kentucky Colon Cancer Screening Program: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $500,000 in each fiscal year to support the Kentucky
Colon Cancer Screening Program.
(5) Kentucky Pediatric Cancer Research Trust Fund: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $7,500,000 in each fiscal year to the Kentucky Pediatric
Cancer Research Trust Fund for general pediatric cancer research and support of
expansion of clinical trials at the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville.
(6) Public Health Transformation: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $24,982,500 in each fiscal year to support the costs of workforce and
operations for the local health departments.
(7) Nursing Student Loan Forgiveness: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $12,500,000 in each fiscal year for a nursing student loan forgiveness
program.
(8) Rural Health Transformation Fund: Included in the above Federal Funds
appropriation is $212,905,600 in each fiscal year from the Rural Health Transformation
Fund.
Page 63 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
5. FAMILY RESOURCE CENTERS AND VOLUNTEER SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 26,512,200 26,555,700
Federal Funds 12,568,000 12,577,800
TOTAL 39,080,200 39,133,500
(1) Family Resource and Youth Services Centers Funds: No more than three
percent of the total funds transferred from the Department of Education to the Family
Resource and Youth Services Centers, as consistent with KRS 156.496, shall be used for
administrative purposes in each fiscal year.
6. COMMUNITY BASED SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 11,500,000 11,500,000
General Fund 779,735,600 805,672,000
Restricted Funds 170,997,300 171,270,600
Federal Funds 934,453,100 921,840,800
TOTAL 1,896,686,000 1,910,283,400
(1) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $9,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Early Childhood Development
Program and $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Early Childhood Adoption and Foster
Care Supports Program.
(2) Fostering Success: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$500,000 in each fiscal year to support the Fostering Success Program.
(3) Family Scholar House: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support the operations of the Family Scholar House.
(4) Seven Counties Services - Family Recovery Court: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $375,000 in each fiscal year to support the operations of
the Seven Counties Services through the Jefferson County Family Recovery Court to
Page 64 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
assist families involved with the child welfare system.
(5) Maryhurst: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $575,000 in
each fiscal year to provide a reimbursement rate increase for children in the 5 Specialized
Programs.
(6) Volunteers of America - Family Recovery Court: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $500,000 in each fiscal year to support the operations of
the Volunteers of America - Family Recovery Court.
(7) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) Payment Error
Rate: Any federally required state share of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits resulting from a payment error rate that is higher than six percent shall be
deemed necessary government expenses and shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus
Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(8) Relative and Fictive Kin: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $14,600,000 in each fiscal year to fully implement 2024 Regular Session SB 151 as
codified at KRS 620.142.
(9) Domestic Violence Programs: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is an additional $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for ZeroV’s domestic
violence shelter programs.
7. AGING AND INDEPENDENT LIVING
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 58,026,100 58,202,400
Restricted Funds 4,122,300 4,122,300
Federal Funds 38,575,700 38,625,600
TOTAL 100,724,100 100,950,300
(1) Local Match Requirements: Notwithstanding KRS 205.460, entities
contracting with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide essential services
under KRS 205.455 and 205.460 shall provide local match equal to or greater than the
Page 65 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
amount in effect during fiscal year 2021-2022. Local match may include any combination
of materials, commodities, transportation, office space, personal services, or other types
of facility services or funds. The Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
shall prescribe the procedures to certify the local match compliance.
(2) Senior Meals: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$19,100,000 in each fiscal year to provide meals to senior citizens with the goal of no
wait list.
TOTAL - HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 23,449,900 21,629,300
General Fund -0- 3,969,906,900 4,714,939,300
Restricted Funds 55,983,800 3,208,145,600 2,799,975,700
Federal Funds -0- 18,884,325,500 19,938,064,300
TOTAL 55,983,800 26,085,827,900 27,474,608,600
H. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
Budget Units
1. JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 3,250,000 3,250,000
General Fund 44,411,500 46,450,600
Restricted Funds 3,309,100 3,122,300
Federal Funds 34,895,200 34,883,700
TOTAL 85,865,800 87,706,600
(1) Operation UNITE: (a) Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $1,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Operation UNITE Program.
(b) For the periods ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the Secretary of the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, in coordination with the Chief Executive Officer of
Page 66 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Operation UNITE, shall prepare reports detailing for what purpose and function the funds
were utilized. The reports shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue by September 1 of each fiscal year.
(2) Office of Drug Control Policy: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $3,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Office of Drug Control
Policy.
(3) Access to Justice: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$500,000 in each fiscal year to support the Access to Justice Program.
(4) Court Appointed Special Advocate Funding: (a) Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $3,000,000 in each fiscal year for grants to support Court
Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) funding programs.
(b) No administrative costs shall be paid from the appropriation provided in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) Restorative Justice: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $250,000 in each fiscal year to support the Restorative Justice Program
administered by the Volunteers of America.
(6) Volunteers of America - Freedom House: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support the Freedom House
administered by Volunteers of America.
(7) Lincoln County Family Recovery Court: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $250,000 in each fiscal year to support the Lincoln County Family
Recovery Court to assist families involved with child welfare system.
(8) Child Fatality and Near Fatality Review Panel: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $588,500 fiscal year 2026-2027 and $596,300 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 to support the operations of the Child Fatality and Near Fatality External
Review Panel.
(9) Northern Kentucky Regional Medical Examiners Office: Notwithstanding
Page 67 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
KRS 45.229, any unexpended funds from the $1,800,000 authorized in 2022 Ky. Acts ch.
199, Part I, H., 1., (11) to reestablish the Northern Kentucky Regional Medical
Examiners Office shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
2. CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 141,105,000 169,676,200
(1) Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund: Included in the
above Restricted Funds appropriation is $133,328,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$161,936,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation
Program Fund.
(2) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,562 in each fiscal year for each participant
for training incentive payments. KRS 15.460(1)(b) to (f) shall remain applicable, except
that the administrative expense reimbursement cap under KRS 15.460(1)(c)(3) shall not
exceed $1,000,000.
(3) Part-Time Officer Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS
15.420(2)(a)1.a. and KRS 15.460(1)(a), included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is funding for a proportional amount in each fiscal year based upon the
number of hours worked not to exceed $2,281 for each certified part-time participant for
training incentive payments. Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1)(c), each unit of government
shall receive an administrative expense reimbursement in an amount equal to seven and
sixty-five one-hundredths percent of the proportional amount.
3. JUVENILE JUSTICE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 172,164,700 181,655,000
Restricted Funds 14,725,200 13,849,400
Federal Funds 10,951,700 10,951,700
Page 68 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
TOTAL 197,841,600 206,456,100
(1) Owensboro Property: Notwithstanding 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 130, $1,036,000
shall be used in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the operations of the Department of
Juvenile Justice.
4. STATE POLICE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 244,370,800 252,765,600
Restricted Funds 49,763,600 34,554,600
Federal Funds 23,274,500 23,216,300
Road Fund 55,570,300 57,914,800
TOTAL 372,979,200 368,451,300
(1) Call to Extraordinary Duty: There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Kentucky State Police, subject to the conditions and procedures
provided in this Act, funds which are required as a result of the Governor's call of the
Kentucky State Police to extraordinary duty when an emergency situation has been
declared to exist by the Governor. Funding is authorized to be provided from the General
Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705).
(2) Restricted Funds Uses: Notwithstanding KRS 281A.150(5), 24A.179,
42.320(2)(h), 65.7631, 189A.050(3)(a), 237.110(18), and 281A.160(2)(b), funds are
included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation to maintain the operations and
administration of the Kentucky State Police.
(3) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,562 in each fiscal year for each participant
for training incentive payments.
(4) Support for Statewide Law Enforcement Purposes: Notwithstanding KRS
15.470, included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $15,460,000 in fiscal
Page 69 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
year 2026-2027 for the acquisition of mobile data terminals and replacement vehicles.
(5) Bill for Security Services: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the
Department of Kentucky State Police shall bill and accept payment from nonstate-
operated event sponsors for security services provided by the Department.
5. CORRECTIONS
a. Corrections Management
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 19,072,500 19,765,600
Restricted Funds 281,300 150,000
Federal Funds 100,000 304,300
TOTAL 19,453,800 20,219,900
(1) Local Correctional Facilities: Notwithstanding KRS 441.420, no funds are
provided for reimbursement to counties for design fees for architectural and engineering
services associated with any new local correctional facility approved by the Local
Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(2) Facility Reporting: (a) The Department of Corrections shall
continuously monitor its bed utilization of county jails, halfway houses, Recovery
Kentucky drug treatment centers, and all other community correctional residential
facilities that are under contract with the Department. This monitoring shall include
periodic review of its classification system to ensure that all offenders are placed in the
least restrictive housing that provides appropriate security to protect public safety and
provide ample opportunity for treatment and successful re-entry.
(b) On a quarterly basis, the Department shall submit a report detailing the
average occupancy rate for each of these facility types outlined in paragraph (a) of this
subsection to the Legislative Research Commission.
b. Adult Correctional Institutions
2026-27 2027-28
Page 70 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
General Fund 470,739,400 482,498,600
Restricted Funds 22,069,100 17,470,900
Federal Funds 30,000 30,000
TOTAL 492,838,500 499,999,500
(1) Transfer to State Institutions: Notwithstanding KRS 532.100(8), state
prisoners, excluding the Class C and Class D felons qualifying to serve time in county
jails, may be transferred to a state institution within 90 days of final sentencing, if the
county jail does not object to the additional 45 days.
(2) Operational Costs for Inmate Population: In the event that actual
operational costs exceed the amounts appropriated to support the budgeted average daily
population of state felons for each fiscal year, the additional payments shall be deemed
necessary government expenses and shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus
Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject
to notification as to necessity and amount by the State Budget Director who shall report
any certified expenditure to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
c. Community Services and Local Facilities
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 230,853,100 230,135,500
Restricted Funds 16,162,800 15,083,800
Federal Funds 874,200 874,200
TOTAL 247,890,100 246,093,500
(1) Excess Local Jail Per Diem Costs: In the event that actual local jail per diem
payments exceed the amounts appropriated to support the budgeted average daily
population of state felons in county jails for each fiscal year, the payments shall be
deemed necessary government expenses and may be paid from the General Fund Surplus
Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject
to notification as to necessity and amount by the State Budget Director who shall report
Page 71 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
any certified expenditure to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(2) Local Jails Funding: Notwithstanding KRS 441.605 to 441.695, funds in the
amount of $8,847,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,742,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028
shall be expended from the Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction
Authority for local correctional facility and operational support.
(3) Calculating Avoided Costs Relating to Legislative Action:
Notwithstanding KRS 196.288(5)(a), $4,126,500 has been determined to meet the intent
of the statute for the amount of avoided costs to be provided to the Local Corrections
Assistance Fund. The actions implemented pursuant to the implementation of 2011 Ky.
Acts ch. 2 now are no longer able to be calculated validly due to the length of time they
have been embedded in the criminal justice system.
(4) Substance Abuse, Mental Health, and Reentry Service Centers: (a)
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, for each fiscal year, the Department of
Corrections shall pay each contracted provider of substance abuse, mental health, and
reentry centers a minimum of 65 percent of the contracted beds monthly. Any contracted,
but unfilled contracted beds as of the effective date of this Act may, at the discretion of
the provider, be terminated.
(b) Each contracted provider, as provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
shall report 100 percent of their occupancy to the Department of Corrections. The report
shall detail the total number of beds, the number of beds available, the type of individual
occupying bed space, and shall be submitted in a method and at a frequency established
by the Department's discretion.
(5) Program Completion and Sentence Credit Payments: Notwithstanding
KRS 197.045(6), payments for program completions resulting in sentencing credit shall
not expire and shall continue through the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium. Included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $12,000,000 in each fiscal year to support payments
for program completions resulting in sentencing credit as prescribed in KRS
Page 72 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
197.045(6)(a), (b), and (c). The Department of Corrections shall prepare a report
annually, including but not limited to the number of program completions, the cost of
payments for each category of sentencing credit, and the programmatic impact on
recidivism. The Department of Corrections shall submit this report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by October 1 of each year.
d. Local Jail Support
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 16,284,900 16,284,900
(1) Local Corrections Assistance Fund Allocation: Notwithstanding KRS
196.288(5)(a), included in the above General Fund appropriation is $4,126,500 in each
fiscal year for the Local Corrections Assistance Fund. Moneys in the fund shall be
distributed to the counties each year. Amounts distributed from the fund shall be used to
support local correctional facilities and programs, including the transportation of
prisoners, as follows:
(a) In each fiscal year, the first $3,000,000 received by the fund, or, if the fund
receives less than $3,000,000, the entire balance of the fund, shall be divided equally
among all counties; and
(b) Any moneys remaining after making the distributions required by paragraph
(a) of this subsection shall be distributed to each county based on a ratio, the numerator
of which shall be the county's county inmate population on the second Thursday in
January during the prior fiscal year, and the denominator of which shall be the total
counties' county inmate population for the entire state on the second Thursday in January
during the prior fiscal year.
(2) Life Safety or Closed Jails: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $860,000 in each fiscal year to provide a monthly payment of an annual
amount of $20,000 to each county with a life safety jail or closed jail. The payment shall
be in addition to the payment required by KRS 441.206(2).
Page 73 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(3) Inmate Medical Care Expenses: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $792,800 in each fiscal year for medical care contracts to be distributed,
upon approval of the Department of Corrections, to counties by the formula codified in
KRS 441.206, and $851,800 in each fiscal year, on a partial reimbursement basis, for
medical claims in excess of the statutory threshold pursuant to KRS 441.045. The
funding support for medical contracts and catastrophic medical expenses for indigents
shall be maintained in discrete accounts. Any medical claim that exceeds the statutory
threshold may be reimbursed for that amount in excess of the statutory threshold.
TOTAL - CORRECTIONS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 736,949,900 748,684,600
Restricted Funds 38,513,200 32,704,700
Federal Funds 1,004,200 1,208,500
TOTAL 776,467,300 782,597,800
6. PUBLIC ADVOCACY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 93,413,300 95,240,300
Restricted Funds 4,565,100 4,622,700
Federal Funds 2,392,400 2,392,400
TOTAL 100,370,800 102,255,400
TOTAL - JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 3,250,000 3,250,000
General Fund 1,291,310,200 1,324,796,100
Restricted Funds 251,981,200 258,529,900
Federal Funds 72,518,000 72,652,600
Road Fund 55,570,300 57,914,800
Page 74 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
TOTAL 1,674,629,700 1,717,143,400
I. PERSONNEL CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL OPERATIONS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 34,492,600 34,938,700
2. PUBLIC EMPLOYEES DEFERRED COMPENSATION AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 8,397,000 8,439,200
3. WORKERS' COMPENSATION BENEFITS AND RESERVE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 24,381,900 24,399,100
4. FIXED ALLOCATION NON-HAZARDOUS PENSION FUND
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 69,691,600 69,691,600
(1) Quasi-State Agency Subsidy Distributions: (a) Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $332,100 in each fiscal year to maintain each Non-P1 state
agency's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline subsidy as adjusted and posted under the 2024
Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission's website.
(b) Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $18,882,100 in each
fiscal year to maintain each Regional Mental Health Unit's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline
subsidy as adjusted and posted under the 2024 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative
Research Commission's website.
(c) Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $25,151,300 in each
fiscal year to maintain each health department's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline subsidy as
adjusted and posted under the 2024 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research
Commission's website.
Page 75 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(d) The distribution of the baseline subsidy to each employer classification
identified in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall be distributed in the
following manner: In July and January of each year, the Office of State Budget Director
shall obtain the total creditable compensation reported by each employer to the Kentucky
Public Pensions Authority and utilize that number to determine how much of each total
appropriation shall be distributed to each employer within its own unique employer
classification. Payments to each employer shall be made on September 1 and April 1 of
each fiscal year.
(e) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991(6)(b), included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $25,326,100 in each fiscal year to support each employer's share of the
increase in retirement costs over each employer's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline
contribution as adjusted and posted under the 2024 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative
Research Commission's website.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 61.565(1)(d)1.d., the initial dollar amounts for those
individual participating employers who are local and district health departments governed
by KRS Chapter 212, community mental health centers, and employers whose employees
are not subject to KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200, who received or were eligible to receive a
distribution of General Fund appropriations in the 2018-2020 State/Executive Branch
Biennial Budget to assist in paying retirement costs under 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Part I,
G., 4., (5); 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Part I, G., 5., (2); or 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Part I, G.,
9., (2), shall be adjusted for fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 based on the actuarial
valuation as of June 30, 2023.
TOTAL - PERSONNEL CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 69,691,600 69,691,600
Restricted Funds 67,271,500 67,777,000
TOTAL 136,963,100 137,468,600
Page 76 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
J. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
Budget Units
1. COUNCIL ON POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 6,250,000 5,480,300
General Fund 13,981,800 17,613,100
Restricted Funds 11,709,700 9,025,900
Federal Funds 6,128,800 6,190,100
TOTAL 38,070,300 38,309,400
(1) Interest Earnings Transfer from the Strategic Investment and Incentive
Trust Fund Accounts: Notwithstanding KRS 164.7911 to 164.7927, included in the
above Restricted Funds appropriation is $3,077,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 from the
interest earnings on the Research Challenge and Comprehensive University Excellence
trust funds to support the operations of the Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Cancer Research and Screening: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $6,250,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,480,300 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 for cancer research and screening. Included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $769,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from interest income from the
Kentucky Health Care Improvement Fund. The appropriation in each fiscal year shall be
equally shared between the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville.
(3) Ovarian Cancer Screening: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Ovarian Cancer Screening
Outreach Program at the University of Kentucky.
(4) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 164.028 to 164.0282, no
General Fund is provided for Professional Education Preparation.
(5) Postsecondary Education Debt: Notwithstanding KRS 45.750 to 45.810, in
order to lower the cost of borrowing, any university that has issued or caused to be issued
Page 77 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
debt obligations through a not-for-profit corporation or a municipality or county
government for which the rental or use payments of the university substantially meet the
debt service requirements of those debt obligations is authorized to refinance those debt
obligations if the principal amount of the debt obligations is not increased and the rental
payments of the university are not increased. Any funds used by a university to meet debt
obligations issued by a university pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to
interception of state-appropriated funds pursuant to KRS 164A.608.
(6) Disposition of Postsecondary Institution Property: Notwithstanding KRS
45.777, a postsecondary institution’s governing board may elect to sell or dispose of real
property or major items of equipment and proceeds from the sale shall be designated to
the funding sources, on a proportionate basis, used for acquisition of the equipment or
property to be sold.
(7) Spinal Cord and Head Injury Research: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for spinal cord and head injury
research. In accordance with KRS 211.500 to 211.504, the appropriation in each fiscal
year shall be shared between the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville.
2. KENTUCKY HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 393,193,800 393,193,800
Restricted Funds 61,565,100 61,580,900
Federal Funds 86,000 86,000
TOTAL 454,844,900 454,860,700
(1) Use of Lottery Revenues: Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), lottery
revenues accruing to the General Fund are appropriated for the following student
financial aid programs: College Access Program; Kentucky Tuition Grant Program;
Kentucky Educational Excellence Scholarship Program; Kentucky National Guard
Tuition Award Program; Teacher Scholarship Program; Innovative Scholarship Pilot
Page 78 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Project; Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program; and Dual Credit Scholarship
Program.
(2) College Access Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $187,438,200 in each fiscal year for the College Access Program. Included in the
above Restricted Funds appropriation is $12,269,100 in each fiscal year from previous
fiscal years’ excess Lottery funds held in a trust and agency account. Notwithstanding
KRS 164.7891, $1,100,000 in each fiscal year, and notwithstanding 11 KAR 7:010,
Section 8, $450,000 in each fiscal year from Restricted Funds is hereby authorized to
support the College Access Program.
(3) Kentucky Tuition Grant Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $37,881,600 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Tuition Grant Program.
(4) Kentucky National Guard Tuition Award Program: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $7,398,100 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky National
Guard Tuition Award Program.
(5) Kentucky Educational Excellence Scholarships (KEES): Included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $90,556,600 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky
Educational Excellence Scholarships (KEES). Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $12,300,000 in each fiscal year for KEES.
(6) Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $12,000,500 in each fiscal year for the Work Ready
Kentucky Scholarship Program.
(7) Dual Credit Scholarship Program: (a) Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $21,150,000 in each fiscal year for the Dual Credit Scholarship
Program. Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $6,290,100 in each
fiscal year from previous years’ excess Lottery funds held in trust and agency account for
the Dual Credit Scholarship Program.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 164.786(1)(f), the dual credit tuition rate ceiling shall
Page 79 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
be one-half of the per credit hour tuition amount charged by the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System for in-state students. Notwithstanding KRS 164.786(4)(c),
eligible high school students may receive a dual credit scholarship for two career and
technical education dual credit courses per academic year and four general education dual
credit courses over the junior and senior years, up to a maximum of 12 approved dual
credit courses.
(8) Veterinary Medicine Contract Spaces: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $5,800,400 in each fiscal year for the Veterinary Medicine Contract
Spaces program.
(9) Optometry Scholarship Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $848,400 in each fiscal year for the Optometry Scholarship Program.
(10) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 164.740 to 164.764,
164.7890(11)(c), 164.7891(11)(b), and 164.7894, no General Fund is provided for Coal
County Pharmacy Scholarship, Osteopathic Medicine Scholarships, Work Study, and
Coal County College Completion Scholarships
(11) Teacher Scholarship Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Teacher Scholarship Program.
Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $1,015,000 in each fiscal year for
the Teacher Scholarship Program.
(12) General Administration and Support: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $5,820,000 in each fiscal year to support general administration and
support services.
(13) Student Teacher Stipend Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $7,300,000 in each fiscal year for the Student Teacher Stipend Program.
(14) Teacher Recruitment Student Loan Forgiveness Pilot Program: Included
in the above General Fund appropriation is $10,000,000 in each fiscal year for the
Teacher Recruitment Student Loan Forgiveness Pilot Program.
Page 80 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(15) Innovative Scholarship Pilot Project: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $5,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Innovative Scholarship Pilot
Project. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall work in coordination
with the Council on Postsecondary Education to develop and implement the Innovative
Scholarship pilot project.
3. EASTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 80,929,700 80,929,700
Restricted Funds 227,069,400 235,446,300
Federal Funds 135,500,000 135,500,000
TOTAL 443,499,100 451,876,000
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $4,571,900 in each fiscal year for the Model Laboratory School;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991(6)(b)1., $5,345,800 in each fiscal year for the
university’s fixed allocation pension subsidy; and
(c) $2,423,200 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
4. KENTUCKY STATE UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 30,198,500 30,198,500
Restricted Funds 68,862,300 77,848,400
Federal Funds 40,680,600 44,031,000
TOTAL 139,741,400 152,077,900
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $10,381,000 in each fiscal year to fund the state match payments required of
Page 81 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
land-grant universities under federal law; and
(b) $473,600 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
5. MOREHEAD STATE UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 46,330,300 46,330,300
Restricted Funds 115,133,700 115,713,000
Federal Funds 47,176,400 47,176,400
TOTAL 208,640,400 209,219,700
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $5,442,700 in each fiscal year for the Craft Academy for Excellence in
Science and Mathematics;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991(6)(b)1., $2,947,800 in each fiscal year for the
university’s fixed allocation pension subsidy; and
(c) $1,274,400 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
6. MURRAY STATE UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 54,783,400 54,783,400
Restricted Funds 159,450,500 159,450,500
Federal Funds 26,494,600 26,494,600
TOTAL 240,728,500 240,728,500
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $4,034,200 in each fiscal year for the Breathitt Veterinary Center;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991(6)(b)1., $1,800,000 in each fiscal for the
Page 82 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
university’s fixed allocation pension subsidy; and
(c) $1,451,400 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
7. NORTHERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 67,527,000 67,527,000
Restricted Funds 221,360,100 221,360,100
Federal Funds 15,450,500 15,450,500
TOTAL 304,337,600 304,337,600
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $1,323,900 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Center for Mathematics; and
(b) $1,377,900 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
8. UNIVERSITY OF KENTUCKY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 339,809,600 339,809,600
Restricted Funds 8,688,499,300 9,509,319,400
Federal Funds 315,770,000 333,769,000
TOTAL 9,344,078,900 10,182,898,000
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $35,420,800 in each fiscal year for the College of Agriculture, Food and
Environment’s Cooperative Extension Service;
(b) $31,434,100 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Agricultural Experiment
Station;
(c) $10,176,200 in each fiscal year for the Center for Applied Energy Research;
Page 83 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(d) $4,076,300 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Geological Survey;
(e) $4,034,200 in each fiscal year for the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory;
(f) $2,040,500 in each fiscal year for the Sanders-Brown Center on Aging;
(g) $1,800,000 in each fiscal year for the College of Agriculture, Food and
Environment’s Division of Regulatory Services;
(h) $600,000 in each fiscal year for the College of Agriculture, Food and
Environment’s Kentucky Small Business Development Center;
(i) $586,300 in each fiscal year for the University Press of Kentucky;
(j) Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), $500,000 in each fiscal year for the
Human Development Institute for the Supported Higher Education Project;
(k) $450,200 in each fiscal year for the Center of Excellence in Rural Health;
(l) $950,200 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Cancer Registry;
(m) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the Sports Medicine Research Institute; and
(n) $10,750,900 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
9. UNIVERSITY OF LOUISVILLE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 159,728,200 159,728,200
Restricted Funds 1,515,148,500 1,547,903,100
Federal Funds 196,365,300 200,610,300
TOTAL 1,871,242,000 1,908,241,600
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $695,200 in each fiscal year for the Rural Health Education Program;
(b) $150,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Autism Training Center;
(c) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the School of Dentistry to provide dental care
to patients with dental issues related to drug use;
Page 84 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(d) $150,000 in each fiscal year for the Mid-South REACH Grant; and
(e) $5,801,100 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
10. WESTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 86,536,700 86,536,700
Restricted Funds 279,343,600 280,343,600
Federal Funds 44,143,300 44,143,300
TOTAL 410,023,600 411,023,600
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $5,442,700 in each fiscal year for the Gatton Academy of Mathematics and
Science in Kentucky;
(b) $1,750,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Mesonet;
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991(6)(b)1., $1,522,200 in each fiscal year for the
university’s fixed allocation pension subsidy; and
(d) $1,866,900 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
11. KENTUCKY COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 206,292,300 206,292,300
Restricted Funds 556,562,200 563,293,200
Federal Funds 295,517,000 295,516,800
TOTAL 1,058,371,500 1,065,102,300
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are
the following:
(a) $4,149,800 in each fiscal year for KCTCS-TRAINS;
Page 85 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(b) $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for Adult Agriculture Education; and
(c) $3,164,800 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and
Casualty Insurance Fund premium.
(2) Firefighters Foundation Program Fund: (a) Included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $62,806,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $63,596,300
in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.250(1)(a), included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation are sufficient funds for an incentive payment of $4,562, plus an amount
equal to the required employer’s contribution on the supplement, in each fiscal year for
each qualified professional firefighter under the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund.
KRS 95A.250(1)(b) to (e) shall remain applicable, except that the administrative expense
reimbursement cap under KRS 95A.250(1)(e)(3) shall not exceed $500,000.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.262(2), included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $15,000 in each fiscal year for aid payments for each qualified volunteer
fire department.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.200 to 95A.300, $18,800,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 shall be transferred to support projects as set forth in Part II, Capital Projects
Budget, of this Act.
(e) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.262(15), included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $1,500,000 in each fiscal year to be used by the Fire Commission to
conduct training-related activities.
(f) Notwithstanding KRS 95.200 to 95A.300, included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $1,869,900 in each fiscal year for State Fire Rescue Training.
(3) Firefighters Training Center Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 95A.262(3),
$1,000,000 in Restricted Funds is provided in each fiscal year for the Firefighters
Training Center Fund.
(4) Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts: Notwithstanding
Page 86 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
KRS 56.770 and 56.774, guaranteed energy savings performance contracts may be
executed for buildings operated by the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System under agreements governed by KRS 164.593.
12. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION PERFORMANCE FUND
(1) Performance Fund Distribution: Notwithstanding KRS 164.092, the fiscal
year 2025-2026 Postsecondary Education Performance Fund distribution shall remain in
the base General Fund budget of each institution in fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-
2028.
TOTAL - POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 6,250,000 5,480,300
General Fund 1,479,311,300 1,482,942,600
Restricted Funds 11,904,704,400 12,781,284,400
Federal Funds 1,123,312,500 1,148,968,000
TOTAL 14,513,578,200 15,418,675,300
K. PUBLIC PROTECTION CABINET
Budget Units
1. SECRETARY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 11,951,000 12,155,200
2. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 5,677,200 5,770,900
Federal Funds 204,700 204,700
TOTAL 5,881,900 5,975,600
3. BOXING AND WRESTLING AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
Page 87 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 330,600 336,400
4. ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 9,387,400 9,041,800
Federal Funds 1,014,700 1,014,700
TOTAL 10,402,100 10,056,500
5. FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 18,394,800 18,744,100
6. HOUSING, BUILDINGS AND CONSTRUCTION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 3,052,300
Restricted Funds 29,813,100 27,378,900
TOTAL 29,813,100 30,431,200
(1) Operations of the Department: Notwithstanding KRS 227A.050, included
in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $1,751,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to
support of the operations of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction,
Division of General Inspections.
7. INSURANCE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 23,319,000 23,597,600
8. CLAIMS AND APPEALS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,093,800 2,116,200
Restricted Funds 1,309,600 1,326,500
Federal Funds 771,900 773,500
TOTAL 4,175,300 4,216,200
Page 88 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(1) Administrative Expenses and Claims: Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2),
excess Restricted Funds from the Department of Insurance shall be transferred to the
Crime Victims' Compensation Fund and made available to support administrative
expenses and claims.
TOTAL - PUBLIC PROTECTION CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,093,800 5,168,500
Restricted Funds 100,182,700 98,351,400
Federal Funds 1,991,300 1,992,900
TOTAL 104,267,800 105,512,800
L. TOURISM, ARTS AND HERITAGE CABINET
Budget Units
1. SECRETARY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,297,100 3,632,500
Restricted Funds 20,426,100 20,351,000
TOTAL 23,723,200 23,983,500
(1) Kentucky Center for African American Heritage: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $500,000 to the Kentucky Center for African American
Heritage in fiscal year 2026-2027 for deferred maintenance and programming expenses.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
2. ARTISANS CENTER
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,238,000 1,281,500
Restricted Funds 1,278,700 1,281,000
TOTAL 2,516,700 2,562,500
3. TOURISM
Page 89 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,367,700 3,443,100
Restricted Funds 72,700 72,700
TOTAL 3,440,400 3,515,800
(1) Whitehaven Welcome Center: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $130,000 in each fiscal year to support the Whitehaven Welcome Center.
4. PARKS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 68,180,900 64,936,700
Restricted Funds 48,151,400 50,676,300
TOTAL 116,332,300 115,613,000
(1) Park Capital Maintenance and Renovation Fund: Notwithstanding KRS
148.810, no transfer to the Park Capital Maintenance and Renovation Fund shall be
made.
(2) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,562 in each fiscal year for each participant
for training incentive payments.
(3) Capitol Annex Cafeteria: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is sufficient funds in each fiscal year to support the Capitol Annex cafeteria operated by
the Department of Parks.
5. HORSE PARK COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,631,800 1,667,200
Restricted Funds 12,800,500 12,962,000
TOTAL 14,432,300 14,629,200
(1) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,562 in each fiscal year for each participant
Page 90 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
for training incentive payments.
6. STATE FAIR BOARD
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 6,700,700 7,000,600
Restricted Funds 55,378,900 55,627,000
TOTAL 62,079,600 62,627,600
7. FISH AND WILDLIFE RESOURCES
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 59,148,400 59,950,700
Federal Funds 27,224,300 27,570,800
TOTAL 86,372,700 87,521,500
(1) Fish and Wildlife Resources Peace Officers' Stipend: Notwithstanding
KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,562 in each
fiscal year for each participant for training incentive payments.
(2) Fees-in-Lieu-of Stream Mitigation Reporting: The Department of Fish and
Wildlife Resources shall develop a report of all projects managed by the Fees-in-Lieu-of
Stream Mitigation Program. The Department shall present this report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Tourism, Small Business, and Information Technology by August 1 of
each fiscal year.
8. HISTORICAL SOCIETY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 7,071,600 7,355,300
Restricted Funds 460,700 366,300
Federal Funds 113,700 113,700
TOTAL 7,646,000 7,835,300
9. ARTS COUNCIL
2026-27 2027-28
Page 91 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
General Fund 1,793,500 1,819,500
Restricted Funds 87,200 87,200
Federal Funds 823,000 826,200
TOTAL 2,703,700 2,732,900
10. HERITAGE COUNCIL
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,733,600 1,776,600
Restricted Funds 766,100 767,700
Federal Funds 1,054,700 1,070,400
TOTAL 3,554,400 3,614,700
(1) Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $50,000 in each fiscal year for the Native American
Heritage Commission.
11. KENTUCKY CENTER FOR THE ARTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 603,800 603,800
TOTAL - TOURISM, ARTS AND HERITAGE CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 95,618,700 93,516,800
Restricted Funds 198,570,700 202,141,900
Federal Funds 29,215,700 29,581,100
TOTAL 323,405,100 325,239,800
M. KENTUCKY PERMANENT PENSION FUND
Budget Unit
1. KENTUCKY PERMANENT PENSION FUND
(1) Lapse of Remaining Balance: The $67,724,700 unexpended balance from
the fiscal year 2023-2024 General Fund appropriation set out in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199,
Page 92 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Part I, N., 1. to implement pay raises for state employees shall remain unexpended, and
notwithstanding KRS 42.205, 45.229, 48.700, and 48.705, the balance shall be a part of
the designated fund balance and be carried forward for budgeted purposes into fiscal year
2026-2027.
PART II
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
(1) Capital Construction Fund Appropriations and Reauthorizations:
Moneys in the Capital Construction Fund are appropriated for the following capital
projects subject to the conditions and procedures in this Act. Items listed without
appropriated amounts are previously authorized for which no additional amount is
required. These items are listed in order to continue their current authorization into the
2026-2028 fiscal biennium. Unless otherwise specified, reauthorized projects shall
conform to the original authorization enacted by the General Assembly.
(2) Expiration of Existing Line-Item Capital Construction Projects: All
appropriations to existing line-item capital construction projects expire on June 30, 2026,
unless reauthorized in this Act with the following exceptions: (a) A construction or
purchase contract for the project shall have been awarded by June 30, 2026; (b)
Permanent financing or a short-term line of credit sufficient to cover the total authorized
project scope shall have been obtained in the case of projects authorized for bonds, if the
authorized project completes an initial draw on the line of credit within the fiscal
biennium immediately subsequent to the original authorization; and (c) Grant or loan
agreements, if applicable, shall have been finalized and properly signed by all necessary
parties by June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding the criteria set forth in this subsection and
KRS 45.229 and 45.770(5)(d), funds appropriated to 2022-2024 and 2024-2026 fiscal
biennia maintenance pools shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(3) Bond Proceeds Investment Income: Investment income earned from bond
proceeds beyond that which is required to satisfy Internal Revenue Service arbitrage
Page 93 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
rebates and penalties and excess bond proceeds upon the completion of a bond-financed
capital project shall be used to pay debt service according to the Internal Revenue Service
Code and accompanying regulations.
(4) Appropriations for Projects Not Line-Itemized: Inasmuch as the
identification of specific projects in a variety of areas of the state government cannot be
ascertained with absolute certainty at this time, amounts are appropriated for specific
purposes to projects which are not individually identified in any Act in the following
areas: Kentucky Infrastructure Authority Water and Sewer projects; Flood Control
projects; Repair of State-Owned Dams; Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance
Contract projects; Wetland and Stream Mitigation projects; maintenance pools;
Postsecondary Education pools; Legacy System Modernization Pool; the State Schools
HVAC pool; the State Schools Safety and Security pool; State Parks Improvement; State
Fair Board Property Improvements; Fish and Wildlife Land Acquisition Pool; State Parks
Utility Infrastructure Replacement pool; and Kentucky Exposition Center Paving Pool.
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, projects estimated to cost $1,000,000 and
over and equipment estimated to cost $200,000 and over shall be reported to the Capital
Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
(5) Capital Construction and Equipment Purchase Contingency Account: If
funds in the Capital Construction and Equipment Purchase Contingency Account are not
sufficient, then expenditures of the fund are to be paid first from the General Fund
Surplus Account (KRS 48.700), if available, or from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705), subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
(6) Emergency Repair, Maintenance, and Replacement Account: If funds in
the Emergency Repair, Maintenance, and Replacement Account are not sufficient, then
expenditures of the fund are to be paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account
(KRS 48.700), if available, or from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705), subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
Page 94 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(7) Appropriation-Supported Debt: To lower the cost of borrowing, the
agencies identified in KRS 45A.850(1)(a) and (2)(a) are authorized to refinance
appropriation supported debt obligations that have previously been issued and for which
the Commonwealth is currently making lease-rental payments to meet the current debt
service requirements. Such action is authorized provided that the principal amount of any
such debt obligation is not increased and the term of the debt obligation is not extended.
Any such refinancing shall still be subject to the requirements of KRS 45.750 to 45.810
for reporting to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
(8) Cash Defeasance: State agencies identified in KRS 45A.850(1)(a) and (2)(a)
are authorized to economically or legally defease debt obligations that have previously
been issued by the agency, or through a third party but for which the Commonwealth or
the agency is currently making lease-rental payments to meet the current debt service
requirements. If Restricted Funds are used for the defeasance of bonds, the agency may
use a prior Agency Bond authorization for a new debt obligation so long as the debt
service for the new debt obligation is not greater than the debt service of the defeased
bonds and the term of the new debt obligation is not greater than the term of the defeased
bonds. Any such refinancing shall still be subject to the requirements of KRS 45.750 to
45.810 for reporting to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
(9) Public-Private Partnerships Sunset: Notwithstanding KRS 45A.077(8), the
utilization of the public-private partnership delivery method for projects of at least
$25,000,000 does not need to be explicitly authorized by the General Assembly.
A. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Units 2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
1. VETERANS' AFFAIRS
001. Radcliff Veterans Center HVAC System Replacement Additional
Bond Funds 16,000,000 -0- -0-
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Page 95 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Investment Income -0- 2,000,000 2,000,000
003. Expand Columbarium Wall - Kentucky Veterans Cemetery Northeast
Federal Funds -0- -0- 2,000,000
2. KENTUCKY INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY
001. Drinking Water Revolving Loan Program
Bond Funds -0- 13,123,600 3,659,000
Agency Bonds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 109,906,000 18,294,000
TOTAL -0- 153,029,600 21,953,000
002. Federally Assisted Wastewater Program
Bond Funds -0- 14,559,800 4,045,000
Agency Bonds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 75,502,000 20,223,000
TOTAL -0- 120,061,800 24,268,000
3. MILITARY AFFAIRS
001. Construct Wendell H. Ford Regional Training Center Unaccompanied
Housing Advanced Skills Training
Federal Funds -0- 21,000,000 -0-
002. Construct Multi-Purpose Building Bluegrass Station
Other Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 56.820.
003. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income -0- 6,000,000 6,000,000
004. Construct Civil Support Team Facility Additional Reauthorization
($13,200,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds -0- 11,400,000 -0-
005. Construct New Barracks at Wendell H. Ford Reginal Training Center
Page 96 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Federal Funds -0- 8,000,000 -0-
006. Construct Readiness Center Somerset Additional Reauthorization
($24,750,000 Federal Funds, $8,259,000 Bond Funds)
Bond Funds -0- -0- 1,633,000
Federal Funds -0- -0- 4,898,000
TOTAL -0- -0- 6,531,000
007. Construct Jackson Field Maintenance Shop Additional Reauthorization
($15,000,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
008. Ashland Armory Restoration Phase 1
Federal Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 4,000,000 -0-
009. Construct Armory 4 Frankfort Additional Reauthorization ($3,000,000
Federal Funds, $1,000,000 Bond Funds)
Federal Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 4,000,000 -0-
010. Demolish Bluegrass Station Boiler Plant
Restricted Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
011. Construct and Extend Electric Bluegrass Station
Restricted Funds -0- 3,500,000 -0-
012. Construct Fitness Center Facility Wendell H. Ford Reginal Training Center
Additional Reauthorization ($5,000,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
013. Kentucky Army National Guard Training Site Master Plan
Federal Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
Page 97 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
014. Bluegrass Station Facility Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 1,000,000 1,000,000
015. Construct Road Improvements Bluegrass Station
Restricted Funds -0- 1,500,000 -0-
016. Construct New Barracks at Harold L. Disney Training Site Additional
Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds -0- 1,000,000 -0-
017. Construct Harold L. Disney Training Site Drainage Improvements
Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Federal Funds)
018. Construct Improve Sewer System Bluegrass Station Reauthorization
($5,000,000 Restricted Funds)
019. Extension of Utilities Wendell H. Ford Reginal Training Center
Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Federal Funds)
020. Construct Support Building Wendell H. Ford Reginal Training Center
Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Federal Funds)
4. DEPARTMENT FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT
001. Flood Control Matching Fund
Investment Income -0- 6,000,000 -0-
5. ATTORNEY GENERAL
001. Franklin County - Lease
6. TREASURY
001. Replacement of HVAC Leibert Units
Investment Income -0- 354,000 -0-
002. Lease-Purchase Check Printer - Secondary
Investment Income -0- 66,000 -0-
7. COMMONWEALTH'S ATTORNEYS
001. Jefferson County - Lease
Page 98 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
8. AGRICULTURE
001. Large Capacity Scale Truck
Restricted Funds -0- 800,000 -0-
002. Franklin County - Lease
9. AUDITOR OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
001. Franklin County - Lease
10. KENTUCKY PUBLIC PENSIONS AUTHORITY
001. Pension Administration Technology Modernization
Restricted Funds -0- -0- 15,000,000
11. OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS
a. Nursing
001. Jefferson County - Lease
12. KENTUCKY RIVER AUTHORITY
001. Renovate Lock 5
Restricted Funds -0- -0- 4,200,000
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 2,000,000
003. Locks 2 and 3 Upper Guide Wall Repair Reauthorization ($4,131,000
Restricted Funds)
004. Design and Repair Dam 7 Reauthorization ($6,400,000 Restricted Funds)
13. SCHOOL FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION
001. Offers of Assistance - 2024-2026 Reauthorization and Reallocation
($3,760,000 Bond Funds)
Bond Funds -0- 36,240,000 -0-
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above project is authorized from a
reallocation of the projects set forth in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, A., 10., 005.
002. School Facilities Construction Commission Reauthorization ($89,710,000
Page 99 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Bond Funds)
B. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CABINET
(1) Economic Development Bond Issues: Before any economic development
bonds are issued, the proposed bond issue shall be approved by the Secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet and the State Property and Buildings Commission
under KRS 56.440 to 56.590. In addition to the terms and conditions of KRS 154.12-100,
administration of the Economic Development Bond Program by the Secretary of the
Cabinet for Economic Development is subject to the following guideline: project
selection shall be documented when presented to the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet. Included in the documentation shall be the rationale for selection
and expected economic development impact.
(2) Use of New Economy Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 154.12-100, 154.12-
278(4) and (5), and 154.20-035, the Secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development
may use funds appropriated in the Economic Development Fund Program, High-Tech
Construction/Investment Pool, and the Kentucky Economic Development Finance
Authority Loan Pool interchangeably for economic development projects.
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
001. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority Loan Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 7,500,000 7,500,000
002. Economic Development Bond Programs - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 7,500,000 7,500,000
003. High-Tech Construction/Investment Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 7,500,000 7,500,000
C. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Page 100 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 6,000,000 6,000,000
002. Education Finance Application Phase 2 Additional Reauthorization
($2,000,000 Bond Funds)
Investment Income 5,610,000 -0-
D. EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 2,650,000 2,650,000
2. KENTUCKY EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 1,500,000 1,500,000
3. LIBRARIES AND ARCHIVES
a. General Operations
001. Franklin County - Lease
4. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
001. Renovate McDowell Vocational Rehabilitation Center
Bond Funds 6,240,000 -0-
002. Kenton County - Lease
003. Hardin County - Lease
5. DISABILITY DETERMINATION
001. Franklin County - Lease
E. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. SECRETARY
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Page 101 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Investment Income 1,000,000 1,000,000
2. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
001. State-Owned Dam Repair - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 21,060,000 -0-
002. State Superfund Sites - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 3,000,000 -0-
F. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
001. Electric Vehicle Charging Stations
Investment Income 1,000,000 -0-
2. Controller
001. Upgrade & Enhancement eMARS Systems Additional
Investment Income 3,765,300 -0-
3. FACILITIES AND SUPPORT SERVICES
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 15,000,000 15,000,000
002. Renovate Cabinet for Human Resources Phase 2
Bond Funds 8,000,000 -0-
003. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
4. COMMONWEALTH OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY
001. Kentucky from Above
Investment Income 6,150,000 6,150,000
002. Enterprise Application and AI Inventory System
Investment Income 4,000,000 2,000,000
003. Alternate Data Center - Lease
G. HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
Page 102 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 11,000,000 11,000,000
2. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH, DEVELOPMENTAL AND INTELLECTUAL
DISABILITIES
001. Oakwood Renovate/Replace Cottages Phase IV
Bond Funds 12,616,000 -0-
002. Western State Nursing Facility Renovations II
Bond Funds 6,621,000 -0-
003. Hazelwood Upgrade Elevators
Investment Income 2,880,000 -0-
004. Western State Hospital Repair/Replace Cooling Towers
Investment Income 1,920,000 -0-
3. PUBLIC HEALTH
001. Construct Central Lab Expansion
Bond Funds 270,000,000 6,300,000
002. Jefferson County - Lease
4. COMMUNITY BASED SERVICES
001. Kenton County - Lease
002. Fayette County - Lease
003. Warren County - Lease
004. Daviess County - Lease
005. Perry County - Lease
006. Boone County - Lease
007. Hardin County - Lease
008. Boyd County - Lease
Page 103 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
009. Campbell County - Lease
010. Johnson County - Lease
011. Shelby County - Lease
012. Greenup County - Lease
013. Muhlenberg County - Lease
014. Madison County - Lease
015. Marshall County - Lease
016. Floyd County - Lease
017. Harlan County - Lease
018. Pulaski County - Lease
019. Jefferson County - Lease
H. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
001. Construct Indoor Firing Range Western Kentucky Training Center
Madisonville
Restricted Funds -0- 51,727,000
002. Construct New Flat Track - Criminal Justice Training Center Richmond
Restricted Funds 16,778,000 -0-
003. Construct Flat Track - Western Kentucky Training Center Madisonville
Restricted Funds -0- 13,101,000
004. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 4,500,000 4,500,000
005. Construct Campus Access Road - Criminal Justice Training Center Richmond
Restricted Funds 3,952,000 -0-
2. JUVENILE JUSTICE
001. Female Juvenile Detention Center - Western Kentucky
Page 104 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Bond Funds 4.500,000 40,500,000
002. Female Juvenile Detention Center - Central Kentucky
Bond Funds 4,500,000 40,500,000
003. High Acuity Mental Health Facility - Juvenile Justice
Bonds Funds 3,500,000 31,500,000
004. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 7,200,000 7,200,000
005. Construct Juvenile Justice Youth Development Center Fencing
Bond Funds 5,000,000 -0-
006. Franklin County - Lease
3. STATE POLICE
001. Emergency Radio System Replacement Additional
Bond Funds 59,333,000 48,094,000
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 6,500,000 6,500,000
003. Posts 7 (Richmond) and 10 (Harlan) Construction Additional
Bond Funds 8,586,000 -0-
4. CORRECTIONS
a. Adult Correctional Institutions
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 30,000,000 30,000,000
002. Mechanical, Electrical, Plumbing Upgrades and Replacement Pool
Investment Income 10,000,000 10,000,000
003. Kentucky State Reformatory - Demolition Additional Reauthorization and
Reallocation ($9,776,000 Bond Funds)
Bond Funds 17,010,000 -0-
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above project is authorized from a
Page 105 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
reallocation of the project set forth in 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Part II, H., 4., a., 003.
004. Replace Kentucky State Penitentiary - Utilities Infrastructure Additional
Bond Funds 15,758,000 -0-
005. Repair Northpoint Training Center - Exterior Dorms Masonry Tuckpoint
Additional
Bonds Funds 11,787,000 -0-
006. Adaptive Reuse Eastern Kentucky Correctional Complex Building - East
Kentucky Applied Manufacturing Institute
Bond Funds -0- 10,700,000
007. Renovate Northpoint Training Center - Restricted Housing Unit Additional
Bond Funds 3,500,000 -0-
008. Southeast State Correctional Complex - Lease
b. Community Services and Local Facilities
001. Bellevue Probation and Parole - Lease
002. Lexington Probation and Parole - Lease
5. PUBLIC ADVOCACY
001. Franklin County - Lease
002. Fayette County - Lease
003. Louisville/Jefferson County - Lease
I. PERSONNEL
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL OPERATIONS
001. Enterprise Human Resources Information System Reauthorization and
Reallocation ($10,351,800 Bond Funds)
Bond Funds 9,848,200 130,869,000
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above project is authorized from a
reallocation of the projects set forth in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Part II, F., 1., 001 and
Page 106 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, A., 11., 002.
J. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. KENTUCKY HIGHER EDUCATION STUDENT LOAN CORPORATION
001. Jefferson County - Lease
2. EASTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
001. Construct University Hotel and Conference Center
Other Funds 130,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
002. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 65,000,000 -0-
003. Upgrade and Improve Residence Halls Pool
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 25,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 35,000,000 -0-
004. IT Hardware Software Networking Systems Pool
Restricted Funds 24,000,000 -0-
005. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
006. Aviation Acquisition Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds 10,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 15,000,000 -0-
007. Property Acquisitions Pool
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 10,000,000 -0
Page 107 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
008. Scientific and Research Equipment Pool
Other Funds 2,200,000 -0-
Federal Funds 2,200,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 4,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 8,400,000 -0-
009. Improve Campus Pedestrian, Parking and Transportation Pool Additional
Reauthorization ($8,000,000 Agency Bonds, $3,000,000 Restricted Funds, $3,000,000
Other Funds)
Agency Bonds 7,000,000 -0-
010. Commonwealth Hall Partial Repurposing and Renovation
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
011. Natural Area Improvement Pool
Restricted Funds 1,000,000 -0-
012. Athletics Capital Improvements Pool Reauthorization ($25,000,000 Agency
Bonds, $25,000,000 Restricted Funds, $25,000,000 Other Funds)
013. Maintain/Expand Begley Building Reauthorization ($40,000,000 Agency
Bonds)
014. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($8,222,000 Restricted
Funds)
015. Lease - Aviation
016. Lease - New Housing Space
017. Lease - Madison County - Student Housing
018. Lease - Madison County - Land
019. Lease 1 - Multi-Property - Multi-Use 1
020. Lease 2 - Multi-Property - Multi-Use 2
021. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
3. KENTUCKY STATE UNIVERSITY
Page 108 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
001. Renovate Facility for Health Sciences Center
Federal Funds 4,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds 20,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 24,000,000 -0-
002. Acquire Land
Restricted Funds 1,500,000 -0-
Federal Funds 3,500,000 -0-
TOTAL 5,000,000 -0-
003. Renovate Baseball Stadium
Bond Funds 2,000,000 -0-
004. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($2,412,000 Restricted
Funds)
4. MOREHEAD STATE UNIVERSITY
001. Construct New Residence Hall #3
Agency Bonds 56,940,000 -0-
002. Construct New Residence Hall #4
Agency Bonds 44,900,000 -0-
003. Construct New Agriculture Sciences Building
Bond Funds 30,665,000 -0-
004. Capital Renewal and Maintenance Pool - Auxiliary
Agency Bonds 12,600,000 -0-
005. Renovate Grote-Thompson Residence Hall
Agency Bonds 10,100,000 -0-
006. Renovate Fields Residence Hall
Agency Bonds 10,100,000 -0-
007. Renovate and Replace Exterior Precast Panels - Nunn Hall
Agency Bonds 4,320,000 -0-
Page 109 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
008. Comply with ADA - Auxiliary
Agency Bonds 1,000,000 -0-
009. Construct New Residence Hall #2 Reauthorization ($40,350,000 Agency
Bonds)
010. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
5. MURRAY STATE UNIVERSITY
001. Construct Emergency Veterinary and Teaching Clinic
Bond Funds 48,500,000 -0-
002. Construct Residential Housing
Agency Bonds 47,000,000 -0-
003. Replace College Courts Apartments Additional Reauthorization ($15,000,000
Agency Bonds)
Agency Bonds 15,000,000 -0-
004. Construct/Renovate Dining Facility Additional Reauthorization ($30,000,000
Restricted Funds)
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
005. Emergency Generator Docking Station(s) for Residence Halls
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
006. Replace Wilson Hall Roof
Restricted Funds 1,100,000 -0-
007. Replace Alexander Hall Addition Roof
Restricted Funds 1,100,000 -0-
008. Replace Racer Arena Roof
Restricted Funds 1,100,000 -0-
009. Athletic Facilities Improvements Pool Reauthorization ($20,000,000
Restricted Funds, $20,000,000 Agency Bonds)
010. Asset Preservation Pool - Residence Halls Reauthorization ($6,000,000
Page 110 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Agency Bonds)
011. Acquire Agriculture Research Farm Land Reauthorization ($1,254,000
Restricted Funds)
012. Renovate Residence Hall Interior Reauthorization ($1,674,000 Agency
Bonds)
013. Renovate Residence Hall Electrical System Reauthorization ($4,369,000
Agency Bonds)
014. Acquire Property Reauthorization ($4,180,000 Restricted Funds)
015. Replace Residence Hall Domestic Water Piping Reauthorization ($1,195,000
Agency Bonds)
016. Renovate Residence Hall HVAC System Reauthorization ($1,661,000
Agency Bonds)
017. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
6. NORTHERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
001. US 27 Mixed Use Development
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS
45A.077.
002. Construct Sports Complex
Other Funds 98,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
003. Renovate Business Academic Center
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds 75,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 80,000,000 -0-
004. Expand Multi-Purpose Events Center
Other Funds 32,000,000 -0-
Page 111 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
005. Enhance Online Programs Additional
Restricted Funds 9,500,000 -0-
006. Upgrade IT Infrastructure Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 2,950,000 -0-
007. Replace Recreation Field Turf
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
008. Acquire Land/Master Plan 2010-2012 Reauthorization ($17,500,000 Agency
Bonds, $4,000,000 Restricted Funds, $4,000,000 Other Funds)
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
009. Expand/Renovate Soccer Complex Reauthorization ($16,000,000 Agency
Bonds, $36,000,000 Other Funds)
010. Renovate Residence Halls Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Agency Bonds)
011. Renew/Renovate Landrum Academic Center Reauthorization ($49,000,000
Bond Funds, $3,000,000 Other Funds)
012. Renew/Repair Parking Garage Pool Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Agency
Bonds)
013. Replace Event Center Technology Reauthorization ($4,500,000 Other Funds)
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
014. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
015. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($1,170,300 Restricted
Funds)
7. UNIVERSITY OF KENTUCKY
(1) University of Kentucky Acquisitions: Notwithstanding any statute to the
contrary, the University of Kentucky, or one of its affiliated corporations for the benefit
of the University’s multifaceted education, healthcare, research and service mission, shall
be permitted to assume any and all leases, debt instruments, and liabilities associated with
Page 112 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
any mergers, acquisitions, or partnerships that are hereby authorized in the 2026-2028
Budget of the Commonwealth. Assumption of leases and debt instruments shall be
reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
001. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 3 Phase 2
Restricted Funds 2,000,000,000 -0-
002. Construct/Improve Hamburg Medical Park
Other Funds 500,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 300,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 800,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
003. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 2
Other Funds 400,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 800,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
004. Construct Fan Experience Districts
Other Funds 625,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 700,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
005. Construct/Improve Arts and Innovation Complex
Agency Bonds 175,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 775,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
006. Construct Multi-Use Complex 1
Page 113 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 500,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 600,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
007. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 8
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 600,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
008. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 7
Restricted Funds 300,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 300,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 600,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
009. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 6
Other Funds 500,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
010. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 5
Restricted Funds 500,000,000 -0-
011. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 4
Restricted Funds 500,000,000 -0-
012. Acquire/Partnership Medical System 2
Restricted Funds 500,000,000 -0-
013. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 4
Restricted Funds 500,000,000 -0-
014. Improve Central Plants/Utilities Infrastructure - Phase 2
Page 114 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 400,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 500,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
015. Construct/Improve Student Housing
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 475,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
016. Construct/Improve Utilities Infrastructure Hamburg
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 400,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
017. Construct/Improve Utilities Infrastructure UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 400,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
018. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 2
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 400,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
019. Improve UK HealthCare IT Systems II
Restricted Funds 400,000,000 -0-
020. Acquire/Partnership Medical System 1
Page 115 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 350,000,000 -0-
021. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 10
Other Funds 150,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
022. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 1
Restricted Funds 300,000,000 -0-
023. Construct /Improve Research/Data Center
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
024. Improve Campus Parking and Transportation System
Other Funds 250,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
025. Construct/Improve Dining Facilities
Other Funds 150,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
026. Construct Research Facility
Bond Funds 200,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 250,000,000 -0-
Page 116 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
027. Improve UK HealthCare Facilities - UK Chandler Hospital
Restricted Funds 250,000,000 -0-
028. Facilities Renewal and Modernization
Agency Bonds 125,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 125,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 250,000,000 -0-
029. Construct/Improve Parking Facility 1
Restricted Funds 125,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 125,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 250,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
030. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 2
Restricted Funds 250,000,000 -0-
031. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 1
Restricted Funds 250,000,000 -0-
032. Expand UK HealthCare IT Systems
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
033. Improve Utilities Infrastructure UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
034. Improve Parking/Transportation Systems UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
Page 117 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
035. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 9
Other Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
036. Construct/Improve Parking/Transportation System Hamburg
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
037. Improve Utilities Infrastructure UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
038. Improve UK King’s Daughters Medical Campus
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
039. Improve Parking/Transportation Systems UK HealthCare
Other Funds 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
040. Implement Land Use Plan 1
Restricted Funds 200,000,000 -0-
041. Construct Recreation/Wellness Center
Other Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
042. Construct/Improve Club Area - Kroger Field
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Page 118 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
043. Construct Digital Village Building 3
Restricted Funds 95,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 95,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 190,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
044. Construct/Improve UK St. Claire Main Campus
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
045. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 5
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
046. Construct Cancer/Ambulatory Facility Phase 3
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
047. Implement Land Use Plan 2
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
048. Acquire E&G Enterprise 2
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
049. Acquire E&G Enterprise 1
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
050. Construct Hotel/Conference Center
Other Funds 150,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
051. Construct/Improve Wildcat Coal Lodge
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 75,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 150,000,000 -0-
Page 119 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
052. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 2
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
053. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 1
Restricted Funds 150,000,000 -0-
054. Construct West End Zone Club Space Additional Reauthorization
($50,000,000 Other Funds)
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 150,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
055. Improve ASTeCC Facility
Restricted Funds 130,000,000 -0-
056. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 4
Restricted Funds 130,000,000 -0-
057. Improve Singletary Center
Restricted Funds 130,000,000 -0-
058. Construct/Improve Dental Sciences Building
Restricted Funds 130,000,000 -0-
059. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 3
Restricted Funds 125,000,000 -0-
060. Construct/Improve Parking Facility 2
Other Funds 125,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
061. Improve Coldstream Research Campus
Other Funds 60,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 60,000,000 -0-
Page 120 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
TOTAL 120,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
062. Construct Agriculture Federal Research Facility I
Federal Funds 108,000,000 -0-
063. Improve State Street Medical Facilities
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
064. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
065. Improve Building Systems UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
066. Construct/Improve Building Systems Hamburg
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
067. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
068. Improve Parking/Transportation Systems UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
069. Improve Clinical/Ambulatory Services Facilities
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
070. Construct/Improve Recreation Services Space 1
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 100,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
071. Construct/Improve Research Space
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
072. Construct/Improve Athletics Facility 1
Other Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Page 121 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 100,000,000 -0-
073. Improve Student Center Space 2
Other Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 100,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
074. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 3
Restricted Funds 100,000,000 -0-
075. Acquire Land
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 100,000,000 -0-
076. Improve Gatton Business and Economics Building
Agency Bonds 90,000,000 -0-
077. Construct Equine/Horticulture Campus
Restricted Funds 90,000,000 -0-
078. Improve Oswald Building
Restricted Funds 88,500,000 -0-
079. Improve Chemistry/Physics Building
Restricted Funds 88,000,000 -0-
080. Improve 4-H Camps
Restricted Funds 80,000,000 -0-
081. Improve Fine Arts Building
Restricted Funds 80,000,000 -0-
082. Improve King Library
Restricted Funds 80,000,000 -0-
Page 122 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
083. Improve Patterson Hall
Restricted Funds 80,000,000 -0-
084. Improve Kastle Hall
Restricted Funds 80,000,000 -0-
085. Improve Taylor Education Building
Restricted Funds 80,000,000 -0-
086. Acquire Furnishings/Equipment UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
087. Construct/Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure Hamburg
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
088. Construct/Improve Service Core Systems Hamburg
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
089. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
090. Improve Markey Cancer Center Facilities
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
091. Improve Building Systems UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
092. Acquire Equipment/Furnishings Pool - Campus
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
093. Construct Agriculture Research Facility 3
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
094. Construct Agriculture Research Facility 2
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
095. Improve Center for Applied Energy Research Facilities
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
096. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 4
Page 123 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
097. Upgrade/Renovate/Expand Research Labs
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
098. Improve Funkhouser Building
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
099. Construct/Improve Alumni Center
Restricted Funds 75,000,000 -0-
100. Construct/Improve Greek Housing
Restricted Funds 36,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 36,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 72,000,000 -0-
101. Improve Willard Medical Education/Science Building
Restricted Funds 70,000,000 -0-
102. Improve Lexington Theological Seminary Facilities
Restricted Funds 70,000,000 -0-
103. Construct/Improve CAFE Farm 2
Restricted Funds 60,000,000 -0-
104. Construct/Improve Childcare Development Facility
Restricted Funds 55,000,000 -0-
105. Construct/Improve Administrative/Support Building
Restricted Funds 55,000,000 -0-
106. Construct Tennis Facility
Restricted Funds 27,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 27,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 54,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
107. Improve Campus Core Quadrangle Facilities
Page 124 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 54,000,000 -0-
108. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 6
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
109. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 7
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
110. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 6
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
111. Improve Medical Pavilion UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
112. Improve IT/Enterprise Systems 1
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
113. Improve Business Services Center UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
114. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
115. Improve Building Systems UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
116. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
117. Improve UK Good Samaritan Hospital Facilities
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
118. Construct/Improve Ambulatory Care
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
119. Construct/Improve Patient Support Facility
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
120. Construct Agriculture Research Facility - Phase 2
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Page 125 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
121. Improve Research Data Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
122. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 5
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
123. Improve Student Services Space
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
124. Improve Health Sciences Research Building
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
125. Improve Angliana Facilities
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
126. Improve Kroger Field 4
Other Funds 25,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
127. Purchase/Construct CO2 Capture Process Plant
Federal Funds 40,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 1,500,000 -0-
Other Funds 8,500,000 -0-
TOTAL 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
128. Improve Seaton Center
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
129. Decommission Facilities
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
130. Improve Kroger Field 3
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
Page 126 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 25,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
131. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
132. Improve Arboretum Complex
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
133. Construct/Relocate/Replace Greenhouses
Restricted Funds 50,000,000 -0-
134. Improve Jacobs Science Building
Restricted Funds 48,000,000 -0-
135. Improve McVey Hall
Restricted Funds 48,000,000 -0-
136. Improve Gray Design Building
Restricted Funds 45,000,000 -0-
137. Improve Memorial Hall
Restricted Funds 45,000,000 -0-
138. Research Equipment Pool
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds 15,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 45,000,000 -0-
139. Construct/Improve Library Depository Facility
Restricted Funds 45,000,000 -0-
140. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Resource Planning System
Restricted Funds 40,000,000 -0-
141. Construct/Improve Recreation Services Space 2
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
Page 127 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 20,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 40,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
142. Construct/Improve Student Success/Academic Facility 1
Restricted Funds 40,000,000 -0-
143. Improve Building Shell Systems
Restricted Funds 40,000,000 -0-
144. Construct Teaching Pavilion
Restricted Funds 38,000,000 -0-
145. Improve Academic Technical Building
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
146. Improve Whalen Building and Bay Facility (Ky Adv Mfg)
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
147. Construct Improve Recreation Quad
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
148. Construct Support Services Building
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
149. Improve Moloney Building
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
150. Improve Building Mechanical Systems
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
151. Expand KGS Well Sample and Core Repository
Restricted Funds 35,000,000 -0-
152. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 6
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
153. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 5
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
Page 128 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
154. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 4
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
155. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 3
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
156. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 2
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
157. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 1
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
158. Improve Medical Facility 9
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
159. Improve Medical Facility 6
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
160. Improve Medical Facility 5
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
161. Improve Medical Facility 4
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
162. Improve Medical Facility 8
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
163. Improve Medical Facility 18
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
164. Improve Medical Facility 17
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
165. Improve Medical Facility 16
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
166. Improve Medical Facility 15
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
167. Improve Medical Facility 14
Page 129 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
168. Improve Medical Facility 13
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
169. Improve Medical Facility 12
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
170. Improve Medical Facility 11
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
171. Improve Medical Facility 10
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
172. Improve Medical Facility 7
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
173. Improve Stuckert Career Center
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
174. Construct/Improve CAFE Farm 1
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
175. Improve Enterprise Networking 1
Restricted Funds 30,000,000 -0-
176. Improve Electrical Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 28,000,000 -0-
177. Improve Library Facility
Restricted Funds 27,000,000 -0-
178. Improve Mechanical Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 26,000,000 -0-
179. Improve IT/Enterprise Systems 3
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
180. Improve IT/Enterprise Systems 2
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
Page 130 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
181. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 5
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
182. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 4
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
183. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 3
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
184. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 2
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
185. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 1
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
186. Implement Patient Communication System
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
187. Construct/Improve Wellness Trial
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
188. Construct Meats/Food Development Center Phase 2
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
189. Construct/Improve Transformative Learning Center
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
190. Improve Peterson Service Building
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
191. Improve Barnhart Building
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
192. Improve Enterprise Networking 2
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
193. Lease/Purchase Enterprise IT Systems
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
194. Improve Student Center Space 3
Page 131 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
195. Improve W.T. Young Facility
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
196. Improve Critical Infrastructure Building Systems
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
197. Improve Life Safety
Restricted Funds 25,000,000 -0-
198. Improve Campus Security and Safety Systems
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
199. Improve Health Park UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
200. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
201. Improve Medical Pavilion UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
202. Construct UK HealthCare Medical Transport Facility
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
203. Improve Campus Security and Safety
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
204. Acquire/Improve Data/Infrastructure Systems
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
205. Construct/Improve Recreation/Services Space 3
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 20,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
206. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 2 Design
Page 132 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
207. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 1 Design
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
208. Lease/Purchase Campus IT System
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
209. Construct/Improve Machine Lab
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
210. Improve White Hall Classroom Building
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
211. Improve Athletics Facility 2
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
212. Acquire/Improve IT Systems/Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
213. Improve Academic Facility
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
214. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Network Security
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
215. Construct Police Facilities
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
216. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
217. Improve Hilary J. Boone Center
Restricted Funds 18,000,000 -0-
218. Improve Lancaster Aquatic Center 1
Restricted Funds 17,000,000 -0-
219. Improve Medical Center Library
Restricted Funds 17,000,000 -0-
Page 133 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
220. Construct/Improve Student Success/Academic Facility 2
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
221. Construct/Improve UK HealthCare Hamburg Facilities
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
222. Acquire Data Center and Networking Hardware UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
223. Construct Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 3 Design
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
224. Improve Boone Tennis Center
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
225. Construct/Improve Athletics Facility 2
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
226. Acquire Equipment/Furnishings Pool
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
227. Improve Spindletop Hall Facilities
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
228. Construct/Fit-up Retail Space
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 15,000,000 -0-
229. Improve Athletics Facility 3
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
230. Improve Multi-disciplinary Science Building
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
231. Lease/Purchase High Performance Computer
Restricted Funds 15,000,000 -0-
232. Improve CAFE Motor Pool Building
Page 134 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 14,000,000 -0-
233. Construct Agriculture Federal Research Facility II
Federal Funds 14,000,000 -0-
234. Construct Metal Arts/Digital Media Building
Restricted Funds 14,000,000 -0-
235. Improve Baseball Facility Phase II
Restricted Funds 14,000,000 -0-
236. Improve Patterson Office Tower
Restricted Funds 12,000,000 -0-
237. Improve University Storage Facility 1
Restricted Funds 12,000,000 -0-
238. Acquire/Improve Clinical/Research Facility
Restricted Funds 11,000,000 -0-
239. Acquire Telemedicine/Virtual Intensive Care Unit
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
240. Renovate/Improve Nursing Units UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
241. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 4 Design
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
242. Improve Parking Structure 2 Enterprise Data Center
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
243. Improve University Storage Facility 2
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
244. Improve Soccer/Softball Facility
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
245. Improve Campus Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
Page 135 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
246. Improve Fume Hood Systems
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
247. Improve Scovell Hall
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
248. Improve Lancaster Aquatic Center 2
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
249. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
250. Improve Enterprise Cable Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
251. Improve Senior Center
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
252. Construct/Improve Gymnastics Practice Facility
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
253. Improve Memorial Coliseum
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
254. Improve Athletics Facility 4
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
255. Improve Pence Hall
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
256. Improve DLAR Facilities
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
257. Improve Building Electrical Systems
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
258. ADA Compliance Pool
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
259. Improve Kroger Field 1 Additional Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Other
Page 136 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Funds)
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
260. Improve Anderson Tower
Restricted Funds 9,000,000 -0-
261. Improve Mineral Industries Building
Restricted Funds 9,000,000 -0-
262. Improve Carnahan House
Restricted Funds 8,000,000 -0-
263. Acquire/Improve Golf Facility
Restricted Funds 8,000,000 -0-
264. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 5 Design
Restricted Funds 7,500,000 -0-
265. Improve Medical Plaza
Restricted Funds 7,000,000 -0-
266. Improve Nutter Training Facility
Restricted Funds 7,000,000 -0-
267. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Voice Infrastructure
Restricted Funds 7,000,000 -0-
268. Renovate Space for a Testing Center
Restricted Funds 7,000,000 -0-
269. Improve Nurse Building
Restricted Funds 7,000,000 -0-
270. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Call Center System
Restricted Funds 7,000,000 -0-
271. Improve Medical Behavioral Science Building
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
272. Improve Athletics Facility 6
Page 137 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
273. Improve Athletics Facility 5
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
274. Improve Joe Craft Center
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
275. Improve Joe Craft Football Practice Facility
Other Funds 3,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 6,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
276. Improve Cooper House
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
277. Acquire Data Center and Networking Hardware UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
278. Acquire Data Center and Networking Hardware UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
279. Construct/Improve/Recreational Playing Surfaces
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
280. Construct Athletics Hall of Fame
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
281. Improve Sturgill Development Building
Restricted Funds 4,000,000 -0-
282. Replace Basketball Playing Floors
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
283. Improve Athletics Facility 7
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
284. Acquire Transportation Buses
Page 138 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
285. Improve Indoor/Outdoor Track
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
286. Construct Cross County Trail
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
287. Construct/Improve Athletics Surfaces 2
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
288. Construct/Improve Athletics Surfaces 1
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
289. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts - UK HealthCare
290. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
291. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 3 Reauthorization
($800,000,000 Agency Bonds)
292. Asset Preservation Pool - 2024-2026 Reauthorization ($30,862,000 Agency
Bonds)
293. Construct Academic Building Reauthorization ($149,000,000 Restricted
Funds)
294. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 1 Reauthorization
($300,000,000 Restricted Funds, $500,000,000 Other Funds)
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763
295. Construct Health Education Building Reauthorization ($50,000,000 Agency
Bonds)
296. Lease - Off-Campus 1
297. Lease - Off-Campus 3
298. Lease - Off-Campus 4
299. Lease - Off-Campus 5
300. Lease - Off-Campus 6
Page 139 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
301. Lease - Off-Campus 7
302. Lease - Off-Campus 11
303. Lease - Off-Campus 12
304. Lease - Off-Campus 13
305. Lease - Off-Campus 14
306. Lease - Off-Campus 15
307. Lease - Off-Campus 16
308. Lease - Off-Campus 17
309. Lease - Off-Campus 18
310. Lease - Off-Campus 19
311. Lease - Off-Campus 20
312. Lease - Off-Campus 21
313. Lease - Off-Campus 22
314. Lease - Off-Campus 23
315. Lease - Off-Campus 24
316. Lease - Off-Campus 25
317. Lease - Off-Campus 26
318. Lease - Off-Campus Housing 1
319. Lease - Off-Campus Housing 2
320. Lease - Health Science Colleges 1
321. Lease - Health Science Colleges 2
322. Lease - Health Science Colleges 3
323. Lease - Off-Campus Athletics 1
324. Lease - Off-Campus Athletics 2
325. Lease - Health Affairs Office 3
326. Lease - Health Affairs Office 4
327. Lease - Health Affairs Office 10
Page 140 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
328. Lease - Health Affairs Office 12
329. Lease - Health Affairs Office 14
330. Lease - Health Affairs Office 15
331. Lease - Health Affairs Office 18
332. Lease - Health Affairs Office 19
333. Lease - Health Affairs Office 20
334. Lease - Health Affairs Office 21
335. Lease - Health Affairs Office 22
336. Lease - Health Affairs Office 24
337. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 2
338. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 3
339. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 5
340. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 12
341. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 13
342. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 14
343. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 15
344. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 16
345. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 17
346. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 18
347. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 19
348. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 20
349. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 21
350. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 22
351. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 23
352. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 24
353. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 25
354. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 26
Page 141 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
355. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 27
356. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 28
357. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 29
358. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 30
359. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 31
360. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 32
361. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 33
362. Lease - Off-Campus 2
363. Lease - Off-Campus 11
364. Lease - College of Medicine 1
365. Lease - College of Medicine 2
366. Lease - Health Affairs Office 1
367. Lease - Health Affairs Office 2
368. Lease - Health Affairs Office 5
369. Lease - Health Affairs Office 6
370. Lease - Health Affairs Office 7
371. Lease - Health Affairs Office 8
372. Lease - Health Affairs Office 9
373. Lease - Health Affairs Office 11
374. Lease - Health Affairs Office 13
375. Lease - Health Affairs Office 16
376. Lease - Health Affairs Office 17
377. Lease - Health Affairs Office 23
378. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 1
379. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 4
380. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 6
381. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 7
Page 142 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
382. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 8
383. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 9
384. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 10
385. Lease - UK HealthCare Off-Campus Facility 11
386. Lease - Off-Campus 8
387. Lease - Off-Campus 9
388. Lease - Off-Campus 10
389. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 1
390. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 2
391. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 3
392. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 4
393. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 6
394. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 7
395. Lease - UK HealthCare - Royal Blue Health 8
8. UNIVERSITY OF LOUISVILLE
001. Purchase Residence Housing Facility
Agency Bonds 250,000,000 -0-
002. Construct Resident Hall Public - Private Partnership
Other Funds 250,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
003. Construct Athletics Village
Other Funds 150,000,000 -0-
004. Construct STEM Building
Bond Funds 142,000,000 -0-
005. Improve Housing Facilities Pool
Agency Bonds 100,000,000 -0-
006. Construct Medical Sciences Research Building
Page 143 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 70,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
007. Construct Center for Bioscience
Federal Funds 70,000,000 -0-
008. Center for Military Health/Biology
Federal Funds 70,000,000 -0-
009. Construct Belknap Campus Parking Garage
Agency Bonds 60,000,000 -0-
010. Construct Natatorium
Other Funds 60,000,000 -0-
011. New Vision of Health Building Renovation and Upgrade
Federal Funds 60,000,000 -0-
012. Cybersecurity Center with Enhanced Internet Capabilities
Other Funds 50,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds 10,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 60,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
013. Build-Out 620 Garage Space
Agency Bonds 50,000,000 -0-
014. Replace Building Mechanical, Electrical and Plumbing
Other Funds 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
015. Structural Improvements Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds 40,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
016. Research Lab Enhancements and Repurpose Spaces
Agency Bonds 30,000,000 -0-
Page 144 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
017. Center for AI Excellence
Other Funds 29,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
018. Expand Basketball/Lacrosse Practice Facility
Other Funds 25,000,000 -0-
019. Renovate Cardinal Football Stadium
Other Funds 25,000,000 -0-
020. Vivarium Equipment Replacement and Upgrade Pool - 2026-2028
Agency Bonds 25,000,000 -0-
021. Construct Indoor Facility
Other Funds 20,000,000 -0-
022. Purchase Land Additional Reauthorization ($10,000,000 Agency Bonds)
Other Funds 15,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 5,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 20,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
023. Expand Patterson Stadium/Construct Indoor Facility
Other Funds 20,000,000 -0-
024. Expand Ulmer Stadium/Construct Indoor Facility
Other Funds 15,000,000 -0-
025. Precision Medicine Research Center
Agency Bonds 14,000,000 -0-
026. Construct Kentucky Center for Precision Medicine
Federal Funds 12,500,000 -0-
027. Workday FI Enhancements
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
Page 145 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
028. Research Computing Infrastructure Enhancements
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
029. Content Management System Enhancements
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
030. Renovate L&N Arena
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
031. Update, Replace Technology in Athletic Venues
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
032. Green Health Sciences Center Courtyard
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
033. Campus Code Improvement Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
034. Replace Cardinal Stadium Seats
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
035. Renovate Exterior Envelope Replacement - 55A Additional Reauthorization
($20,000,000 Agency Bonds)
Agency Bonds 10,000,000 -0-
036. Renovate Cardinal Park
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
037. Expand and Renovate Wright Natatorium
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
038. Capital Renewal for Athletic Venues
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
Page 146 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
039. Expand and Renovate Marshall Center Complex
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
040. Replace Electronic Video Boards
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
041. Construct Defense Supply Chain Security System
Federal Funds 10,000,000 -0-
042. Kentucky Center for Precision Medicine Data and Analytical Systems
Federal Funds 9,326,000 -0-
043. Kentucky Center for Precision Medicine Equipment
Federal Funds 8,000,000 -0-
044. Renovate Cardinal Stadium Club
Other Funds 7,500,000 -0-
045. Construct Athletics Office Building
Other Funds 7,500,000 -0-
046. Replace Seats in Athletic Venues
Other Funds 7,000,000 -0-
047. Purchase Network System Enhancements
Other Funds 6,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
048. Renovate and Update Student/Athlete Dormitory
Other Funds 6,000,000 -0-
049. Demolition of Resident Halls
Agency Bonds 6,000,000 -0-
050. Security and Firewall System Enhancements
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
051. Computer Processing and Storage Enhancements
Page 147 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
052. Expand and Renovate Tailgate Space
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
053. Expand and Renovate Athletic Parking Lots
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
054. ADA Building Upgrade Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 3,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
055. Renovate Gross Anatomy Lab
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
056. Demolish and Construct Golf Maintenance/Chemical Building
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
057. Renovate Bass Rudd Tennis Center
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
058. Construct Practice Bubble
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
059. Renovate Lynn Soccer Stadium
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
060. Renovate Trager Football Practice Facility
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
061. Renovate Patterson Baseball Stadium
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
062. Renovate Thornton’s Academic Center
Page 148 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
063. Construct Athletic Grounds Building
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
064. Football Practice Field Lighting
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
065. Upgrade to Regional Biocontainment Laboratories
Federal Funds 5,000,000 -0-
066. Self-Contained Internet Access Point
Federal Funds 5,000,000 -0-
067. Construct Exit Ramp at Chestnut Street Garage
Other Funds 4,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
068. Workday HR Enhancements
Other Funds 4,000,000 -0-
069. Update and Replace Equipment in ACCN Studio
Other Funds 4,000,000 -0-
070. Renovate and Expand ACCN Studio
Other Funds 4,000,000 -0-
071. Renovate Garvin Brown Boathouse
Other Funds 4,000,000 -0-
072. Renovate Parking Structures
Other Funds 3,600,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
073. Purchase Fiber Infrastructure
Other Funds 3,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
074. Signage, Wayfinding, Landscaping
Page 149 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Other Funds 1,200,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
075. Expand, Replace and Maintain Grass Practice Fields
Other Funds 3,000,000 -0-
076. Replace Fiber Pathway from ACCN Studio to Venues
Other Funds 3,000,000 -0-
077. Renovate and Expand Lee Street Facility
Other Funds 3,000,000 -0-
078. Renovate College of Education Academic Space Pool
Other Funds 3,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
079. Renovate Golf Clubhouse - Shelby County
Other Funds 3,000,000 -0-
080. Upgrade Plumbing and Sanitary Lines - Dental School
Other Funds 2,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
081. Resurface and Repair Parking Lot
Other Funds 2,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
082. Construct Belknap Stormwater Mitigation Improvements
Other Funds 2,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
083. Construct Connector Speed School to Research Park Additional
Reauthorization ($10,000,000 Agency Bonds)
Agency Bonds 2,400,000 -0-
084. Build Out Space for UofL Departments
Other Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Page 150 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
085. Replace Artificial Turf Field V
Other Funds 2,000,000 -0-
086. Replace Artificial Turf Field IV
Other Funds 2,000,000 -0-
087. Renovate Interfaith Center
Other Funds 1,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant KRS 45.763.
088. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
089. Renovate College of Business Academic Space Reauthorization ($15,000,000
Agency Bonds)
090. Asset Preservation - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($8,638,000 Agency Bonds)
091. Construct Resident Hall Reauthorization ($80,000,000 Agency Bonds)
092. Construct Health Sciences Simulation Center and Collaboration Hub
Reauthorization ($20,000,000 Agency Bonds)
093. Construct Student Commons and Recreational Fields Reauthorization
($12,000,000 Agency Bonds)
094. Modernize Steam and Chill Water Plant Reauthorization ($40,000,000
Agency Bonds)
095. Lease - Medical Center One
096. Lease - Nucleus 1 Building
097. Lease - University Pointe
098. Lease - Cardinal Towne
099. Lease - The Nine at Louisville
100. Lease - Province Apartments
101. Lease - Trager Institute
102. Lease - 1212 S. 4th Street, Louisville, KY
Page 151 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
103. Lease - Liberty Green Community Center
104. Lease - West Kentucky Community and Technical College
105. Lease - Denny Crum Hall
106. Lease - Soccer Stadium
107. Lease - Founders Square
108. Lease - Rowan Building - A&S Fine Arts
109. Lease - Academic Space 1
110. Lease - Academic Space 2
111. Lease - Arthur Street - Tafel Building
112. Lease - Athletic/Student Dormitory
113. Lease - Housing Facilities
114. Lease - Housing 1
115. Lease - Housing 2
116. Lease - Housing 3
117. Lease – Housing 4
118. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space - State of Kentucky
119. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space 1
120. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space 1
121. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space 3
122. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 1
123. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 2
124. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 3
125. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 4
126. Lease - Medical Center One
127. Lease - Nucleus 1 Building 2
128. Lease - Support Space 1
9. WESTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
Page 152 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
001. Residential Halls Public-Private Partnership
Other Funds 350,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763
and KRS 45A.077.
002. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 100,000,000 -0-
003. Acquire Furniture, Fixtures, and Equipment - Media
Restricted Funds 20,000,000 -0-
004. Renovate Center for Research and Development Phase I
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
Other Funds 6,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 12,000,000 -0-
005. Renovate Space for Exercise Science Program
Restricted Funds 10,000,000 -0-
006. Renovate and Expand Clinical Education Complex
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
007. Remove and Replace Student Housing at Farm
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
008. Add Club Seating at Diddle Arena
Other Funds 10,000,000 -0-
009. Acquire Fixtures, Furniture, and Equipment - College of Health and Human
Services
Restricted Funds 8,000,000 -0-
010. Expand Track and Field Facilities
Other Funds 6,500,000 -0-
011. Renovate South Campus
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 -0-
Page 153 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
012. Construct Baseball Grandstand
Other Funds 6,000,000 -0-
013. Acquire, Furniture, Fixtures, and Equipment Diddle Arena
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
014. Construct South Plaza
Other Funds 5,000,000 -0-
015. Acquire Fixtures, Furniture, and Equipment Pool
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
016. Upgrade Softball Facilities and Field
Other Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 4,000,000 -0-
017. Renovate Owensboro Campus for the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist
(CRNA) Program
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
018. Renovate Medical Center Health Complex for the Certified Registered Nurse
Anesthetist (CRNA) Program
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
019. Purchase Property/Parking and Street Improvements
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
020. Purchase Property for Campus Expansion
Restricted Funds 3,000,000 -0-
021. Renovate State/Normal Street Properties
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
022. Construct Parking Structure IV Reauthorization ($35,000,000 Agency Bonds)
023. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
024. Lease - Alumni Center
Page 154 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
025. Lease - Parking Garage
026. Lease - Nursing/Physical Therapy
10. KENTUCKY COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
001. Re-entry Campus - Northpoint Training Center
Bond Funds 31,000,000 11,000,000
002. Renovate Leestown Building A - Bluegrass CTC
Bond Funds 21,000,000 -0-
003. Upgrade Prestonsburg Campus Buildings - Big Sandy CTC
Bond Funds 7,400,000 -0-
004. Property Acquisition Pool - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
005. KCTCS Property Acquisition Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 5,000,000 -0-
006. KCTCS Equipment Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 2,500,000 -0-
Federal Funds 2,500,000 -0-
TOTAL 5,000,000 -0-
007. Renovate Mayo Campus - Big Sandy CTC
Bond Funds 4,500,000 -0-
008. Construct District 4 Training Space - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds 4,200,000 -0-
009. Construct District 5 Training Space - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds 4,200,000 -0-
010. Acquire Harrison County ATC - Maysville CTC
Restricted Funds 4,000,000 -0-
011. Construct District 14 Storage Space - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds 3,400,000 -0-
Page 155 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
012. Procure Training Equipment - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
013. Exterior Signage - West Kentucky CTC
Restricted Funds 1,200,000 -0-
014. Renovate Broadway Building Façade - Jefferson CTC
Restricted Funds 1,200,000 -0-
015. Construct Multicultural Center Atrium Enclosure - Jefferson CTC
Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Restricted Funds)
016. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($26,890,000 Restricted
Funds)
017. Lease - Jefferson CTC - Bullitt County Campus
018. Lease - Jefferson CTC - Jefferson Education Center
K. PUBLIC PROTECTION CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. HOUSING, BUILDINGS AND CONSTRUCTION
001. Modernize Application System Reauthorization ($3,588,000 Restricted
Funds)
L. TOURISM, ARTS AND HERITAGE CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. SECRETARY
001. Northern Kentucky Convention Center Renovation and Expansion
Agency Bonds 40,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 18,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 58,000,000 -0-
(1) Procurement Authority: Notwithstanding any statute or administrative
regulation to the contrary, the Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation,
created under KRS 154.90-010, is authorized to act on behalf of the Commonwealth in
Page 156 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
lieu of the Finance and Administration Cabinet for all planning, design, procurement,
construction execution and administration, and completion activities for the renovation
and modernization for the Northern Kentucky Convention Center. The Secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain authority to determine any protests or
controversies under KRS 45A.285 with respect to the project.
2. ARTISANS CENTER
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 500,000 500,000
3. PARKS
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 20,000,000 20,000,000
4. HORSE PARK COMMISSION
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 2,000,000 2,000,000
5. STATE FAIR BOARD
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 3,000,000 3,000,000
002. Construct Kentucky Exposition Center Dirt/Salt Storage Facility
Reauthorization ($500,000 Investment Income)
6. FISH AND WILDLIFE RESOURCES
001. Fees-in-Lieu-of Stream Mitigation Projects Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 64,500,000 48,600,000
002. Western Kentucky Fish Hatchery
Restricted Funds 33,528,000 -0-
003. Indoor Gun Range/Law Enforcement Training Facility
Federal Funds 18,000,000 -0-
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Page 157 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
TOTAL 20,000,000 -0-
004. Land Acquisition Pool - 2026-2028
Federal Funds 4,500,000 4,500,000
Restricted Funds 1,500,000 1,500,000
TOTAL 6,000,000 6,000,000
005. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 1,500,000 1,500,000
Federal Funds 1,500,000 1,500,000
TOTAL 3,000,000 3,000,000
006. Camp Earl Wallace Dining Hall Reauthorization ($1,935,000 Restricted
Funds, $2,565,000 Federal Funds)
7. HISTORICAL SOCIETY
001. Kentucky Old State Capitol Preservation Additional
Bond Funds 4,651,000 330,000
Other Fund 42,000 42,000
TOTAL 4,693,000 372,000
8. KENTUCKY CENTER FOR THE ARTS
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 550,000 550,000
PART III
GENERAL PROVISIONS
1. Funds Designations: Restricted Funds designated in the biennial budget bills
are classified in the state financial records and reports as the Agency Revenue Fund, State
Enterprise Funds (State Parks, State Fair Board, Insurance Administration, and Kentucky
Horse Park), Internal Services Funds (Fleet Management, Computer Services,
Correctional Industries, Central Printing, Risk Management, and Property Management),
and selected Fiduciary Funds (Other Expendable Trust Funds). Separate fund records and
Page 158 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
reports shall be maintained in a manner consistent with the branch budget bills.
The sources of Restricted Funds appropriations in this Act shall include all fees
(which includes fees for room and board, athletics, and student activities) and rentals,
admittances, sales, bond proceeds, licenses collected by law, gifts, subventions,
contributions, income from investments, and other miscellaneous receipts produced or
received by a budget unit, except as otherwise specifically provided, for the purposes,
use, and benefit of the budget unit as authorized by law. Restricted Funds receipts shall
be credited and allotted to the respective fund or account out of which a specified
appropriation is made in this Act. All receipts of Restricted Funds shall be deposited in
the State Treasury and credited to the proper account as provided in KRS Chapters 12,
42, 45, and 48.
The sources of Federal Funds appropriations in this Act shall include federal
subventions, grants, contracts, or other Federal Funds received, income from investments,
other miscellaneous federal receipts received by a budget unit, and the Unemployment
Compensation Fund, except as otherwise provided, for the purposes, use, and benefit of
the budget unit as authorized by law. Federal Funds receipts shall be credited and allotted
to the respective fund account out of which a specified appropriation is made in this Act.
All Federal Funds receipts shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the
proper account as provided in KRS Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48.
2. Expenditure of Excess Restricted or Federal Funds Receipts: If receipts
received or credited to the Restricted Funds or Federal Funds accounts of a budget unit
during fiscal year 2026-2027 or fiscal year 2027-2028, and any balance forwarded to the
credit of these same accounts from the previous fiscal year, exceed the appropriation
made by a specific sum for these accounts of the budget unit as provided in Part I,
Operating Budget, of this Act, for the fiscal year in which the excess occurs, the excess
funds in the accounts of the budget unit shall become available for expenditure for the
purpose of the account during the fiscal year only upon compliance with the conditions
Page 159 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
and procedures specified in KRS 48.400, 48.500, 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, 48.630,
48.730, and 48.800, and with the authorization of the State Budget Director and approval
of the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
Prior to authorizing the appropriation of any excess, unbudgeted Restricted Funds
pursuant to this section, the State Budget Director and the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall review the adequacy of the General Fund Surplus Account
with respect to its availability to support authorized expenditures from the General Fund
Surplus Account, known as Necessary Government Expenses. If General Fund Surplus
Account moneys are determined by this review to be adequate to meet known or
anticipated Necessary Government Expenses during fiscal year 2026-2027 or fiscal year
2027-2028, respectively, then the appropriation increase may be approved. If the review
indicates that there are insufficient funds available or reasonably estimated to become
available to the General Fund Surplus Account to meet known or projected Necessary
Government Expenses for the fiscal years enumerated above, the State Budget Director
and the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may disapprove the request
for additional Restricted Funds expenditure authority and may direct the excess
Restricted Funds identified to the General Fund Surplus Account in order to meet
Necessary Government Expense obligations. The results of any review shall be reported
to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue in accordance with KRS
48.400, 48.500, 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, 48.630, 48.730, and 48.800.
Any request made by a budget unit pursuant to KRS 48.630 that relates to
Restricted Funds or Federal Funds shall include documentation showing a comparative
statement of revised estimated receipts by fund source and the proposed expenditures by
proposed use, with the appropriated sums specified in the Budget of the Commonwealth,
and statements which explain the cause, source, and use for any variances which may
exist.
Each budget unit shall submit its reports in print and electronic format consistent
Page 160 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
with the Restricted Funds and Federal Funds records contained in the fiscal biennium
2026-2028 Branch Budget Request Manual and according to the following schedule in
each fiscal year: (a) on or before the beginning of each fiscal year; (b) on or before
October 1; (c) on or before January 1; and (d) on or before April 1.
3. Interim Appropriation Increases: No appropriation from any fund source
shall exceed the sum specified in this Act until the agency has documented the necessity,
purpose, use, and source, and the documentation has been submitted to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue for its review and action in accordance with
KRS 48.630 and Section 2. of this Part. Proposed revisions to an appropriation contained
in the enacted State/Executive Budget or allotment of an unbudgeted appropriation shall
conform to the conditions and procedures of KRS 48.630 and this Act.
Notwithstanding KRS 48.630(3), (4), and (5), any proposed and recommended
actions to increase appropriations for funds specified in Section 2. of this Part shall be
scheduled consistent with the timetable contained in that section in order to provide
continuous and timely budget information.
4. Revision of Appropriation Allotments: Allotments within appropriated
sums for the activities and purposes contained in the enacted Executive Budget shall
conform to KRS 48.610 and may be revised pursuant to KRS 48.605 and this Act.
5. Permitted Appropriation Obligations: No state agency, cabinet,
department, office, or program shall incur any obligation against the General Fund or
Road Fund appropriations contained in this Act unless the obligation may be reasonably
determined to have been contemplated in the enacted budget and is based upon
supporting documentation considered by the General Assembly and legislative and
executive records.
6. Lapse of General Fund or Road Fund Appropriations Supplanted by
Federal Funds: Any General Fund or Road Fund appropriation made in anticipation of a
lack, loss, or reduction of Federal Funds shall lapse to the General Fund or Road Fund
Page 161 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Surplus Account, respectively, to the extent the Federal Funds otherwise become
available.
7. Federally Funded Agencies: A state agency entitled to Federal Funds, which
would represent 100 percent of the cost of a program, shall conform to KRS 48.730.
8. Lapse of General Fund or Road Fund Excess Debt Service
Appropriations: Pursuant to KRS 48.720, any excess General Fund or Road Fund debt
service shall lapse to the respective surplus account unless otherwise directed in this Act.
9. Statutes in Conflict: All statutes and portions of statutes in conflict with any
of the provisions of this Act, to the extent of the conflict, are suspended unless otherwise
provided by this Act.
10. Interpretation of Appropriations: Notwithstanding KRS 48.500, all
questions that arise in interpreting this Act and the Transportation Cabinet budget shall be
decided by the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the decision of
the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be final and conclusive.
11. Publication of the Budget of the Commonwealth: The State Budget
Director shall cause the Governor's Office for Policy and Management, within 60 days of
adjournment of the 2026 Regular Session of the General Assembly, to publish a final
enacted budget document, styled the Budget of the Commonwealth, based upon the
Legislative Branch Budget, Executive Branch Budget, Transportation Cabinet Budget,
and Judicial Branch Budget as enacted by the 2026 Regular Session, as well as other Acts
which contain appropriation provisions for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, and based
upon supporting documentation and legislative records as considered by the 2026
Regular Session. This document shall include, for each agency and budget unit, a
consolidated budget summary statement of available regular and continuing appropriated
revenue by fund source, corresponding appropriation allocations by program or
subprogram as appropriate, budget expenditures by principal budget class, and any other
fiscal data and commentary considered necessary for budget execution by the Governor's
Page 162 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Office for Policy and Management and oversight by the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue. The enacted Executive Branch Budget and Transportation
Cabinet Budget shall be revised or adjusted only upon approval by the Governor's Office
for Policy and Management as provided in each Part of this Act and by KRS 48.400 to
48.810, and upon review by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
12. State Financial Condition: Pursuant to KRS 48.400, the State Budget
Director shall monitor and report on the financial condition of the Commonwealth.
13. Prorating Administrative Costs: The Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet is authorized to establish a system or formula or a combination of
both for prorating the administrative costs of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the
Department of the Treasury, and the Office of the Attorney General relative to the
administration of programs in which there is joint participation by the state and federal
governments for the purpose of receiving the maximum amount of participation
permitted under the appropriate federal laws and regulations governing the programs. The
receipts and allotments under this section shall be reported to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue prior to any transfer of funds.
14. Construction of Budget Provisions Regarding Executive Reorganization
Orders: Nothing in this Act shall be construed to confirm or ratify, under KRS 12.028,
any executive reorganization order unless the executive order was confirmed or ratified
by appropriate amendment to the Kentucky Revised Statutes in another Act of the 2026
Regular Session of the General Assembly.
15. Tax Expenditure Revenue Loss Estimates: By October 15, 2027, the Office
of State Budget Director shall provide to each branch of government detailed estimates
for the General Fund and Road Fund for the current and next two fiscal years of the
revenue loss resulting from tax expenditures. The Department of Revenue shall provide
assistance and furnish data, which is not restricted by KRS 131.190. "Tax expenditure" as
used in this section means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a tax, a
Page 163 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
credit against the tax, a deferral of a tax, or a preferential tax rate. The estimates shall
include for each tax expenditure the amount of revenue loss, a citation of the legal
authority for the tax expenditure, the year in which it was enacted, and the tax year in
which it became effective.
16. Duplicate Appropriations: Any appropriation item and sum in Parts I to X
of this Act and in an appropriation provision in any Act of the 2026 Regular Session
which constitutes a duplicate appropriation shall be governed by KRS 48.312.
17. Priority of Individual Appropriations: KRS 48.313 shall control when a
total or subtotal figure in this Act conflicts with the sum of the appropriations of which it
consists.
18. Severability of Budget Provisions: Appropriation items and sums in Parts I
to X of this Act shall conform to KRS 48.311. If any section, any subsection, or any
provision is found by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final, unappealable order to be
invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts shall not affect or impair any of the
remaining sections, subsections, or provisions.
19. Unclaimed Lottery Prize Money: For fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year
2027-2028, all unclaimed lottery prize money under KRS 154A.110(3) shall be credited
to the Kentucky Educational Excellence Scholarship Reserve Account to be held as a
subsidiary account within the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the purpose of
funding the KEES Program as appropriated in this Act. If the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority certifies to the State Budget Director that the appropriations in this
Act for the KEES Program under the existing award schedule are insufficient to meet
funds required for eligible applicants, then the State Budget Director shall provide the
necessary allotment of funds in the balance of the KEES Reserve Account to fund the
KEES Program. Actions taken under this section shall be reported to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on a timely basis.
20. Workers' Compensation: Notwithstanding KRS 342.340(1) and 803 KAR
Page 164 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
25:021, Section 5, the Personnel Cabinet shall be exempt from procuring excess risk
insurance in fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Workers'
Compensation Benefits and Reserve Program administered by the Cabinet.
21. Carry Forward and Undesignated General Fund and Road Fund Carry
Forward: Notwithstanding KRS 48.700 and 48.705, and other Parts of this Act, the
Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall determine and certify, within
30 days of the close of fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027, the actual
amount of undesignated balance of the General Fund and the Road Fund for the year just
ended. The amounts from the undesignated fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-
2027 General Fund and Road Fund balances that are designated and carried forward for
budgeted purposes in the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium shall be determined by the State
Budget Director during the close of the respective fiscal year and shall be reported to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue within 30 days of the close of
the fiscal year. Any General Fund undesignated balance in excess of the amount
designated for budgeted purposes under this section shall be made available for the
General Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan contained in Part VII of this Act unless otherwise
provided in this Act. The Road Fund undesignated balance in excess of the amount
designated for budgeted purposes under this section shall be made available for the Road
Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan contained in Part IX of this Act unless otherwise
provided in this Act.
22. Reallocation of Appropriations Among Budget Units: Notwithstanding any
statute to the contrary, or provisions of this Act, the Secretary of a Cabinet, the
Commissioner of the Department of Education, and other agency heads may request a
reallocation among budget units under his or her administrative authority up to ten
percent of General Fund appropriations contained in Part I, Operating Budget, of this Act
for fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028 for approval by the State Budget
Director. A request shall explain the need and use for the transfer authority under this
Page 165 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
section. The amount of transfer of General Fund appropriations shall be separately
recorded and reported in the system of financial accounts and reports provided in KRS
Chapter 45. The State Budget Director shall report a transfer made under this section, in
writing, to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
23. Appropriations Expenditure Purpose and Transfer Restrictions: Funds
appropriated in this Act shall not be expended for any purpose not specifically authorized
by the General Assembly in this Act nor shall funds appropriated in this Act be
transferred to or between any cabinet, department, board, commission, institution,
agency, or budget unit of state government unless specifically authorized by the General
Assembly in this Act and KRS 48.400 to 48.810. Compliance with the provisions of this
section shall be reviewed and determined by the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue.
24. Information Technology: All authorized computer information technology
projects shall submit a semiannual progress report to the Capital Projects and Bond
Oversight Committee. The reporting process shall begin six months after the project is
authorized and shall continue through completion of the project. The initial report shall
establish a timeline for completion and cash disbursement schedule. Each subsequent
report shall update the timeline and budgetary status of the project and explain in detail
any issues with completion date and funding.
25. Equipment Service Contracts and Energy Efficiency Measures: The
General Assembly mandates that the Finance and Administration Cabinet review all
equipment service contracts to maximize savings to the Commonwealth to strictly adhere
to the provisions of KRS 56.772, 56.782, and 56.784 in maximizing the use of energy
efficiency measures.
26. Debt Restructuring: Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes, no General Fund or Road Fund debt restructuring transactions shall be
undertaken during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
Page 166 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
27. Effects of Subsequent Legislation: If any measure enacted during the 2026
Regular Session of the General Assembly subsequent to this Act contains an
appropriation or is projected to increase or decrease General Fund revenues, the amount
in the Budget Reserve Trust Fund shall be revised to accommodate the appropriation or
the reduction or increase in projected revenues. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS
48.120(4) to the contrary, the official enacted revenue estimates of the Commonwealth
described in KRS 48.120 shall be adjusted at the conclusion of the 2026 Regular Session
of the General Assembly, respectively, to incorporate any projected revenue increases or
decreases that will occur as a result of actions taken by the General Assembly subsequent
to the passage of this Act by both chambers.
28. Permitted Use of Water and Sewer Bond Funds: Notwithstanding Part II,
(3) of this Act and any statute to the contrary, any balances remaining for either closed or
open project grant agreements authorized pursuant to bond pools set forth in 2003 Ky.
Acts ch. 156, Part II, A., 3., d. Water and Sewer Resources Development Fund for
Tobacco Counties and e. Water and Sewer Resources Development Fund For Coal
Producing Counties; 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 173, Part II, A., 3., 003. Infrastructure for
Economic Development Fund for Coal-Producing Counties and 004. Infrastructure for
Economic Development Fund for Tobacco Counties; 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 252, Part II, A.,
2., 003. Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Non-Coal Producing
Counties and 004. Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Coal-Producing
Counties; 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 123, Section 3., 004. Infrastructure for Economic
Development Fund for Coal-Producing Counties and 005. Infrastructure for Economic
Development Fund for Non-Coal Producing Counties; and 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 174,
Section 2.; and 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 87, Section 2. shall not lapse and shall remain to the
credit of projects previously authorized by the General Assembly unless expressly
reauthorized and reallocated by action of the General Assembly.
29. Electronic Access to Budget Information: In accordance with KRS 48.950,
Page 167 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
the State Budget Director shall continue to work cooperatively with the Legislative
Research Commission to provide relevant budgetary information in a timely manner. To
ensure that this information is transmitted in its most useful format, the State Budget
Director shall provide electronic versions of all documents requested by the Legislative
Research Commission in an editable format in order for documents to be manipulated
without the use of specialized software. Electronic access shall also include the ability to
access and view, but not edit, documents contained in KBUD and all related or successor
budgetary systems of record.
30. Lapse of General Fund Debt Service in Fiscal Year 2025-2026:
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, 48.720, and Part I, F., 3., (4) of this Act, all unexpended
General Fund debt service in fiscal year 2025-2026 not needed to prevent a General Fund
deficit shall lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund (KRS 48.705).
31. Designated Fund Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.760(2), the capital
General Fund appropriation from 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part II, F., 3., 001. is canceled
and the unexpended balance shall be transferred to the General Fund, shall be a part of
the designated fund balance, and shall be carried forward for budgeted purposes into
fiscal year 2026-2027.
32. Delayed Deferred Tax Deduction: Notwithstanding KRS 141.039(2)(d)5., a
combined group shall be entitled to apply for a deferred tax deduction for ten taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2028.
33. Premium and Retaliatory Taxes: Notwithstanding KRS 304.17B9
021(4)(d), premium taxes collected under KRS Chapter 136 from any insurer and
retaliatory taxes collected under KRS 304.3-270 from any insurer shall be credited to the
General Fund.
PART IV
STATE SALARY/COMPENSATION, BENEFIT, AND EMPLOYMENT POLICY
1. Authorized Personnel Complement: On July 1, 2026, and July 1, 2027, the
Page 168 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Personnel Cabinet and the Office of State Budget Director shall establish a record for
each budget unit of authorized permanent full-time and other positions based upon the
enacted Executive Budget of the Commonwealth and any adjustments authorized by
provisions in this Act. The total number of filled permanent full-time and all other
positions shall not exceed the authorized complements pursuant to this section. An
agency head may request an increase in the number of authorized positions to the State
Budget Director. Upon approval of the State Budget Director, the Secretary of the
Personnel Cabinet may authorize the employment of individuals in addition to the
authorized complement. A report of the actions authorized in this section shall be
provided to the Legislative Research Commission on a monthly basis.
2. Salary Increment: (1) Notwithstanding KRS 18A.355, relating to
anniversary date, and notwithstanding KRS 156.808(6)(e) and 163.032(1), a two percent
salary increase is provided, effective July 1, 2026, and a two percent salary increase is
provided, effective July 1, 2027, on the base salary or wages of each eligible state
employee.
3. Employee Cross-Reference: The Personnel Cabinet may permit married
couples who are both eligible to participate in the state health insurance plan to be
covered under one family health benefit plan.
4. Full-Time Positions: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.005(18)(a), full-time
positions in the state parks, where the work assigned is dependent upon fluctuation in
tourism, may be assigned work hours from 25 hours per week and remain in full-time
positions.
5. Employer Retirement Contribution Rates: Notwithstanding KRS 61.565
and 61.702, the employer contribution rates for Kentucky Employees Retirement System
from July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2028, and except as otherwise provided in this Act,
shall be 18.83 percent, consisting of 18.83 percent for pension for hazardous duty
employees; for the same period, the employer contribution for employees of the State
Page 169 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Police Retirement System shall be 54.33 percent, consisting of 51.84 percent for pension
and 2.49 percent for health insurance. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or
KRS 61.565 or 61.702 to the contrary, the initial actuarially accrued liability employer
contribution rate for fiscal year 2026-2027 and for fiscal year 2027-2028, for
nonhazardous employees in the Executive Branch departments shall be determined by the
State Budget Director by May 1 prior to the beginning of each fiscal year. The employer
contribution rate shall include the normal cost contribution of 7.76 percent and be
sufficient to adhere to the prorated amount of the actuarially accrued liability to each
individual nonhazardous employer as determined by the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System. The rates in this section apply to wages and salaries earned for work performed
during the described period regardless of when the employee is paid for the time worked.
6. Health Care Spending Account: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.2254(2)(a) and
(b), if a public employee waives coverage provided by his or her employer under the
Public Employee Health Insurance Program, the employer shall forward a monthly
amount to be determined by the Secretary of the Personnel Cabinet for that employee as
an employer contribution to a health reimbursement account or a health flexible spending
account, but not less than $175 per month, subject to any conditions or limitations
imposed by the Secretary of the Personnel Cabinet to comply with applicable federal law.
The administrative fees associated with a health reimbursement account or health flexible
spending account shall be an authorized expense to be charged to the Public Employee
Health Insurance Trust Fund.
7. State Group Health Insurance Plan - Transfer Between Plan Years:
Notwithstanding KRS 18A.2254, the Secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet and the Secretary of the Personnel Cabinet are authorized to use the excess funds
from any prior plan year to satisfy claims or expenses in Plan Year 2021, Plan Year 2022,
Plan Year 2023, Plan Year 2024, Plan Year 2025, Plan Year 2026, Plan Year 2027 and
Plan Year 2028.
Page 170 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
8. Monthly Per Employee Health Insurance Benefits Assessment: The
Personnel Cabinet shall collect a benefits assessment per month per employee eligible for
health insurance coverage in the state group for duly authorized use by the Personnel
Cabinet in administering its statutory and administrative responsibilities, including but
not limited to administration of the Commonwealth's health insurance program.
PART V
FUNDS TRANSFER
The General Assembly finds that the financial condition of state government
requires the following action.
Notwithstanding the statutes or requirements of the Restricted Funds enumerated
below, there is transferred to the General Fund the following amounts in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028:
2026-27 2027-28
A. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
1. Criminal Justice Training
Agency Revenue Fund 2,368,000 2,368,000
(KRS 15.430 and 136.392(2))
Notwithstanding KRS 15.430 and 136.392(2), these funds transfers to the General
Fund support the General Fund debt service on the bonds sold as appropriated by 2022
Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part II, H., 2., 002.
TOTAL - FUNDS TRANSFER 2,368,000 2,368,000
PART VI
GENERAL FUND BUDGET REDUCTION PLAN
Pursuant to KRS 48.130 and 48.600, a General Fund Budget Reduction Plan is
enacted for state government in the event of an actual or projected revenue shortfall in
General Fund revenue receipts, excluding Tobacco Settlement – Phase I receipts, of
$15,498,900,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026, $15,926,800,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and
Page 171 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
$16,277,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028, as modified pursuant to Part III, 27. of this Act
and by related Acts and actions of the General Assembly in any subsequent extraordinary
or regular session. Notwithstanding KRS 48.130, direct services, obligations essential to
the minimum level of constitutional functions, and other items that may be specified in
this Act, are exempt from the requirements of this Plan. Each branch head shall prepare a
specific plan to address the proportionate share of the General Fund revenue shortfall
applicable to the respective branch. No budget revision action shall be taken by a branch
head in excess of the actual or projected revenue shortfall.
The Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission shall
direct and implement reductions in allotments and appropriations only for their respective
branch budget units as may be necessary, as well as take other measures which shall be
consistent with the provisions of this Part and biennial branch budget bills.
Pursuant to KRS 48.130(4), in the event of a revenue shortfall of five percent or
less, the following General Fund budget reduction actions shall be implemented:
(1) The Local Government Economic Assistance and the Local Government
Economic Development Funds shall be adjusted by the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to equal revised estimates of receipts pursuant to KRS 42.4582 as
modified by the provisions of this Act;
(2) Unexpended debt service;
(3) Transfers of excess unappropriated Restricted Funds, notwithstanding any
statutes to the contrary, other than fiduciary funds, to the General Fund shall be applied
as determined by the head of each branch for its respective budget units;
(4) Any unanticipated Phase I Master Settlement Agreement revenues in both
fiscal years shall be appropriated according to Part X of this Act and shall not be
transferred to the General Fund;
(5) Use of the unappropriated balance of the General Fund surplus shall be
applied;
Page 172 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(6) Excess General Fund appropriations which accrue as a result of personnel
vacancies and turnover, and reduced requirements for operating expenses, grants, and
capital outlay shall be determined and applied by the heads of the executive, judicial, and
legislative departments of state government for their respective branches. The branch
heads shall certify the available amounts which shall be applied to budget units within the
respective branches and shall promptly transmit the certification to the Secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Legislative Research Commission. The
Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall execute the certified actions as
transmitted by the branch heads.
Branch heads shall take care, by their respective actions, to protect, preserve, and
advance the fundamental health, safety, legal and social welfare, and educational well-
being of the citizens of the Commonwealth;
(7) Funds available in the Budget Reserve Trust Fund shall be applied in an
amount not to exceed 25 percent of the Trust Fund balance in fiscal year 2025-2026, 25
percent in fiscal year 2026-2027, and 25 percent in fiscal year 2027-2028;
(8) Reduce General Fund appropriations in Executive Branch agencies' operating
budget units by a sufficient amount to balance either fiscal year; and
(9) Pursuant to KRS 48.130 and 48.600, if the actions contained in subsections
(1) to (8) of this Part are insufficient to eliminate an actual or projected General Fund
revenue shortfall, then the Governor is empowered and directed to take necessary actions
with respect to the Executive Branch budget units to balance the budget by such actions
conforming with the criteria expressed in this Part.
PART VII
GENERAL FUND SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
(1) Notwithstanding KRS 48.130(7), 48.140(3), 48.700, and 48.705, there is
established a plan for the expenditure of General Fund surplus moneys pursuant to a
General Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan contained in this Part for fiscal years 2025-2026,
Page 173 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
2026-2027, and 2027-2028. Pursuant to the enactment of the Surplus Expenditure Plan,
General Fund moneys made available for the General Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan
pursuant to Part III, General Provisions, Section 21. of this Act are appropriated to the
following:
(a) Authorized expenditures without a sum-specific appropriation amount, known
as Necessary Government Expenses, including but not limited to Emergency Orders
formally declared by the Governor in an Executive Order; and
(b) The entire remaining amount to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund.
(2) The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall determine,
within 30 days after the close of each fiscal year, based on the official financial records of
the Commonwealth, the amount of actual General Fund undesignated fund balance for
the General Fund Surplus Account that may be available for expenditure pursuant to the
Plan in fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028. The Secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet shall certify the amount of actual General Fund undesignated
fund balance available for expenditure to the Legislative Research Commission.
PART VIII
ROAD FUND BUDGET REDUCTION PLAN
There is established a Road Fund Budget Reduction Plan for fiscal years 2025-
2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028. Notwithstanding KRS 48.130(1) and (3) relating to
statutory appropriation adjustments related to the revenue sharing of motor fuels taxes, in
the event of an actual or projected revenue shortfall in Road Fund revenue receipts of
$1,844,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026, $1,836,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and
$1,909,400,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028, as modified by related Acts and actions of the
General Assembly in an extraordinary or regular session, the Governor shall implement
sufficient reductions as may be required to protect the highest possible level of service.
PART IX
ROAD FUND SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
Page 174 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Notwithstanding KRS 48.110, 48.140, and 48.710, there is established a plan for the
expenditure of the Road Fund Surplus Account. All moneys in the Road Fund Surplus
Account shall be appropriated to the State Construction Account within the Highways
budget unit and utilized to support projects in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway
Construction Program.
PART X
PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT
(1) General Purpose: This Part prescribes the policy implementing aspects of the
national settlement agreement between the tobacco industry and the collective states as
described in KRS 248.701 to 248.727. In furtherance of that agreement, the General
Assembly recognizes that the Commonwealth of Kentucky is a party to the Phase I
Master Settlement Agreement (MSA) between the Participating Tobacco Manufacturers
and 46 Settling States which provides reimbursement to states for smoking-related
expenditures made over time.
(2) State's MSA Share: The Commonwealth’s share of the MSA is equal to
1.7611586 percent of the total settlement amount. Payments under the MSA are made to
the states annually in April of each year.
(3) MSA Payment Amount Variables: The total settlement amount to be
distributed on each payment date is subject to change pursuant to several variables
provided in the MSA, including inflation adjustments, volume adjustments, previously
settled states adjustments, and the nonparticipating manufacturers adjustment.
(4) Distinct Identity of MSA Payment Deposits: The General Assembly has
determined that it shall be the policy of the Commonwealth that all Phase I Tobacco
Settlement payments shall be deposited to the credit of the General Fund and shall
maintain a distinct identity as Phase I Tobacco Settlement payments that shall not lapse to
the credit of the General Fund surplus but shall continue forward from each fiscal year to
the next fiscal year to the extent that any balance is unexpended.
Page 175 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(5) MSA Payment Estimates and Adjustments: Based on the official estimates
of the Consensus Forecasting Group, the amount of MSA payments expected to be
received in fiscal year 2026-2027 is $82,800,000 and in fiscal year 2027-2028 is
$77,400,000. It is recognized that payments to be received by the Commonwealth are
estimated and are subject to change. If MSA payments received are less than the official
estimates, appropriation reductions shall be applied as follows: after exempting
appropriations for debt service, the Attorney General, and the Department of Revenue, 50
percent to the Agricultural Development Fund, 30 percent to the Early Childhood
Development Fund, and 20 percent to the Health Care Improvement Fund. If MSA
payments received exceed the official estimates, appropriation increases shall be applied
as follows: after exempting appropriations for debt service, the Attorney General, and the
Department of Revenue, 50 percent to the Agricultural Development Fund, 30 percent to
the Early Childhood Development Fund, and 20 percent to the Health Care Improvement
Fund.
a. State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of
$150,000 of the MSA payments in each fiscal year is appropriated to the Attorney
General for the state’s diligent enforcement of noncompliant nonparticipating
manufacturers.
b. State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of
$250,000 of the MSA payments in each fiscal year is appropriated to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue for the state's diligent enforcement of
noncompliant nonparticipating manufacturers.
c. Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), $14,100,200 in
MSA payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $13,880,800 in MSA payments in fiscal
year 2027-2028 are appropriated to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Debt
Service budget unit.
d. Agricultural Development Initiatives: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and
Page 176 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
248.703(4), $34,149,900 in MSA payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $31,559,600 in
MSA payments in fiscal year 2027-2028 are appropriated to the Kentucky Agricultural
Development Fund to be used for agricultural development initiatives as specified in this
Part.
e. Early Childhood Development Initiatives: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654,
$22,538,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $20,829,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 in MSA
payments are appropriated to the Early Childhood Development Initiatives as specified in
this Part.
f. Health Care Initiatives: Notwithstanding KRS 164.476, 248.654, and
304.17B-003(5), $11,611,000 in MSA payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$10,730,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 are appropriated to the Health Care Improvement
Fund for health care initiatives as specified in this Part.
A. STATE ENFORCEMENT
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), appropriations for state enforcement
shall be as follows:
1. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Attorney General 150,000 150,000
2. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Revenue 250,000 250,000
B. DEBT SERVICE
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), appropriations for debt service shall
be as follows:
1. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Page 177 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Debt Service 14,100,200 13,880,800
(1) Debt Service: To the extent that revenues sufficient to support the required
debt service appropriations are received from the Tobacco Settlement Program, those
revenues shall be made available from those accounts to the appropriate account of the
General Fund. All necessary debt service amounts shall be appropriated from the General
Fund and shall be fully paid regardless of whether there is a sufficient amount available
to be transferred from tobacco-supported funding program accounts to other accounts of
the General Fund.
(2) Appropriation of Unexpended Tobacco Debt Service: Any unexpended
balance from the fiscal year 2025-2026 or fiscal year 2026-2027 General Fund (Tobacco)
debt service appropriation in the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Debt Service
budget unit, shall continue and be appropriated to the Department of Agriculture,
Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy.
C. AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), appropriations for Agricultural
Development shall be as follows:
1. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Agriculture 31,149,900 28,559,600
(1) Tobacco Settlement Funds - Allocations: Notwithstanding KRS 248.711(2),
and from the allocation provided therein, counties that are allocated in excess of $20,000
annually may provide up to four percent of the individual county allocation, not to exceed
$15,000 annually, to the county council in that county for administrative costs.
(2) Counties Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above
General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $10,202,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
Page 178 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
$9,295,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the counties account as specified in KRS
248.703(1)(a).
(3) State Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above
General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $18,947,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$17,263,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the state account as specified in KRS
248.703(1)(b).
(4) Farms to Food Banks: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support the Farms to Food Banks
Program. The use of the moneys provided by this appropriation shall be restricted to
purchases of Kentucky-grown produce from Kentucky farmers who participate in the
Farms to Food Banks Program.
(5) Kentucky Rural Mental Health and Suicide Prevention Program:
Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal
year to support the Kentucky Rural Mental Health and Suicide Prevention Program
known as the Raising Hope Initiative. The Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall coordinate with the Kentucky
Department of Agriculture, the University of Kentucky Southeast Center for Agricultural
Health and Injury Prevention, and other entities to enhance awareness of the National
Suicide Prevention Lifeline (988) in rural communities in Kentucky and to improve
access to information on mental health issues and available treatment services. The
Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall
provide cultural competency training to staff to address the unique mental health
challenges affecting the state’s rural communities. The Department for Behavioral
Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall also provide outreach,
treatment, and other necessary services to improve the mental health outcomes of rural
communities in Kentucky. The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities, in conjunction with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture and
Page 179 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
the University of Kentucky Southeast Center for Agricultural Health and Injury
Prevention, shall apply for Federal Funds as provided by the Agriculture Improvement
Act of 2018, 7 U.S.C. sec. 5936, to supplement the General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation provided above. The Department of Agriculture may utilize up to $50,000
in each fiscal year for program administration purposes. The Department of Agriculture
shall coordinate with the Raising Hope Initiative partners to take custody of and maintain
any intellectual property assets that were created or developed by any state agency in
connection with the Raising Hope Initiative.
2. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Natural Resources 3,000,000 3,000,000
(1) Environmental Stewardship Program: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Environmental
Stewardship Program.
(2) Conservation District Local Aid: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Division of
Conservation to provide direct aid to local conservation districts.
TOTAL - AGRICULTURAL 34,149,900 31,559,600
APPROPRIATIONS
D. EARLY CHILDHOOD DEVELOPMENT
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654, appropriations for Early Childhood Development
shall be as follows:
1. EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. General Administration and Program Support 1,200,000 1,200,000
(1) Early Childhood Development: Included in the above General Fund
Page 180 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
(Tobacco) appropriation is $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for the Early Childhood
Advisory Council.
2. CABINET FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
a. Community Based Services 11,500,000 11,500,000
(1) Early Childhood Development Program: Included in the above General
Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $9,500,000 in each fiscal year 2026-2027for the Early
Childhood Development Program.
(2) Early Childhood Adoption and Foster Care Supports: Included in the
above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for the
Early Childhood Adoption and Foster Care Supports Program.
2026-27 2027-28
b. Public Health 8,580,000 7,880,000
(1) HANDS Program, Healthy Start, Early Childhood Mental Health, and
Early Childhood Oral Health: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $5,980,000 in each fiscal year for the Health Access Nurturing
Development Services (HANDS) Program, $700,000 in each fiscal year for Healthy Start
initiatives, $700,000 in each fiscal year for Early Childhood Mental Health, $700,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 for Early Childhood Oral Health, and $500,000 in each fiscal year
for Lung Cancer Screening.
2026-27 2027-28
b. Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities Services 1,258,900 249,300
(1) Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment: Included in the above
General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $1,258,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$249,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for substance abuse prevention and treatment for
pregnant women with a history of substance abuse problems.
Page 181 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
TOTAL - EARLY CHILDHOOD 22,538,900 20,829,300
APPROPRIATIONS
E. HEALTH CARE IMPROVEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 164.476, 248.654 and 304.17B-003(5), appropriations for
health care improvement shall be as follows:
1. CABINET FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Public Health 2,111,000 2,000,000
(1) Smoking Cessation Program: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $2,111,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,000,000 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 for Smoking Cessation.
2. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Justice Administration 3,250,000 3,250,000
(1) Office of Drug Control Policy: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $3,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Office of Drug Control
Policy.
(2) Restorative Justice: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $250,000 in each fiscal year to support the Restorative Justice Program
administered by the Volunteers of America.
3. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Council on Postsecondary Education 6,250,000 5,480,300
(1) Cancer Research and Screening: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $6,250,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,480,300 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 for cancer research and screening. The appropriation in each fiscal year
Page 182 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
shall be equally shared between the University of Kentucky and the University of
Louisville.
TOTAL - HEALTH CARE 11,611,000 10,730,300
TOTAL - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT
FUNDING PROGRAM 82,800,000 77,400,000
PART XI
STATE/EXECUTIVE BRANCH BUDGET SUMMARY
OPERATING BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 82,800,000 77,400,000
General Fund -0- 15,011,425,800 16,340,213,600
Restricted Funds 55,983,800 16,880,655,200 17,360,325,200
Federal Funds -0- 22,903,201,800 23,836,002,000
Road Fund -0- 55,570,300 57,914,800
SUBTOTAL 55,983,800 54,933,653,100 57,671,855,600
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- -0- -0-
Restricted Funds -0- 19,969,508,000 143,128,000
Federal Funds -0- 713,834,000 51,415,000
Bond Funds 16,000,000 1,322,998,600 351,630,000
Agency Bonds -0- 1,479,360,000 -0-
Investment Income -0- 156,645,300 133,050,000
Other Funds -0- 9,828,352,000 42,000
SUBTOTAL 16,000,000 33,470,697,900 679,265,000
TOTAL - STATE/EXECUTIVE BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Page 183 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 82,800,000 77,400,000
General Fund -0- 15,011,425,800 16,340,213,600
Restricted Fund 55,983,800 36,850,163,200 17,503,453,200
Federal Funds -0- 23,617,035,800 23,887,417,000
Road Fund -0- 55,570,300 57,914,800
Bond Funds 16,000,000 1,322,998,600 351,630,000
Agency Bonds -0- 1,479,360,000 -0-
Investment Income -0- 156,645,300 133,050,000
Other Funds -0- 9,827,842,000 42,000
TOTAL FUND 71,983,800 88,403,841,000 58,351,120,600
PART XII
APPROPRIATIONS from the BUDGET RESERVE TRUST FUND
There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of $795,650,000
in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $166,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 to support the following
appropriations:
(1) $75,000,000 in each fiscal year to the General Administration budget unit
within the Finance and Administration Cabinet to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund;
(2) $125,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Public Health budget unit within
the Health and Family Services Cabinet to be distributed to a Rural Hospital Assistance
Fund;
(3) $100,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Medicaid Administration budget
unit within the Health and Family Services Cabinet for a state-based health insurance
subsidies program to provide subsidies to individuals for the cost of purchasing health
benefit plans in the individual market on the condition that federal advanced premium tax
credits are not extended for 2026;
(4) $75,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Community Based Services
Page 184 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
budget unit within the Health and Family Services Cabinet to support a Utility Assistance
Fund;
(5) $50,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Community Based Services
budget unit within the Health and Family Services Cabinet to be distributed to Feeding
Kentucky;
(6) $125,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Highways budget unit within the
Transportation Cabinet for the construction of the Brent Spence companion bridge
project;
(7) $50,000,000 in each fiscal year to the Economic Development budget unit to
support necessary site or infrastructure improvements for mega-development projects of
at least $10,000,000, with an exception for certain economic development projects as
recommended by the Cabinet based on unique conditions of the county where the project
may occur, including but not limited to the population, per capita income, or county
wages that are lower than the median for the state;
(8) $35,000,000 in each fiscal year to the Economic Development budget unit to
support the Kentucky Product Development Initiative Program;
(9) $50,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the School Facilities Construction
Commission budget unit for the renovation of secondary career and technical education
facilities;
(10) $42,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Eastern Kentucky University
budget unit for a requirement to retain a $42,000,000 escrow reserve amount to be able to
move forward with an accredited osteopathic medicine program;
(11) $17,900,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Kentucky Higher Education
Assistance Authority budget unit to pay off the unfunded liability of the Kentucky
Affordable Prepaid Tuition Program;
(12) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Operations and Support Services
budget unit within the Department of Education for a capital information technology
Page 185 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
project for the Pre-K for All Program;
(13) $4,500,000 in each fiscal year to the Economic Development budget unit for
the benefit of LifeSciKY, to be distributed as follows: $500,000 in each fiscal year to the
Kenton County Fiscal Court and administered through the Northern Kentucky Port
Authority with funds distributed to LifeSciKY for ongoing lab operations and
maintenance of the LifeSciKY facility located within the OneNKY Center; $2,500,000 in
each fiscal year for a BioInnovation Fund to the BE NKY Growth Partnership and
administered through LifeSciKY; $1,250,000 in each fiscal year to LifeSciKY to
complete critical lab infrastructure and equipment purchases; and $250,000 in each fiscal
year to the Kenton County Fiscal Court and deployed through the Northern Kentucky
Area Development District with funding directed to LifeSciKY to expand K-12 and
postsecondary programming aligned with the life sciences workforce;
(14) $2,000,000 in each fiscal year to the University of Kentucky budget unit for
the expansion of the Holocaust Education initiative to increase the number of Teacher
Leaders, the number of teachers attending workshops, and expand opportunities for
teacher and student enrichment related to Jewish history, the nature of antisemitism, and
the Holocaust and other genocides;
(15) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Department for Local Government
budget unit to be distributed to the Pike County Public Library to support the construction
of a museum to house the history of Pike County;
(16) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit to be distributed to the Louisville Metro Government for
violence prevention programs;
(17) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Department for Local
Government budget unit be distributed to the Lexington-Fayette Urban County
Government to support a new Children’s Museum project;
(18) $3,750,000 to the Homeland Security budget unit in fiscal year 2026-2027 for
Page 186 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1520
grants to support physical security enhancements for faith-based institutions in Kentucky;
and
(19) $8,500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Court Operations and
Administration budget unit within the Court of Justice for flood damage to contents in the
Franklin and Hardin County courthouses in excess of insurance coverage.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended balance of appropriations in this
Part remaining at the close of fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall continue
into fiscal year 2027-2028.
The line-item appropriation from 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, (176) shall be
reauthorized and reallocated to the Economic Development budget unit for a Rural
Economic Development Fund.
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the unexpended balance from the following
numbered line-item appropriations from 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1 shall not lapse and
shall carry forward into fiscal year 2026-2027 and into fiscal year 2027-2028: (4), (172),
(173), (174), (205), (209), and (220).
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the unexpended balance from the line-item
appropriation from 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 223, sec. 71, shall not lapse and shall carry forward
into fiscal year 2026-2027 and into fiscal year 2027-2028.
Notwithstanding KRS 164A.565(6), the unexpended balance from the line-item
appropriation from 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, (203) shall lapse to the Budget Reserve
Trust Fund (KRS 48.705).
Page 187 of 187
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:20 AM Jacketed